BEYOND  THE  CLASSROOM:
INFORMAL  STEM  EDUCATION

HEARING

BEFORE THE

SUBCOMMITTEE ON RESEARCH AND

SCIENCE EDUCATION

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE AND

TECHNOLOGY

HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES

ONE  HUNDRED  ELEVENTH  CONGRESS

FIRST  SESSION

FEBRUARY  26,  2009

Serial No. 111–5

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Science  and  Technology

(

Available  via  the  World  Wide  Web:  http://www.science.house.gov

47–611PS

WASHINGTON  : 

2009

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

COMMITTEE  ON  SCIENCE  AND  TECHNOLOGY

HON.  BART  GORDON,  Tennessee,  Chair

RALPH  M.  HALL,  Texas
F.  JAMES  SENSENBRENNER  JR.,

Wisconsin

LAMAR  S.  SMITH,  Texas
DANA  ROHRABACHER,  California
ROSCOE  G.  BARTLETT,  Maryland
VERNON  J.  EHLERS,  Michigan
FRANK  D.  LUCAS,  Oklahoma
JUDY  BIGGERT,  Illinois
W.  TODD  AKIN,  Missouri
RANDY  NEUGEBAUER,  Texas
BOB  INGLIS,  South  Carolina
MICHAEL  T.  MCCAUL,  Texas
MARIO  DIAZ-BALART,  Florida
BRIAN  P.  BILBRAY,  California
ADRIAN  SMITH,  Nebraska
PAUL  C.  BROUN,  Georgia
PETE  OLSON,  Texas

JERRY  F.  COSTELLO,  Illinois
EDDIE  BERNICE  JOHNSON,  Texas
LYNN  C.  WOOLSEY,  California
DAVID  WU,  Oregon
BRIAN  BAIRD,  Washington
BRAD  MILLER,  North  Carolina
DANIEL  LIPINSKI,  Illinois
GABRIELLE  GIFFORDS,  Arizona
DONNA  F.  EDWARDS,  Maryland
MARCIA  L.  FUDGE,  Ohio
BEN  R.  LUJA´ N,  New  Mexico
PAUL  D.  TONKO,  New  York
PARKER  GRIFFITH,  Alabama
STEVEN  R.  ROTHMAN,  New  Jersey
JIM  MATHESON,  Utah
LINCOLN  DAVIS,  Tennessee
BEN  CHANDLER,  Kentucky
RUSS  CARNAHAN,  Missouri
BARON  P.  HILL,  Indiana
HARRY  E.  MITCHELL,  Arizona
CHARLES  A.  WILSON,  Ohio
KATHLEEN  DAHLKEMPER,  Pennsylvania
ALAN  GRAYSON,  Florida
SUZANNE  M.  KOSMAS,  Florida
GARY  C.  PETERS,  Michigan
VACANCY

SUBCOMMITTEE ON RESEARCH AND SCIENCE EDUCATION

HON.  DANIEL  LIPINSKI,  Illinois,  Chair

EDDIE  BERNICE  JOHNSON,  Texas
BRIAN  BAIRD,  Washington
MARCIA  L.  FUDGE,  Ohio
PAUL  D.  TONKO,  New  York
PARKER  GRIFFITH,  Alabama
RUSS  CARNAHAN,  Missouri
BART  GORDON,  Tennessee

VERNON  J.  EHLERS,  Michigan
RANDY  NEUGEBAUER,  Texas
BRIAN  P.  BILBRAY,  California
ADRIAN  SMITH,  Nebraska

RALPH  M.  HALL,  Texas

DAHLIA  SOKOLOV  Subcommittee  Staff  Director

MARCY  GALLO  Democratic  Professional  Staff  Member
MELE´ WILLIAMS  Republican  Professional  Staff  Member

BESS  CAUGHRAN  Research  Assistant

(II)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

C O N T E N T S
February  26,  2009

Hearing Charter ......................................................................................................

Page
2

Opening  Statements

Statement  by  Representative  Daniel  Lipinski,  Chairman,  Subcommittee  on
Research  and  Science  Education,  Committee  on  Science  and  Technology,
U.S. House of Representatives ............................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Statement  by  Representative  Vernon  J.  Ehlers,  Ranking  Minority  Member,
Subcommittee  on  Research  and  Science  Education,  Committee  on  Science
and Technology, U.S. House of Representatives ...............................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Statement  by  Representative  Russ  Carnahan,  Member,  Subcommittee  on  Re-
search  and  Science  Education,  Committee  on  Science  and  Technology,  U.S.
House of Representatives ....................................................................................

Witnesses:

Dr.  Joan  Ferrini-Mundy,  Director,  Division  of  Research  on  Learning  in  For-
mal  and  Informal  Settings,  Directorate  for  Education  and  Human  Re-
sources, National Science Foundation

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Dr.  Philip  Bell,  The  Geda  and  Phil  Condit  Professor  of  Science  and  Math
Education, Associate Professor of the Learning Sciences; Director, Institute
for Science and Mathematics Education, University of Washington, Seattle;
Co-Chair, Committee on Learning Science in Informal Environments, Board
on  Science  Education,  National  Academy  of  Sciences,  The  National  Acad-
emies

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Ms.  Andrea  J.  Ingram,  Vice  President,  Education  and  Guest  Services,  Mu-

seum of Science and Industry, Chicago

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Mr.  Robert  M.  Lippincott,  Senior  Vice  President  for  Education,  The  Public

Broadcasting Service (PBS)

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Dr.  Alejandro  Grajal,  Senior  Vice  President  for  Conservation,  Education,  and

Training, The Chicago Zoological Society

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Discussion .................................................................................................................

6
7

7
9

9

10
12
17

18
20
25

26
27
33

34
35
52

52
54
59
59

(III)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

IV

Appendix  1:  Answers  to  Post-Hearing  Questions

Dr.  Joan  Ferrini-Mundy,  Director,  Division  of  Research  on  Learning  in  For-
mal  and  Informal  Settings,  Directorate  for  Education  and  Human  Re-
sources, National Science Foundation ................................................................
Dr.  Philip  Bell,  The  Geda  and  Phil  Condit  Professor  of  Science  and  Math
Education, Associate Professor of the Learning Sciences; Director, Institute
for Science and Mathematics Education, University of Washington, Seattle;
Co-Chair, Committee on Learning Science in Informal Environments, Board
on  Science  Education,  National  Academy  of  Sciences,  The  National  Acad-
emies .....................................................................................................................
Ms.  Andrea  J.  Ingram,  Vice  President,  Education  and  Guest  Services,  Mu-
seum of Science and Industry, Chicago ..............................................................
Mr.  Robert  M.  Lippincott,  Senior  Vice  President  for  Education,  The  Public
Broadcasting Service (PBS) .................................................................................
Dr.  Alejandro  Grajal,  Senior  Vice  President  for  Conservation,  Education,  and
Training, The Chicago Zoological Society ..........................................................

Page

76

80

82

84

97

Appendix  2:  Additional  Material  for  the  Record

Statement  of  Ioannis  Miaoulis,  President  and  Director,  Museum  of  Science,
Boston; Founding Director, National Center for Technological Literacy ........
Statement of the Girl Scouts of the USA ...............................................................

100
107

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

BEYOND  THE  CLASSROOM:  INFORMAL  STEM

EDUCATION

THURSDAY,  FEBRUARY  26,  2009

HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES,

SUBCOMMITTEE ON RESEARCH AND SCIENCE EDUCATION,

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY,

Washington, DC.

The  Subcommittee  met,  pursuant  to  call,  at  10:00  a.m.,  in  Room
2318  of  the  Rayburn  House  Office  Building,  Hon.  Daniel  Lipinski
[Chair of the Subcommittee] presiding.

(1)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

2

HEARING CHARTER

SUBCOMMITTEE ON RESEARCH AND SCIENCE

EDUCATION

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY

U.S. HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES

Beyond the Classroom:

Informal STEM Education

THURSDAY, FEBRUARY 26, 2009

10:00 A.M.–12:00 P.M.

2318 RAYBURN HOUSE OFFICE BUILDING

1. Purpose

The purpose of the hearing is to examine the role of informal environments in pro-
moting  science  learning.  The  Subcommittee  will  explore  the  potential  for  informal
science  learning  to  engage  students  in  math  and  science  in  ways  that  traditional
formal learning environments cannot, as well as the ways in which informal science
education can complement and enhance classroom science studies. Furthermore, we
will receive testimony on the National Academies report, ‘‘Learning Science in Infor-
mal Environments: People, Places, and Pursuits.’’

2. Witnesses:
• Dr.  Joan  Ferrini-Mundy,  Division  Director,  Division  of  Research  on  Learning
in  Formal  and  Informal  Settings,  Education  and  Human  Resources  Directorate,
National Science Foundation.

• Dr.  Phillip  Bell,  Co-Chair,  National  Academies  report  ‘‘Learning  Science  in  In-
formal Environments: People, Places, and Pursuits,’’ and Professor, College of Edu-
cation, the University of Washington, Seattle.

• Ms.  Andrea  Ingram,  Vice  President  of  Education  and  Guest  Experiences,  Mu-

seum of Science and Industry–Chicago.

• Mr.  Robert  Lippincott,  Senior  Vice  President  for  Education,  the  Public  Broad-

casting Service (PBS).

• Dr.  Alejandro  Grajal,  Senior  Vice  President  of  Conservation,  Education,  and

Training, the Chicago Zoological Society.

3. Overarching Questions:
• What  is  the  role  of  informal  environments  in  educating  students  and  the  public
about  Science,  Technology,  Engineering  and  Mathematics  (STEM)?  In  what  ways
can  informal  education  contribute  to  and  enhance  classroom  learning?  Are  there
areas  that  informal  environments  are  uniquely  positioned  to  address?  What  role
can  informal  education  play  in  broadening  participation  and  promoting  diversity
in STEM fields?
• What  are  the  key  factors  in  successful  partnerships  between  informal  science  or-
ganizations  and  formal  education  institutions,  including  both  K–12  and  higher
education? What opportunities for partnerships exist with the private sector? How
have  both  museums  and  educational  media  providers  had  to  adapt  to  meet  the
needs of schools and states? How can K–12 schools and institutions of higher edu-
cation take advantage of informal learning environments to meet their needs?
• What  kind  of  research  is  being  done  on  informal  science  education  to  assess  its
evolving  role  and  effectiveness?  What  metrics  exist  to  assess  and  evaluate  infor-
mal  learning  environments,  and  what  are  the  barriers  to  developing  better
metrics?
• What  are  some  of  the  major  challenges  and  opportunities  that  lie  ahead  in  the
field  of  informal  science  learning?  What  support  could  federal  research  agencies
provide  to  most  effectively  contribute  to  the  development  and  implementation  of
informal STEM education activities?

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

3

4. Background

There  is  now  a  consensus  that  improving  science,  technology,  engineering,  and
mathematics education is critical to the Nation’s economic strength and global com-
petitiveness  in  the  21st  century.  Reports  have  emphasized  the  need  to  attract  and
educate the next generation of American scientists and innovators. For example, the
National  Academies’  2005  report,  Rising  Above  the  Gathering  Storm,  recommends
that the Nation increase its talent pool by vastly improving K–12 science and math-
ematics education. This recommendation was embraced by the America COMPETES
Act  which  was  developed  by  the  Science  &  Technology  Committee  in  the  last  Con-
gress and was signed into law in August of 2007. Many in the STEM educator com-
munity  have  argued  that  in  order  to  improve  STEM  education,  we  must  draw  on
a  full  range  of  learning  opportunities  and  experiences,  including  those  in  informal,
non-school settings. Reports by both the National Science Board1 and the Academic
Competitiveness  Council2 cited  informal  education  as  an  integral  component  of  our
nation’s education system.

Informal Education

Informal  science  education  can  take  place  in  a  variety  of  places  and  through  a
wide  variety  of  media  such  as  science  centers  and  museums,  film  and  broadcast
media, aquariums, zoos, nature centers, botanical gardens, online games, and after-
school  programs.  It  is  widely  held  that  informal  learning  can  happen  in  everyday
environments  and  through  everyday  activities  as  well.  While  it  can  be  difficult  to
define  informal  education,  the  term  tends  to  broadly  refer  to  any  opportunities  for
learning that take place in non-traditional, non-school settings.

National Academies Report on Informal Science Learning

The Committee on Learning Science in Informal Environments was established by
the  National  Research  Council  (NRC)  of  the  National  Academies  to  undertake  a
study  to  examine  the  status  of,  and  potential  for  science  learning  in  informal  envi-
ronments.  The  National  Science  Foundation  (NSF),  a  principle  sponsor  of  research
in  informal  science  education,  provided  support  for  the  study.  In  January  2009  the
National  Academies  Committee  released  a  report  entitled  ‘‘Learning  Science  in  In-
formal  Environments:  People  Places,  and  Pursuits,’’  summarizing  the  key  conclu-
sions of the study and providing recommendations for future research and practice.
The  Committee  found,  among  other  things,  that  there  is  ample  evidence  to  suggest
that science learning takes place throughout the life span and across venues in non-
school  settings.  The  Committee  outlined  and  examined  four  categories  where  infor-
mal learning often takes place: everyday experiences, designed spaces (such as mu-
seums,  science  centers  and  zoos),  non-school  educational  programs,  and  science
media.  The  report  summarizes  the  conclusions  drawn  from  the  research  reviewed
by  the  Committee,  and  offers  recommendations  for  practice  and  research  to  exhibit
and program designers, front-line educators, researchers and evaluators.

A key issue addressed in the report is the need to effectively evaluate and assess
informal  STEM  education.  Assessing  learning  in  non-school  settings  can  prove  dif-
ficult since informal settings for STEM learning typically do not use tests or grades.
Yet, there tends to be a general agreement that it is important to evaluate learning
outcomes  in  order  to  improve  informal  STEM  programs  and  activities.  Another  key
issue highlighted in the report is the role of informal STEM education in promoting
diversity and broadening participation. The Committee found that informal environ-
ments  can  have  a  significant  impact  on  STEM  learning  outcomes  in  historically
under-represented groups, and informal learning environments may be uniquely po-
sitioned to make STEM education accessible to all.

5. Federal Support for Informal STEM Education

Informal STEM Education Support at NSF

STEM education research and development activities are funded out of a number
of  federal  agencies,  with  NSF  being  the  primary  source  of  support  for  STEM  edu-
cation  research.  Historically,  NSF’s  mission  has  included  supporting  and  strength-
ening the Nation’s STEM research and education activities at all levels. NSF carries

1 National  Science  Board  (2007).  Science,  technology,  engineering,  and  mathematics  (STEM)
education  issues  and  legislative  options.  In  R.  Nata  (Ed.),  Progress  in  Education  (Vol.  14,  pp.
161–189).

2 U.S.  Department  of  Education  (2007).  Report  of  the  Academic  Competitiveness  Council.

Washington, DC: Author.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

4

out this mission by funding STEM activities ranging from teacher training and cur-
riculum development to informal education and research on learning.

Many  of  the  Foundation’s  STEM  education  and  research  activities  are  housed  in
the  Directorate  for  Education  and  Human  Resources  (EHR).  EHR  support  for  re-
search  on  learning  and  STEM  education  is  largely  funded  through  its  Division  on
Research  Learning  in  Formal  and  Informal  Settings  (DRL).  The  FY08  budget  for
DRL  was  approximately  $209  million.  One  of  the  chief  informal  STEM  education
programs  funded  through  DRL  is  the  Informal  Science  Education  (ISE)  program.
ISE  invests  in  projects  that  are  designed  to  increase  interest  and  understanding  of
STEM  through  informal  learning  experiences,  with  a  particular  emphasis  on
projects  that  seek  to  inform  and  strengthen  informal  STEM  education  nationally,
and have the potential to make a strategic impact on the field as a whole. The FY08
budget for ISE was approximately $66.0 million.

While  the  majority  of  the  Foundation’s  STEM  education  support  comes  out  of
EHR, there are a variety of STEM activities being funded across the research direc-
torates.  One  such  example,  the  Centers  for  Ocean  Sciences  Education  Excellence
(COSEE)  program,  housed  in  the  Geosciences  Directorate  in  the  Division  of  Ocean
Sciences  (GEO/OCE)  has  a  strong  informal  education  component.  The  COSEE  pro-
gram invests in projects that connect scientists with educators in formal settings as
well  informal  settings  such  as  museums  and  aquariums.  Another  example  is  the
International  Polar  Year  awards  in  NSF’s  Office  of  Polar  Programs  (OPP).  Such
awards  fund  formal  and  informal  interdisciplinary  projects  aimed  at  educating  the
public about the polar regions. IPY projects have ranged from museum support and
teacher  development  programs  to  film  projects  documenting  polar  marine  eco-
systems in Antarctica.

Support for Informal STEM Education at Other Agencies

The  other  mission  agencies  within  the  jurisdiction  of  the  House  Science  &  Tech-
nology  Committee  also  support  STEM  education,  including  informal  STEM  edu-
cation,  through  a  variety  of  mechanisms.  While  it  is  not  possible  to  provide  budget
information  regarding  all  the  informal  science  education  initiatives  at  the  agencies
at present, there are a few notable programs that serve as examples of agency sup-
port of informal STEM education. The National Aeronautics and Space Administra-
tion  (NASA)  Informal  Education  Division  has  recently  initiated  its  NASA  Explorer
Institute  (NEI)  program,  designed  to  bring  together  members  of  the  informal  edu-
cation  community  and  NASA  staff  to  facilitate  discussions  on  how  to  best  utilize
NASA  missions  to  educate  students  and  the  public  about  STEM.  NEI  supports  the
informal  science  education  community  by  providing  NASA-related  professional  de-
velopment  opportunities,  STEM  teaching  tools  and  other  development  projects  for
informal STEM educators at NASA field centers. Another NASA activity, the NASA
e-Education  programs  develop  research-based  products  and  services  specifically  de-
signed to enhance both formal and informal education. At the National Oceanic and
Atmospheric  Administration  (NOAA),  the  new  NOAA  Education  competitive  grant
program  funds  projects  that  bring  together  formal  and  informal  education  institu-
tions to create projects that promote environmental literacy and build public under-
standing  of  our  global  system  and  the  interconnectivity  of  oceanic  and  atmospheric
processes.

It  is  difficult  to  identify  all  the  informal  education  programs  since  a  comprehen-
sive  database  of  STEM  education  programs  within  the  federal  agencies  does  not
exist at present. Many STEM education initiatives are clearly identified within their
respective education offices and budget lines, but the important STEM activities em-
bedded  within  the  other  agency  mission  directorates  or  program  offices  are  much
harder to identify. For that reason, Committee staff has undertaken the task of cre-
ating  a  comprehensive  database  of  STEM  education  programs  and  activities  within
the six mission agencies.

6. Questions for Witnesses

Dr. Ferrini-Mundy

• What  is  the  current  level  of  support  and  the  scope  of  NSF-funded  research
on  informal  STEM  education?  How  much  of  NSF’s  research  support  in  this
area  is  directed  to  academic  researchers  and  how  much  to  providers  of  infor-
mal science education, or consortia thereof?
• What metrics and methodologies exist for evaluation and assessment of infor-
mal  education  environments?  What  are  the  barriers  to  developing  better
metrics? What is or should be NSF’s role in developing those metrics?

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

5

• How  can  informal  STEM  education  environments  help  NSF  achieve  its  mis-
sion to broaden participation in STEM? To what extent are informal learning
environments  incorporated  into  programs  to  broaden  participation  managed
elsewhere  in  the  Education  and  Human  Resources  Directorate  or  throughout
the  Foundation?  How  do  you  communicate  relevant  new  findings  supported
by your division to colleagues who manage those programs?

Dr. Bell

• Please  summarize  the  findings  and  recommendations  of  the  National  Acad-
emy  of  Sciences  report,  ‘‘Learning  Science  in  Informal  Environments:  People,
Places and Pursuits.’’
• What  do  we  know  about  how  students  and  the  general  public  learn  in  infor-
mal environments? What don’t we know? How can we effectively evaluate in-
formal  learning  environments?  Is  the  current  level  of  support  for  research  in
these areas adequate?
• Please  provide  an  overview  of  your  own  groups’  research  on  informal  edu-
cation  at  the  NSF-funded  Learning  in  Informal  and  Formal  Environments
(LIFE) Center at the University of Washington.

Ms. Ingram and Dr. Grajal

• What  is  the  role  of  informal  learning  environments,  such  as  [museums/zoos],
in  educating  students  and  the  public  about  Science,  Technology,  Engineering
and  Mathematics  (STEM)?  In  what  ways  can  institutions  such  as  [museums/
zoos]  contribute  to  and  enhance  classroom  learning?  In  what  ways  can  and
have informal STEM education institutions, such as [museums/zoos], provided
professional development for teachers?
• What  role  can  informal  education  play  in  broadening  participation  and  pro-
moting  diversity  in  STEM  fields?  What  are  informal  education  institutions,
such  as  the  [museum/zoo],  doing  to  engage  and  educate  diverse  populations?
• Please  describe  any  partnerships  the  [museum/zoo]  may  have  with  formal
education institutions, including both K–12 and higher education. What have
been  the  key  factors  to  the  success  of  such  partnerships?  How  have  informal
STEM  education  institutions  such  as  [museums/zoos]  had  to  adapt  to  meet
the needs of schools and States?

Mr. Lippincott

• What role can digital and electronic media play in educating students and the
public  about  Science,  Technology,  Engineering  and  Mathematics  (STEM)  in
the  21st  century?  In  what  ways  can  media  be  used  as  a  teaching  tool  in  the
classroom?  In  what  ways  can  and  have  educational  media  providers,  such  as
PBS, provided professional development for teachers?
• What  role  can  informal  education  play  in  broadening  participation  and  pro-
moting  diversity  in  STEM  fields?  What  are  media  providers,  such  as  PBS,
doing to engage and educate diverse populations?
• Please  describe  any  partnerships  PBS  may  have  with  formal  education  insti-
tutions,  including  both  K–12  and  higher  education.  What  have  been  the  key
factors  to  the  success  of  such  partnerships?  How  have  media  providers  had
to adapt to meet the needs of schools and States?

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

6

Chair LIPINSKI. This hearing will now come to order.
Good  morning.  This  is  the  first  hearing  of  the  Research  and
Science  Education  Subcommittee  for  the  111th  Congress,  and  as
such,  it  is  my  first  hearing  as  Chair.  I  am  very  happy  to  have  Dr.
Ehlers  here  as  the  Ranking  Member  on  the  Committee.  We  have
a great interest in STEM education. It is very fitting—I have a de-
gree in engineering, Dr. Ehlers, of course, is a physicist, and we are
Co-Chairs of the STEM education caucus, so I am very happy that
we are holding this as our first hearing here this morning.

While we often examine and discuss ways to improve STEM edu-
cation  in  the  classroom,  we  rarely  look  at  the  many  opportunities
for  learning  elsewhere.  A  great  deal  of  learning  happens  through-
out  our  lives  in  everyday  activities,  from  having  a  conversation  at
the family dinner table or watching a show on television, to attend-
ing a summer camp at a zoo or taking a trip to a museum. Not just
students  but  the  general  public  are  exposed  to  opportunities  for
science  learning  through  informal  education  every  day.  Today  we
will  explore  the  ways  in  which  informal  learning  institutions  are
uniquely  positioned  to  attract  and  educate  the  public  about  STEM
issues,  as  well  as  the  role  of  informal  institutions  in  contributing
to and enhancing formal education in the classroom.

Today, we will hear from witnesses who are engaged in informal
STEM  education  in  a  range  of  settings  and  capacities.  I  look  for-
ward to hearing the witnesses provide insights regarding the bene-
fits and challenges of informal STEM education and the state of re-
search  on  how  students  learn  STEM  in  informal  settings,  as  well
as recommendations for moving forward.

The  Science  and  Technology  Committee,  and  our  subcommittee
in  particular,  has  made  STEM  education  a  top  priority.  We  have
heard  time  and  again  that  we  need  more  STEM  educated  grad-
uates and teachers if we want to compete in the global economy of
the 21st century. A 2005 National Academies report, ‘‘Rising Above
the  Gathering  Storm,’’  recommended  that  the  Nation  increase  its
talent pool by vastly improving K–12 science and mathematics edu-
cation. For that reason, in the last Congress, the Committee devel-
oped  and  the  President  signed  into  law  the  America  COMPETES
Act,  which  included  many  provisions  specifically  aimed  at  improv-
ing STEM education in our country.

Educating  more  highly  qualified  STEM  teachers  and  enhancing
the teaching skills and content knowledge of existing STEM teach-
ers  was  the  top  recommendation  of  the  Gathering  Storm  report,
which  became  the  basis  for  the  teacher  education  and  professional
development  provisions  in  the  COMPETES  Act.  I  hope  to  hear
today  from  our  witnesses  about  the  ways  in  which  informal  edu-
cation  institutions,  such  as  museums,  zoos,  and  educational  media
providers, can and do offer teacher training and professional devel-
opment tools for our nation’s STEM teachers.

I  am  also  interested  in  the  role  of  informal  education  in  pro-
ducing a more diverse pool of scientists and engineers through pro-
grams  and  policies  that  attract  individuals  from  groups  under-rep-
resented  in  STEM  fields.  I  know  some  of  our  witnesses  have  been
engaged in programs that address this issue, and I look forward to
learning  more  about  ways  in  which  informal  STEM  environments

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

7

may be uniquely positioned to make STEM learning accessible and
exciting to a broader demographic.

I believe that if we hope to promote a more scientifically literate
citizenry  and  to  attract  and  educate  the  Nation’s  future  scientists
and  engineers,  we  cannot  depend  upon  schools  alone.  Instead,  we
should be tapping all our resources and looking at the potential for
learning that happens every day, outside the classroom door.

I want to thank all of the witnesses for taking the time to appear
before the Committee this morning and I look forward to your testi-
mony.

[The prepared statement of Chair Lipinski follows:]
PREPARED STATEMENT OF CHAIR DANIEL LIPINSKI

Good morning and welcome to this Research and Science Education Subcommittee
hearing  on  informal  Science,  technology,  engineering,  and  math  (or  STEM)  edu-
cation.

While  we  often  examine  and  discuss  ways  to  improve  STEM  education  in  the
classroom, we rarely look at the many opportunities for learning elsewhere. A great
deal  of  learning  happens  throughout  our  lives  in  everyday  activities—from  having
a  conversation  at  the  family  dinner  table  or  watching  a  show  on  television,  to  at-
tending  a  summer  camp  at  a  zoo  or  taking  a  trip  to  a  museum.  Not  just  students
but the general public are exposed to opportunities for science learning through in-
formal education every day. Today we will explore the ways in which informal learn-
ing  institutions  are  uniquely  positioned  to  attract  and  educate  the  public  about
STEM  issues,  as  well  as  the  role  of  informal  institutions  in  contributing  to  and  en-
hancing formal classroom learning.

Today, we will hear from witnesses who are engaged in informal STEM education
in a range of settings and capacities. I look forward to hearing the witnesses provide
insights regarding the benefits and challenges of informal STEM education and the
state  of  research  on  how  students  learn  STEM  in  informal  settings,  as  well  as  rec-
ommendations for moving forward.

The Science and Technology Committee, and our subcommittee in particular, has
made  STEM  education  a  top  priority.  We  have  heard  time  and  again  that  we  need
more  STEM  educated  graduates  and  teachers  if  we  want  to  compete  in  the  global
economy  of  the  21st  century.  A  2005  National  Academies  report,  Rising  Above  the
Gathering  Storm,  recommended  that  the  Nation  increase  its  talent  pool  by  vastly
improving  K–12  science  and  mathematics  education.  For  that  reason,  in  the  last
Congress  the  Committee  developed  and  the  President  signed  into  law  the  America
COMPETES  Act,  which  included  many  provisions  specifically  aimed  at  improving
STEM education in our country.

Educating more highly qualified STEM teachers and enhancing the teaching skills
and  content  knowledge  of  existing  STEM  teachers  was  the  top  recommendation  of
the  Gathering  Storm  report,  which  became  the  basis  for  the  teacher  education  and
professional  development  provisions  in  the  COMPETES  Act.  I  hope  to  hear  today
from  our  witnesses  about  the  ways  in  which  informal  education  institutions,  such
as museums, zoos, and educational media providers, can and do offer teacher train-
ing and professional development tools for our nation’s STEM teachers.

I am also interested in the role of informal education in producing a more diverse
pool  of  scientists  and  engineers  through  programs  and  policies  that  attract  individ-
uals  from  groups  under-represented  in  STEM  fields.  I  know  some  of  our  witnesses
have been engaged in programs that address this issue, and I look forward to learn-
ing more about ways in which informal STEM environments may be uniquely posi-
tioned  to  make  STEM  learning  accessible  and  exciting  to  a  broader  demographic.
I  believe  that  if  we  hope  to  promote  a  more  scientifically  literate  citizenry,  and
to  attract  and  educate  the  Nation’s  future  scientists  and  engineers,  we  cannot  de-
pend  upon  schools  alone.  Instead,  we  should  be  tapping  all  our  resources  and  look-
ing at the potential for learning that happens every day outside the classroom door.
I  want  to  thank  all  of  the  witnesses  for  taking  the  time  to  appear  before  the  Com-
mittee this morning and I look forward to your testimony.

Chair  LIPINSKI.  The  Chair  now  recognizes  Mr.  Ehlers  for  an

opening statement.

Mr.  EHLERS.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chair,  and  I  am  sure  we  will  have
a  lot  of  good  opportunities  to  work  together,  and  we  share  a  great

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

8

number  of  common  interests,  not  just  including  science  but  also
many  aspects  of  teaching  science.  So  we  are  going  to  have  a  good
year here.

I am intrigued about this hearing on informal science education.
I  never  knew  the  term,  even  though  that  is  how  I  learned  science
for  my  first  12  years  of  school.  As  a  child,  I  was  both  unfortunate
and  fortunate.  I  was  unfortunate  to  have  a  serious  enough  disease
I couldn’t go to school but fortunate enough that I was well enough
to study at home where actually I learned more than I would have
at  school.  Don’t  tell  that  to  my  former  teachers.  But  I  would  get
the  assignments  every  week,  and  I  would  plough  through  them.
But  no  experiments  in  science.  My  sister,  fortunately,  was  in  a
high  school  where  they  gave—she  was  taking  a  science  class,  I
think  chemistry,  where  they  gave  free  copies  of  Popular  Science,
and  she  brought  those  home  and  I  devoured  those.  And  I  still  re-
member  one  of  my  first  striking  home  experiments  which  was  in-
formal  science  education.  I  lit  a  candle,  took  some  bicarbonate  of
soda,  mixed  it  in  a  glass,  formed  a  little  trough  of  paper,  and  held
it  near  the  candle  and  proceeded  to  pour.  Nothing  that  you  could
see, and the carbon dioxide went down the trough and extinguished
the candle. That was just amazing to me, that something I couldn’t
see,  touch,  feel,  smell,  could  actually  exist,  could  move,  and  could
put  out  a  fire.  That  is  the  sort  of  thing  that  you  never  forget,  par-
ticularly  if  you  develop  them  yourself,  and  I  did  the  same  thing
with some of my high school work.

The  informal  science  education  takes  place  almost  everywhere
but  in  the  classroom,  and  I  was  fortunate  that  I  had  parents  who
could  answer  my  questions  quite  often  or  would  help  me  find  the
answer,  to  be  a  more  proper  way  of  saying  it.  But  the  question  is,
how  do  we  measure  the  results  of  it?  How  do  we  know  whether  it
is  good  informal  education  or  not?  How  does  it  fit  into  the  whole
of educating the child about the wonders of science? And above all,
how does it get them interested in science?

Informal science education then can take place almost anywhere
but in the classroom. A recent report from the National Academies
on  this  topic  highlights  the  difficulty  in  assessing  the  impacts  of
non-classroom  learning  on  science  knowledge,  attitudes,  and  ac-
tions. And maybe you have to wait 40 years to see whether the stu-
dents  learn  enough  science  to  get  a  Ph.D.  in  physics  and  become
a Member of Congress. I don’t know if I am one of the data points
on their charts or not. Clearly, formalized science, technology, engi-
neering,  and  math,  which  we  call  STEM  education  can  only  go  so
far.  Informal  experiences  shape  how  people  view  science  and  can
help people get comfortable enough with science to spend their free
time in places like parks, museums, and after-school activities. And
also,  a  real  advantage  of  the  informal  education  is  getting  kids
really  excited  about  it  because  they  are  part  of  the  discovery  proc-
ess  which  they  often  are  not  in  a  traditional  classroom.  Informal
science  education  has  a  unique  platform  to  engage  the  public  in
science  in  ways  that  show  it  is  not  only  fun  but  also  fundamental
to  the  competitiveness  of  our  country.  These  opportunities  also
reach  many  students  and  families  who  may  not  have  received  a
high-quality STEM education through traditional classroom experi-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

9

ences  or  who  may  have  been  turned  off  to  science  by  earlier  nega-
tive experiences.

One  challenge  faced  by  the  informal  science  education  commu-
nity,  and  policy-makers,  is  that  inherently  minimally-structured
environments  do  not  lend  themselves  to  evaluation.  I  am  particu-
larly  interested  in  how  the  federal  agencies  can  support  the  nec-
essary  research  and  provide  resources  to  informal  practitioners
about how to develop and manage successful programs.

I  look  forward  to  hearing  from  our  witnesses  today.  I  certainly
appreciate your attendance here and look forward to this being an-
other informal learning experience. Thank you very much.

[The prepared statement of Mr. Ehlers follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE VERNON J. EHLERS

Today’s  hearing  is  an  opportunity  to  learn  about  the  blossoming  field  of  informal

science education and research.

Informal  science  education  takes  place  almost  everywhere  but  in  the  classroom.
The recent report from the National Academies on this topic highlights the difficulty
in  assessing  the  impacts  of  non-classroom  learning  on  science  knowledge,  attitudes
and  actions.  Clearly,  formalized  science,  technology,  engineering  and  math  (STEM)
education  can  only  go  so  far.  Informal  experiences  shape  how  people  view  science
and can help people get comfortable enough with science to want to spend their free
time  in  places  like  parks,  museums,  and  after-school  activities.  Informal  science
education  has  a  unique  platform  to  engage  the  public  in  science  in  ways  that  show
it is not only fun, but also fundamental to the competitiveness of our country. These
opportunities  also  reach  many  students  and  families  who  may  not  have  received  a
high-quality  STEM  education  through  traditional  classroom  experiences  or  who
have been turned off to science by earlier negative experiences.

One  challenge  faced  by  the  informal  science  education  community—and  policy-
makers—is  that  inherently  minimally-structured  environments  do  not  lend  them-
selves  to  evaluation.  I  am  particularly  interested  in  how  the  federal  agencies  can
support  the  necessary  research  and  provide  resources  to  informal  practitioners
about how to develop and manage successful programs.

I  look  forward  to  hearing  from  our  witnesses  today.  Thank  you  for  your  attend-

ance.

Chair  LIPINSKI.  If  there  are  Members  who  wish  to  submit  addi-
tional  opening  statements,  your  statements  will  be  added  to  the
record at this point.

[The prepared statement of Mr. Carnahan follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE RUSS CARNAHAN

Mr. Chairman, thank you for hosting this hearing to examine the role of informal

environments in STEM education.

As we have all mentioned time and again, the Rising Above the Gathering Storm
report provided us with both the knowledge that our nation’s standing as the global
leader  in  the  STEM  field  is  at  risk  as  well  as  solid  tools  for  policy-makers  to  coun-
teract this worrisome trend. We must address this issue with all available resources,
both formal and informal.

The  National  Academies  Committee  report  showed  that  there  is  ample  evidence
to  suggest  that  science  learning  takes  place  throughout  the  life  span  and  across
venues in non-school settings. In my home district of St. Louis, the Missouri Botan-
ical  Garden  offers  a  great  example  of  one  such  informal  science  learning  environ-
ment. In their Power of Plants Contest, students pick a plant that does great things
for people and tell its story through a two- or three-dimensional work of art.

Programs  like  this  provide  opportunities  to  reach  into  schools  or  formal  environ-
ments  and  allow  students  to  connect  in  an  informal  basis.  These  informal  experi-
ences  can  provide  opportunities  to  form  personal  connections  which  can  be  much
stronger  compared  to  those  in  a  formal  classroom  setting.  It  is  these  experiences
that  can  lead  to  self-directed  learning  which  leave  a  strong  and  lasting  impression
on students.

I am pleased that today’s hearing again focuses on the important task of ensuring
that our STEM programs are working not only in the classroom, but beyond as well.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

To all the witnesses before us today—thank you for taking time out of your busy

schedules to appear before us today. I look forward to hearing your testimony.

10

Chair LIPINSKI. I would like to also welcome Mr. Griffith here as

a freshman. It is good to have you here on this subcommittee.

Mr. GRIFFITH. Thank you, Mr. Chair.
Chair  LIPINSKI.  I  look  forward  to  what  you  add  to  our  sub-
committee,  and  I  just  want  everyone  to  know  that  these  are  very
important issues that we are working on here in the Subcommittee,
very  important  for  the  future  of  our  country.  And  we  are  open  to
any  ideas  that  anyone  has  on  this  subcommittee  about  what  we
might  want  to  talk  about,  what  we  might  want  to  work  on  during
this Congress.

At  this  time  I  want  to  introduce  our  witnesses.  We  will  start
with  Dr.  Joan  Ferrini-Mundy,  the  Director  of  the  Division  of  Re-
search  on  Learning  in  Formal  and  Informal  Settings  in  the  Edu-
cation  and  Human  Resources  Directorate,  of  the  National  Science
Foundation.  Dr.  Phillip  Bell  is  the  Co-Chair  of  the  National  Acad-
emies  report,  ‘‘Learning  Science  in  Informal  Environments:  People,
Places,  and  Pursuits’’  and  a  professor  at  the  College  of  Education
at the University of Washington, Seattle. Ms. Andrea Ingram is the
Vice President of Education and Guest Experiences at the Museum
of Science and Industry, Chicago. And later on I may have the op-
portunity  to  regale  everyone  with  my  memories  of  being  a  kid  and
going  to  the  museum.  Mr.  Robert  Lippincott  is  the  Senior  Vice
President  for  Education  at  The  Public  Broadcasting  Service.  I  am
not  sure  I  am  going  to  talk  about  watching  the  TV  when  I  was  a
kid,  but  I  certainly  watched  a  lot  of  PBS.  Finally,  I  am  pleased  to
introduce  Dr.  Alejandro  Grajal  from  my  district,  just  west  of  Chi-
cago.  He  is  the  Senior  Vice  President  of  Conservation,  Education,
and Training at the Chicago Zoological Society which is the organi-
zation that operates the Brookfield Zoo.

Now,  as  our  witnesses  should  know,  spoken  testimony  is  limited
to  five  minutes  each,  after  which  the  Members  of  the  Committee
will  have  five  minutes  each  to  ask  questions.  And  we  will  have
time, I am sure certainly during the questions, if there is anything
that  you  want  to  add  onto  your  five  minutes.  And  you  know,  time
permitting, we may have time for a little bit of wrap-up at the end.
So if you could limit yourselves to the five minutes in any opening
statements.

So we will start with Dr. Ferrini-Mundy.

STATEMENT  OF  DR.  JOAN  FERRINI-MUNDY,  DIRECTOR,  DIVI-
SION  OF  RESEARCH  ON  LEARNING  IN  FORMAL  AND  INFOR-
MAL  SETTINGS,  DIRECTORATE  FOR  EDUCATION  AND
HUMAN RESOURCES, NATIONAL SCIENCE FOUNDATION
Dr.  FERRINI-MUNDY.  Chairman  Lipinski,  Ranking  Member
Ehlers,  and  distinguished  members  of  the  Subcommittee,  I  am
Joan Ferrini-Mundy, Director of the Division of Research on Learn-
ing in Formal and Informal Settings at the National Science Foun-
dation  in  the  Directorate  for  Education  and  Human  Resources.
Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  testify  about  informal  education
in  science,  technology,  engineering  and  mathematics,  the  STEM
disciplines.  Mr.  Chairman,  I  ask  that  my  written  statements  be

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

11

made  a  part  of  the  record,  and  I  would  like  to  summarize  my  re-
marks.

Today  I  would  like  to  address  three  main  areas:  the  level  and
scope of NSF-funded research and development in informal science
education;  emerging  research  directions  and  challenges  in  assess-
ment;  and  the  significance  of  informal  learning  environments  for
broadening participation in STEM disciplines.

Our signature catalyst program for investment in this area is the
Informal  Science  Education  (ISE)  program,  whose  primary  goals
are to promote lifelong learning of science, technology, engineering,
and mathematics by the public and to advance the knowledge base
and human capacity for improving informal STEM education.

There  currently  are  about  200  funded  projects  in  the  ISE  port-
folio. Roughly 35 percent of the awards are to institutions of higher
education, and the remaining 65 percent are disbursed among mu-
seums, science centers, youth and community programs, and radio,
television, multi-media and web producers. The average ISE budget
over  the  past  five  years  has  been  about  $62.9  million.  As  hosts  of
new scientific findings and STEM issues of importance to the pub-
lic  emerge  daily,  it  is  essential  to  have  a  robust  body  of  research
and  evaluation  that  maximizes  the  potential  impact  of  our  invest-
ments in informal science education.

We need to know much more about how to motivate and interest
learners in STEM topics, about what science topics lend themselves
best  to  learning  in  informal  settings,  about  how  learning  in  infor-
mal settings can broaden participation in STEM careers, and about
how  to  engage  citizens  with  the  science  that  affects  public  policy
as well as their daily lives.

The  recent  study,  Learning  Science  in  Informal  Environments,
the  report  of  the  National  Research  Council  of  the  National  Acad-
emies,  was  funded  by  the  ISE  program.  It  provides  a  synthesis  of
the  research  literature  on  learning  in  informal  environments,  and
the  report  confirms  that  everyday  experiences  can  support  science
learning for virtually all people.

Informal  learning  environments  are  voluntary  learning  settings.
The  learner  can  walk  away  from  the  exhibit,  change  the  television
channel,  or  click  to  a  new  website.  Thus,  in  addition  to  measuring
what  is  being  learned  about  science  in  such  settings  and  what
science is being learned, it is important to determine what will en-
gage  the  learners  and  hold  their  attention,  and  that  is  a  crucial
topic for researchers.

There  are  major  challenges  in  this  research  domain.  What  out-
comes  should  be  expected  in  informal  learning  environments  and
what  assessments  are  best  for  measuring  them?  Museum-goers
don’t  expect  to  take  a  formal  test  after  a  casual  visit.  The  experi-
ences  are  often  brief  and  fragmented,  so  it  may  not  be  reasonable
to expect depth of content learning from a single exposure.

Researchers  are  studying  such  outcomes  as  attitude,  awareness,
interest, and behavior. Their methods include self-report, recording
visitors’  conversations,  interviews,  and  the  timing  and  tracking
studies  of  behaviors.  There  is  a  continued  need  for  valid  and  reli-
able instruments and measures to assess the appropriate outcomes
of  learning  in  informal  settings.  NSF-funded  researchers  are  ad-
dressing these challenges through the ISE program and others.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

12

I  find  that  there  is  enthusiasm  across  NSF  about  sharing  excit-
ing  science  with  diverse  audiences  through  informal  learning  op-
portunities.  We  recognize  the  great  potential  of  these  venues  for
engaging youth who may not thrive in the formal education system.
Some  ISE  projects  focus  specifically  on  learners  from  groups  tradi-
tionally under-represented in STEM, and most projects include out-
reach  to  these  groups.  The  focus  on  broadening  participation  ex-
tends  well  beyond  EHR.  In  the  Directorate  for  Geosciences,  for  ex-
ample,  there  is  a  project  that  prepares  teachers  in  urban  settings
to  integrate  the  resources  of  their  city  into  their  STEM  teaching.
In the Directorate for Computer and Information Science and Engi-
neering,  a  project  with  the  Boys  and  Girls  Clubs  of  America  uses
culturally  responsive  approaches  to  attract  and  retain  high  school
students in computer science.

The  NSF  has  been  able  to  build  a  diverse  and  dynamic  portfolio
of research, development, and model building to promote the learn-
ing of all people at all ages through informal science education en-
vironments.  The  portfolio  is  increasingly  robust  in  the  area  of  re-
search  about  learning  in  informal  settings.  Through  programs  in
the  Division  of  Research  on  Learning,  we  plan  to  continue  encour-
aging  and  supporting  scientific  discovery  in  informal  science  edu-
cation.

I  would  like  to  thank  the  Subcommittee  for  this  opportunity  to
share with you information about investments made by the NSF in
this area. Mr. Chair, this concludes my remarks. I would be happy
to answer any questions.

The prepared statement of Dr. Ferrini-Mundy follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF JOAN FERRINI-MUNDY

Chairman  Lipinski,  Ranking  Member  Ehlers,  and  distinguished  Members  of  the
Subcommittee,  I  am  Joan  Ferrini-Mundy,  Director  for  the  Division  of  Research  on
Learning in Formal and Informal Settings within the Directorate for Education and
Human Resources at the National Science Foundation (NSF). Thank you for the op-
portunity to testify about informal education in science, technology, engineering and
mathematics—what  we  at  the  NSF  call  the  STEM  disciplines.  In  an  era  where  we
are  all  lifelong  learners,  the  boundaries  between  formal  settings  for  learning—such
as  schools  and  universities—and  informal  learning  settings—such  as  museums,
cyberspace, and the media—are increasingly blurred and porous. Against this back-
drop,  the  NSF  continues  to  provide  leadership  and  scholarship  for  the  ongoing
transformation  of  STEM  learning  opportunities,  for  learners  of  all  ages,  back-
grounds, cultures, and ethnicities, and in all settings.

Today I would like to address three main areas: the level and scope of NSF-fund-
ed  research  and  development  in  informal  science  education;  emerging  research  di-
rections and challenges, including a focus on assessment; and the significance of in-
formal learning environments in broadening participation in STEM.

Research  on  STEM  learning  in  informal  settings  is  not  a  new  enterprise  at  NSF.
The NSF’s recognition of the importance of research about the STEM lifelong learn-
ing  opportunities  through  out-of-school  settings  dates  back  five  decades,  to  the  for-
mation  of  the  Public  Understanding  of  Science  program  in  1959  and  the  funding  of
studies  of  public  knowledge  of  science.  This  emphasis  has  continued,  most  recently
in  the  production  of  Learning  Science  in  Informal  Environments  (2009),  a  report  of
the  National  Research  Council  of  the  National  Academies.1 This  effort,  funded  by
the NSF’s Informal Science Education program, provides a synthesis of the research
literature  on  learning  in  informal  environments.  It  is  generally  acknowledged  that
the  percentage  of  time  that  a  person  spends  in  formal  education  over  a  lifespan  is

1 National  Research  Council  (2009).  Learning  Science  in  Informal  Environments:  People,
Places,  and  Pursuits.  Committee  on  Learning  Science  in  Informal  Environments.  Philip  Bell,
Bruce  Lewenstein,  Andrew  W.  Shouse,  and  Michael  A.  Feder,  editors.  Board  on  Science  Edu-
cation,  Center  for  Education,  Division  of  Behavioral  and  Social  Sciences  and  Education.  Wash-
ington, DC: The National Academies Press.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

13

relatively  small  compared  to  the  time  available  for  learning  outside  of  school.  And,
the  Learning  Science  in  Informal  Environments  report  confirms  on  the  basis  of  re-
search  that:  ‘‘Everyday  experiences  can  support  science  learning  for  virtually  all
people.’’ (p. ES–2).

NSF-Funded Research and Development in Informal Science Education

Our  signature  catalyst  for  investment  in  this  area  is  the  Informal  Science  Edu-
cation  (ISE)  program,  which  received  its  first  appropriation  in  FY  1984.  This  was
in  response  to  recommendations  that  the  Federal  Government  provide  support  for
a  wide  range  of  informal  learning  experiences  made  in  the  1983  report  of  the  Na-
tional  Science  Board  Commission  on  Precollege  Education  in  Mathematics,  Science,
and  Technology.2 The  report  noted:  ‘‘A  great  deal  of  education  takes  place  outside
the  classroom.  The  most  fortunate  students  receive  experiences  in  museums,  clubs,
and  independent  activities 
. . ..  The  child  who  has  regularly  visited  zoos,
planetaria,  and  science  museums,  hiked  along  nature  trails  and  built  model  air-
planes  and  telescopes  is  infinitely  better  prepared  for,  and  more  receptive  to,  the
mathematics and science of the classroom.’’

The  ISE  program’s  primary  goal  is  to  promote  lifelong  learning  of  science,  tech-
nology,  engineering,  and  mathematics  by  the  public  and  to  advance  the  knowledge
base,  practice,  human  capacity  and  communities  of  professionals  engaged  in  infor-
mal STEM education. Indeed, the infrastructure for free-choice learning provided by
NSF’s  ISE  program  has  been  noted  as  being  important  in  the  development  of  the
‘‘informal  science  education’’  field.3 Over  the  years,  it  has  established  television,
radio,  and  giant-screen  film  as  media  for  STEM  education;  funded  major  traveling
and  permanent  exhibitions;  catalyzed  citizen  science  projects  enabling  the  public  to
participate  in  actual  research;  and  expanded  community  and  youth  programming,
including  after-school  science.  At  the  same  time,  it  has  supported  ongoing
professionalization and increased capacity of the field, as well as knowledge building
through  required  evaluation,  and  research  about  learning  in  informal  settings.
Awardees over the past decade have included museums (28.2 percent), academic in-
stitutions (24.1 percent), media producers and television stations (20.8 percent), and
many other types of developers and providers of informal science education. The in-
volvement of academic institutions is increasing; in the current portfolio, roughly 35
percent of the awards are to institutions of higher education.

Today, this field is a diverse, creative, and interdisciplinary community of institu-
tions,  such  as  science  centers,  zoos,  aquariums,  and  museums  of  many  types,  and
professionals,  including  exhibit  designers,  film  and  television  producers,  media  ex-
perts,  after-school  program  developers,  information  technologists,  scientists,  and
learning researchers. They share a passion and expertise for providing STEM learn-
ing opportunities to all people of all ages. To harness the talent and energy of these
groups,  the  ISE  program  has  dual  commitments:  building  new  knowledge  about
STEM  learning  in  informal  environments  through  research  and  development  of
models,  and  reaching  large  numbers  of  children,  youth,  and  adults  with  STEM
learning and engagement opportunities. Keeping these dual commitments in appro-
priate balance and synergy is an important challenge in the management of the pro-
gram.

The budget in the ISE program for the past five years has been as follows (in mil-

lions):

There  currently  are  about  200  funded  projects  in  the  ISE  portfolio,  ranging  from
design  and  implementation  of  innovative  museum  exhibits,  to  the  production  of
large-format  films  and  television  and  radio  series,  to  research  studies  to  examine
how informal learning opportunities promote science learning, to ‘‘citizen-science’’ ef-
forts,  to  public  engagement  in  science  in  the  spirit  of  science  cafe´s,  to  the  develop-
ment  of  virtual  learning  communities  and  serious  games.  In  the  past  two  years,
ISE-funded projects have won major awards, including Emmys, the Peabody Award,
the Webby, and the American Association of Museums Award of Excellence in Exhi-

2 National  Science  Board  Commission  on  Precollege  Education  in  Mathematics,  Science  and
Technology, Educating Americans for the 21st Century (Washington, DC: National Science Foun-
dation, 1983, CPCE–NSF–04).

3 Lewenstein,  B.  (2001).  Who  produces  science  information  for  the  public?  In  John  H.  Falk

(Ed.), Free-choice Science Education. New York: Teachers College Press.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

14

bition,  as  well  as  recognitions  such  as  premiering  at  the  Sundance  Film  Festival.
This  is  a  highly  competitive  program  with  a  funding  success  rate  of  about  15  per-
cent.

Based on the questions I received from the Subcommittee and the focus of the re-
cent  Learning  Science  in  Informal  Environments,  my  emphasis  in  this  testimony  is
on research related to informal learning. The Informal Science Education (ISE) pro-
gram, NSF’s primary source of investment in this area, funds both research and de-
velopment.

The ISE program is part of a broader effort at NSF to understand STEM learning
and how to best engage people of all ages in it. The Division of Research on Learn-
ing in Formal and Informal Settings has a growing portfolio of funded research that
is building knowledge about the processes of STEM learning and that examines the
impacts  of  learning  interventions  such  as  school  curricula  or  museum  exhibits,  and
the  reasons  for  those  impacts.  DRL-funded  research  is  ongoing  at  various  points  in
a cycle of research and development.

Projects  range  from  those  that  generate  hypotheses  and  describe  STEM  learning
phenomena  and  constructs,  to  those  that  design  highly  innovative  and  potentially
powerful  learning  interventions  built  on  basic  learning  research,  to  those  that  test,
implement, and refine these interventions and learning materials in specialized set-
tings, to those that operate larger scale implementation and effectiveness studies for
the  most  promising  interventions,  to—finally—synthesis  and  theory-building  that
informs  continued  work  in  the  cycle.  DRL  and  its  predecessor  divisions  and  units
have  provided  funding  for  research  on  STEM  learning  and  education  since  the
1950s.

Across the Directorate for Education and Human Resources and NSF more broad-
ly, there are several programs that also invest in efforts to engage learners in STEM
outside  of  school  settings,  as  part  of  the  NSF  commitment  to  the  integration  of  re-
search  and  education.  For  instance,  in  the  Integrative  Graduate  Education  and  Re-
search  Traineeship  Program  (IGERT),  scientists  are  engaged  in  communicating
their work to public audiences.

Emerging Research Directions and Challenges

As  hosts  of  new  scientific  findings  and  STEM  issues  of  national  interest  to  the
public emerge daily, and in today’s rapidly changing context for communication and
information-sharing, it is essential to have a robust body of research and evaluation
that  maximizes  the  potential  impact  of  investments  in  informal  science  education.
We need to know much more about how to motivate and interest learners in STEM
topics.  We  need  to  understand  what  areas  of  science  lend  themselves  best  to  learn-
ing  in  informal  settings.  We  need  to  study  how  learning  in  informal  settings  can
be most powerful as an impetus for broadening participation in STEM careers. And,
we  need  to  conduct  research  about  the  public’s  attitudes,  interests,  and  knowledge
as a basis for their informed engagement with the science that affects public policy

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

15

as  well  as  their  daily  lives.4 The  National  Science  Board’s  Science  and  Engineering
Indicators  volumes  report  on  the  levels  of  public  attitudes  and  understanding  of
science and technology, recognizing that this is one barometer of the Nation’s readi-
ness to engage in solutions to the scientific problems of the day and for its citizenry
to have the scientific literacy necessary to sustain their own personal science-related
decision-making.  Research  in  all  of  these  areas,  and  others,  is  essential  to  ongoing
strategic investments in the models and resources that are produced for learning in
informal settings.

The  Learning  Science  in  Informal  Environments  report  makes  recommendations
about  needed  research  on:  tools  and  practices  that  contribute  to  learning,  learning
strands,  cumulative  effects,  and  learning  by  groups,  organizations,  and  commu-
nities. Through such syntheses, together with published research studies, web data-
bases  of  evaluation  reports,  professional  meetings  and  NSF-sponsored  principal  in-
vestigator  meetings,  the  growing  body  of  research  about  informal  learning  is  com-
municated  to  practitioners  to  help  inform  their  work.  This  research  is  also  shared
internally through seminars and workshops to help NSF staff remain abreast of de-
velopments in the field.

As the informal science education field matures, part of the needed capacity-build-
ing is to expand expertise and interest in research and evaluation, and to build the
research  base.  NSF’s  investments  in  this  area  of  capacity-building  and  knowledge-
building are increasing. One strategy in this area was the establishment of the Cen-
ter for Advancement of Informal Science Education (CAISE), a resource center fund-
ed  by  the  ISE  program.  In  a  review  of  the  548  ISE  projects  funded  over  the  period
1998  through  2008,  CAISE  found  that  60  projects  had  research  about  informal
learning as a primary objective, and 37 as a secondary objective. These 97 research-
oriented projects represent an investment over ten years of about $128 M. This indi-
cates  that  approximately  15  percent  of  the  overall  ISE  investment  over  this  period,
which  includes  development  and  implementation  of  a  wide  range  of  informal  learn-
ing  resources,  is  directed  toward  improving  understanding  of  the  use  and  impacts
of such resources through research.

In  addition  to  the  ISE  program,  NSF’s  Research  and  Evaluation  on  Education  in
Science  and  Engineering  (REESE)  and  Innovative  Technology  Experiences  for  Stu-
dents and Teachers (ITEST) programs support research on learning in informal en-
vironments. For example, in its most recent solicitation the ITEST program calls for
research to address such questions as: ‘‘What does it take to effectively interest and
prepare  students  to  participate  in  the  science,  technology,  engineering,  and  mathe-
matics (STEM) workforce of the future? What are the knowledge, skills, and disposi-
tions that students need in order to participate productively in the changing STEM
workforce  and  be  innovators,  particularly  in  STEM-related  networked  computing
and  information  and  communication  technology  (ICT)  areas?  How  do  they  acquire
them?  How  can  the  Nation’s  burgeoning  cyberinfrastructure  be  harnessed  as  a  tool
for STEM learning in classrooms and informal learning environments? How can we
assess  and  predict  inclination  to  participate  in  the  STEM  fields  and  how  can  we
measure and study the impact of various models to encourage that participation?’’ 5
The  Center  for  Informal  Learning  and  Schools,  funded  by  NSF’s  Centers  for
Learning  and  Teaching  Program  in  2002,  has  as  its  primary  objective  to  create  a
program  of  research,  scholarship,  and  leadership  in  the  arena  of  informal  learning
and  the  relationship  of  informal  science  institutions  and  schools.  This  partnership
among the Exploratorium, King’s College London, and the University of California–
Santa  Cruz,  is  undertaking  research  about  such  topics  as  explanation  and  commu-
nication, structures that support informal learning, and the design of learning envi-
ronments.  Within  the  REESE  portfolio,  there  are  11  projects  currently  underway,
representing a total investment of about $7M, that are specifically examining issues
relevant to informal learning. These range from a project that is studying how fun-
damental  biological  concepts  are  understood  in  different  learning  contexts  and  by
different cultural groups (Bardeen, Fermilab), to a study of indigenous-heritage com-
munities’  ways  of  learning  about  scientific  ideas  (Rogoff,  University  of  California–
Santa Cruz), to a study of how to improve connections between formal and informal
learning  settings  (Schwartz  at  Stanford  University,  and  Biswas  at  Vanderbilt  Uni-
versity.)

Informal  learning  environments  are  voluntary  learning  settings;  the  learner  can
walk away from the exhibit, change the television channel, or click to a new website.
Thus  in  addition  to  measuring  what  is  actually  being  learned  in  such  settings,  the
matter  of  determining  what  will  engage  learners  and  hold  their  attention  is  a  cru-

4 See Office of Science and Technology and the Wellcome Trust (2000). Science and the Public:

A Review of Science Communication and Public Attitudes to Science in Britain. (p. 4)

5 See http://www.nsf.gov/funding/pgm¥summ.jsp?pims¥id=5467

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

16

cial  topic  for  researchers  in  this  domain.  This  includes  aspects  such  as  under-
standing  which  scientific  topics  will  engage  learners,  what  kinds  of  features  of  an
exhibit  or  program  will  hold  attention,  and  what  sorts  of  activities  will  encourage
continued  participation.  The  ISE  program  has  funded  efforts  in  all  of  these  areas,
although  this  clearly  needs  to  be  seen  as  an  emerging,  interdisciplinary  area  of  re-
search.  Cognitive  scientists  traditionally  have  been  more  interested  in  learning  as
it occurs in school settings, although we are noticing increased proposal pressure in
ISE-relevant research over recent years.

The  professional  wisdom  and  craft  knowledge  resident  in  the  informal  science
education  community,  when  tested  and  strengthened  through  research  and  evalua-
tion, stands to inform some of today’s most pressing educational challenges. In par-
ticular, because of the porous boundaries between the formal and informal learning
communities, a focus on the connections between informal and formal learning envi-
ronments  is  important.  For  example,  the  need  to  provide  the  Nation’s  K–12  STEM
teachers  with  mechanisms  for  keeping  their  science  knowledge  current  in  a  cyber
era  can  be  informed  by  what  is  already  known  from  the  informal  science  learning
community’s  accumulated  wisdom  about  voluntary  learning.  By  their  very  nature,
informal learning organizations are positioned to be innovators in the type of hands-
on,  direct  contact  with  the  world  of  science  that  is  seen  by  many  as  crucial  in  stu-
dent  learning,  and  research  to  illuminate  such  learning  environments  stands  to  in-
form K–12 formal education.

There  are  major  challenges  in  this  research  domain,  as  well  as  some  promising
tools  and  resources.  Challenges  are  most  prevalent  in  determining  what  outcomes
should  be  expected  in  informal  learning  environments,  and  what  metrics  are  best
for  measuring  them.  There  are  theoretical  issues  of  ‘‘ecological  validity’’—museum-
goers  don’t  expect  to  take  a  formal  test  after  a  casual  visit.  Frank  Oppenheimer
once  said  ‘‘no-one  ever  flunks  a  museum.’’  And,  because  of  the  self-directed  nature
of  this  learning,  diverse  learners  (ranging  from  young  children  to  older  adults)  will
be interested in, and will learn, different things. The experiences are often brief and
fragmented,  and  so  it  may  not  be  reasonable  to  expect  depth  of  content  learning
from a single exposure, although they may be particularly memorable and stimulate
further  engagement.  In  dynamic,  open,  voluntary  learning  environments  it  is  hard
to  establish  control  groups  and  to  deal  adequately  with  human  subjects  issues.
Promising  approaches  to  addressing  these  challenges  include  interdisciplinary  ef-
forts  that  bring  together  informal  science  educators,  educational  researchers,  psy-
chologists, sociologists, and assessment experts; capacity building among evaluators
to understand both the constraints and affordances of evaluation in informal learn-
ing  settings;  strategic  use  of  common  instruments  when  efforts  have  overlapping
goals; and design of innovative instruments and approaches. This might involve, for
instance,  using  physiological  measures  to  track  learning-related  emotions,  or  build-
ing  stronger  theories  about  culturally  responsive  evaluation,  or  constructing  new
and  appropriate  outcome  goals  for  learning.  One  resource  that  has  been  well  re-
ceived  is  the  ISE-funded  Framework  for  Evaluating  Impacts  of  Informal  Science
Education Projects (NSF, 2008). This is a guide for ISE projects which includes such
material  as  ‘‘Tools,  Tips,  and  Common  Issues  in  Evaluation  Experimental  Design
Choices.’’  The  NSF,  through  the  Division  of  Research  on  Learning  in  Formal  and
Informal Settings, is committed to playing a leading role in advancing research and
development in the area of informal science education.

Informal Learning Environments in Broadening Participation in STEM

Building  a  STEM  workforce  that  draws  on  the  best  talents  of  all  in  the  society,
reaching  out  to  groups  that  have  been  under-represented  in  STEM,  and  promoting
a STEM-literate public all are central to NSF’s mission. NSF’s Strategic Plan, 2006–
2011, includes as a strategic goal ‘‘Cultivate a world-class, broadly inclusive science
and engineering workforce, and expand the scientific literacy of all citizens.’’ In par-
ticular, the plan notes: ‘‘NSF will improve STEM literacy by developing new strate-
gies  that  explicitly  encompass  both  formal  and  informal  education,  with  a  focus  on
strategies  that  have  an  impact  on  the  Nation’s  critical  need  for  a  citizenry  literate
in  science  and  technology,  a  skilled  workforce,  and  a  vibrant  research  community.’’
(p. 8).

A  number  of  ISE  projects  are  specifically  concerned  with  engaging  learners  from
groups  traditionally  under-represented  in  STEM.  For  example,  the  ‘‘Urban  Bird
Gardens:  Assessing  the  Interest  of  Latino  Communities  in  Citizen  Science’’  project
(Dickinson, Cornell University), and the ‘‘Native Science Field Centers’’ (Satchatello-
Sawyer,  Hopa  Mountain)  are  funded  with  ISE  support.  And  although  the  ISE  pro-
gram  is  the  Foundation’s  flagship  program  in  this  area,  there  are  a  number  of  ef-
forts  across  NSF  that  recognize  the  particular  potential  of  informal  learning  oppor-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

17

tunities as a resource for broadening participating in STEM fields and make invest-
ments to advance this potential.

I  have  already  mentioned  the  Innovative  Technology  Education  Experiences  for
Students  and  Teachers  (ITEST)  program,  which  provides  funding  for  research  and
development projects for K–12 students in out-of-school settings to encourage STEM
workforce  participation,  especially  by  students  from  groups  traditionally  under-rep-
resented in STEM. Also managed in the Division of Research on Learning in Formal
and  Informal  Settings  is  the  Communicating  Research  to  Public  Audiences  (CRPA)
program  With  CRPA,  researchers  funded  through  NSF’s  Research  and  Related  Ac-
tivities  directorates  can  receive  new  awards  to  help  them  communicate  their  sci-
entific results to the public. Other divisions in the Education and Human Resources
directorate  also  fund  projects  to  broaden  participation  in  science  using  informal
science  learning  materials  as  a  basis—notably  a  number  of  efforts  in  the  Division
of  Human  Resource  Development  that  work  to  engage  women,  people  with  disabil-
ities, and under-represented minorities in STEM learning. The ‘‘Adolescents’ Identi-
fication  with  Televised  Portrayals  of  Male  and  Female  Scientists’’  study  (Steinke,
Western  Michigan  University),  through  the  Gender  Studies  in  Education  Program,
is one such example.

I find that there is enthusiasm across NSF about informal learning opportunities
as means of sharing the exciting and motivating aspects of science with diverse au-
diences, and recognition of the great potential of these informal learning venues for
engaging  youth  who  may  not  thrive  in  the  formal  education  system.  For  example,
several studies of museum-based and after-school programs have shown evidence of
supporting statistically significant academic gains for youth, particularly when they
draw on local issues and the children’s prior interests.6

Across the Foundation there are efforts to broaden participation through informal
science  education.  The  NISE  Net  initiative,  a  collaborative  effort  across  seven  NSF
directorates,  is  building  public  awareness  and  engagement  about  nanoscale  science
and  engineering  at  more  than  100  sites  nationally.  Led  by  researchers  at  three
science  museums,  the  project’s  goals  include  helping  museum  visitors  understand
the  properties  of  new  materials,  along  with  the  possibilities  they  present  in  areas
such  as  medicine,  security,  and  energy,  as  well  as  their  potential  societal  implica-
tions.  In  another  example,  the  International  Polar  Year  provided  opportunities  for
cross-NSF collaborations, particularly between the Office of Polar Programs and the
ISE  program,  for  major  investments  in  innovative  and  exciting  informal  STEM
learning. Among them was PolarPalooza, bringing polar scientists and their gear to
sites around the country, as well as films, websites and science blogs bringing polar
science  to  Americans  of  all  ages  and  from  all  communities.  In  the  Directorate  for
Geosciences, the ‘‘Science and the City: Fusion of Formal and Informal Learning Ex-
periences  into  an  Innovative  Geoscience  MA–Teacher  Program’’  prepares  program
teacher  graduates  to  integrate  the  resources  of  their  city  into  their  teaching.  And,
the project ‘‘Incorporating Cultural Tools for Math and Computing Concepts into the
Boys  and  Girls  Clubs  of  America,’’  funded  through  the  Broadening  Participation  in
Computing Program in the Directorate for Computer Information Science and Engi-
neering, uses culturally responsive approaches to attract and retain high school stu-
dents to computer science.

In  summary,  the  NSF  has  been  able  to  build  a  diverse  and  dynamic  portfolio  of
research,  development  and  model-building  to  promote  the  learning  of  all  people,  at
all ages, through a range of informal science environments, and including the cyber
world.  This  portfolio  is  increasingly  robust  in  the  area  of  research  about  learning
in informal settings and the knowledge base that is so essential in this area is grow-
ing  in  significant  and  useful  ways.  In  closing,  I  want  to  thank  the  Subcommittee
for this opportunity to share with you this information about the investments made
by  NSF  in  research  and  development  to  advance  and  foster  increased  public  sci-
entific  literacy  and  development  of  the  STEM  workforce  through  informal  science
education.

Mr. Chairman, this concludes my remarks. I would be happy to answer any ques-

tions.

BIOGRAPHY FOR JOAN FERRINI-MUNDY

Dr.  Joan  Ferrini-Mundy  is  the  Director  of  the  National  Science  Foundation’s
(NSF) Division of Research on Learning in Formal and Informal Settings (DRL), in
the  Directorate  for  Education  and  Human  Resources  (EHR).  DRL  programs  invest

6 See  Chapter  7,  Diversity  and  Equity,  in  Learning  Science  in  Informal  Environments,  NRC,

2009.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

18

in  research  and  development  efforts  to  support  the  learning  of  science,  technology,
engineering and mathematics at all levels and in all settings. She has recently been
appointed  Executive  Officer  (Acting)  of  the  Directorate  for  Education  and  Human
Resources. She serves as an NSF representative on the Education Subcommittee of
the National Science and Technology Council, and represents EHR on NSF’s Facili-
tating Transformative and Interdisciplinary Research Working Group. While at NSF
Dr.  Ferrini-Mundy  holds  a  faculty  position  at  Michigan  State  University  where  she
is  a  University  Distinguished  Professor  in  Mathematics  Education  and  Assistant
Vice  President  for  STEM  Education  and  Policy.  Her  research  interests  include  cal-
culus  teaching  and  learning,  the  development  and  assessment  of  teachers’  mathe-
matical  knowledge  for  teaching,  and  the  improvement  of  student  learning  in  K–12
mathematics and science. Dr. Ferrini-Mundy has served on the National Council of
Teachers of Mathematics’ Board of Directors, The Board of Governors of the Mathe-
matical  Association  of  America,  and  as  Director  of  the  National  Research  Council’s
Mathematical  Sciences  Education  Board.  She  also  participated  as  an  Ex  Officio
Member of the National Mathematics Advisory Panel in 2007–2008, and serving as
Co-Chair of the Instructional Practices Task Group.

Chair  LIPINSKI.  Thank  you  very  much  for  your  testimony.  Dr.

Bell.
STATEMENT  OF  DR.  PHILIP  BELL,  THE  GEDA  AND  PHIL
CONDIT  PROFESSOR  OF  SCIENCE  AND  MATH  EDUCATION,
ASSOCIATE  PROFESSOR  OF  THE  LEARNING  SCIENCES;  DI-
RECTOR, INSTITUTE FOR SCIENCE AND MATHEMATICS EDU-
CATION, UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON, SEATTLE; CO-CHAIR,
COMMITTEE  ON  LEARNING  SCIENCE  IN  INFORMAL  ENVI-
RONMENTS,  BOARD  ON  SCIENCE  EDUCATION,  NATIONAL
ACADEMY OF SCIENCES, THE NATIONAL ACADEMIES
Dr.  BELL.  Good  morning,  Mr.  Chairman,  and  Members  of  the
Subcommittee. Thank you for the opportunity to appear before you
today. I am Philip Bell from the University of Washington. I served
as Co-Chair of the Committee on Learning Science in Informal En-
vironments  of  the  National  Research  Council,  and  I  ask  that  my
written remarks be made part of the record of the hearing.

I was asked to describe the work in my research group and sum-
marize  the  conclusions  and  recommendations  of  the  recent  NRC
consensus  study.  I  participate  in  a  large-scale  interdisciplinary  re-
search  effort  called  the  Learning  in  Informal  and  Formal  Environ-
ments  Center,  or  LIFE  Center,  a  collaboration  of  the  University  of
Washington,  Stanford  University,  SRI  International.  It  is  funded
through NSF’s Science of Learning Center program within the SBE
Directorate.

In  LIFE  we  study  the  social  foundation  of  how  people  learn
across a broad range of learning environments from the classrooms,
science  centers,  aquaria,  and  zoos  to  after-school  programs,  Inter-
net sites, video game environments and in the midst of family life.
My research group investigates how youth and families from multi-
cultural urban communities develop science and technology-related
expertise across different settings. In our research, we found a sur-
prising and troubling pattern where children pursue and engage in
sophisticated  STEM  learning  outside  of  school,  but  those  interests
and  early  competencies  are  not  recognized  or  built  upon  in  the
classroom.

Just one example, we followed an elementary school-aged boy for
several  years  documenting  his  learning  across  settings  who  devel-
oped  significant  expertise  related  to  mechanical  engineering,  from
building robotic kits at home to engaging in complex puzzle activity

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

19

on the science center floor, but in the classroom, he is not perceived
as being interested in academic subjects at all. Such disconnects in
learning  between  home  and  school  are  putting  these  particular
children at higher risk of academic failure in STEM.

Our  research  further  indicates  that  STEM  academic  achieve-
ment,  although  crucial,  is  only  part  of  what  is  needed  to  cultivate
expertise  in  STEM,  and  people’s  activities  in  informal  environ-
ments are an equally crucial platform for learning, as we are hear-
ing from Congressman Ehlers.

Efforts  to  enhance  the  scientific  capacity  of  society  typically  fo-
cuses  on  formal  schooling.  LIFE  Center  researchers  developed  the
diagram  shown  over  on  the  easel  there  to  my  left,  to  your  right,
to  characterize  roughly  the  amount  of  time  individuals  spend  in
formal and informal environments, with lifelong learning along the
horizontal and life-wide learning as people go across settings along
the vertical.

What  is  often  overlooked  or  underestimated  is  the  potential  of
STEM  learning  in  non-school  settings.  Each  year  tens  of  millions
of Americans young and old explore and learn about science by vis-
iting informal learning institutions, participating in programs, and
countless more use media to pursue their science-related interests.
From  a  lifelong,  life-wide  perspective,  it  is  imperative  that  we  le-
verage informal learning environments to support workforce devel-
opment, civic participation, and STEM-related policy issues, and to
promote scientific literacy among the citizenry.

The  Informal  Science  Education  program,  as  we  already  heard,
funded  a  consensus  study  with  the  Board  on  Science  Education  at
the  NRC  with  the  goal  of  synthesizing  the  existing  research  about
how  people  learn  in  informal  environments.  The  interdisciplinary
committee  that  was  convened  organized  its  analysis  by  looking  at
the  various  places  where  science  learning  occurs.  These  included
everyday experiences like hiking at a national park with your fam-
ily,  pursuing  a  hobby  or  learning  on  the  farm,  as  well  as  designed
settings, such as visiting a science center, zoo, aquarium, or botan-
ical  garden  or  participating  in  educational  programming,  such  as
summer  science  programs  for  youth,  environmental  monitoring  ex-
periences  for  citizens,  or  Elderhostel  programs  that  are  related  to
science.  The  committee  found  abundant  evidence  that  informal
learning  environments  routinely  support  significant  science  learn-
ing  for  individuals  from  all  ages,  from  a  broad  variety  of  back-
grounds  and  ways  that  uniquely  serve  their  personal  and  profes-
sional interest and that relate to the broader STEM interest of so-
ciety.

However,  the  field  is  lacking  a  clear  statement  of  goals  that  are
appropriate  for  these  settings,  learning  goals,  which  can  be  meas-
ured.  The  committee  developed  and  used  the  strands  of  science
learning  framework  that  articulates  science  specific  capabilities
supported  by  informal  learning  environments.  The  six  interrelated
strands reflect the field’s commitment to getting learners to partici-
pate  and  connect  to  science  in  stimulating,  interactive,  contem-
porary, and personally relevant ways.

In  closing,  I  want  to  mention  some  high  priority  policy  issues
that are described in the report. First, in terms of broadening par-
ticipation in STEM, studies do suggest that informal learning envi-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

20

ronments  may  be  particularly  effective  for  youth  from  historically
non-dominant  communities.  However,  there  is  variability  in  the
success  of  these  environments  in  attracting  and  engaging  diverse
audiences. We believe that a better understanding of the naturally
occurring  science  learning  in  a  diverse  range  of  communities  is
needed  to  inform  basic  theory  about  how  people  learn  as  well  as
to  design  informal  learning  experiences  that  actually  are  tailored
to these communities.

Secondly,  we  believe  that  there  should  be  sustained  support  for
high-quality  informal  programs  and  experiences  that  focus  on
STEM.  Informal  learning  environments  represent  a  crucial  part  of
society’s infrastructure for STEM education.

Thirdly, although it is important to understand the impact of in-
formal  environments,  a  more  important  question  may  be  how
science learning occurs across a range of formal and informal envi-
ronments.  The  science  learning  literatures  and  fields  are  seg-
mented  in  ways  that  are  at  odds  with  how  people  routinely  tra-
verse settings and can engage in learning across those settings day
to day.

Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  be  here,  and  I  look  forward  to

your questions.

[The prepared statement of Dr. Bell follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF PHILIP BELL

Good morning, Mr. Chairman and Members of the Committee. Thank you for the
opportunity  to  appear  before  you  today  to  discuss  informal  STEM  education  in
science. I am Philip Bell, Associate Professor of Learning Sciences in the College of
Education at the University of Washington. I served as a Co-Chair of the Committee
on  Learning  Science  in  Informal  Environments  of  the  National  Research  Council
(NRC),  the  operating  arm  of  the  National  Academy  of  Sciences,  National  Academy
of Engineering, and the Institute of Medicine of the National Academies.

In the following statement I will briefly describe what research tells us about how
and why people learn science in informal environments, what role informal environ-
ments can play in broadening participation in STEM fields, and what priorities exist
for  research  and  evaluation  related  to  informal  science  education.  Let  me  start  by
stating that a synthesis of the research clearly indicates that informal learning envi-
ronments  represent  a  crucial  part  of  our  society’s  educational  infrastructure  for
STEM  education.  Informal  learning  environments  routinely  support  significant
science  learning  for  individuals  of  all  ages  from  a  broad  variety  of  backgrounds  in
ways  that  uniquely  serve  their  personal  and  professional  interests—and  the  broader
STEM-related  interests  of  society  as  well.  At  the  same  time,  additional  research  is
needed  to  better  understand  the  cumulative  effects  of  how  people  learn  across  for-
mal and informal learning environments, to better understand the influence of con-
temporary media on science learning, and to document how people from groups that
are  under-represented  in  STEM  fields  learn  science,  which  we  take  to  be  both  a
basic  and  applied  area  of  research.  These  inquiries  can  provide  critical  information
for developing better programs and experiences for learners.

I was asked to describe the work of my research group at the University of Wash-
ington  and  to  summarize  the  conclusions  and  recommendations  of  the  recent  NRC
consensus  study  on  Learning  Science  in  Informal  Environments.  Let  me  start  with
the  research  of  my  group  as  I  think  it  sets  the  stage  for  summarizing  the  report.
Over  the  past  five  years  the  National  Science  Foundation  has  been  supporting  six
large-scale,  long-term  research  centers  around  the  country  through  the  Science  of
Learning Center program focused on advancing the frontiers of the sciences of learn-
ing  through  integrated,  interdisciplinary  research.  I  participate  on  the  faculty  lead-
ership team of one such center called the Learning in Informal and Formal Environ-
ments  Center—or  the  LIFE  Center—which  is  a  collaboration  primarily  among  re-
searchers  at  the  University  of  Washington,  Stanford  University,  and  SRI  Inter-
national.  The  scientific  mission  of  the  LIFE  Center  (http://life-slc.org/)  is  to  docu-
ment the social foundations of how people learn across formal and informal learning
environments  using  cognitive,  social  and  cultural,  neurobiological,  and  develop-
mental perspectives on learning.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

21

LIFE  has  a  portfolio  of  research  studies  that  investigate  STEM  learning—includ-
ing  how  families  engage  in  math  learning  in  everyday  activities  like  personal  fi-
nance and health decisions, how youth develop expertise about technology, and how
young  girls  and  boys  develop  stereotypes  about  academic  subjects  like  math  and
reading.  We  do  that  work  across  a  broad  range  of  venues  for  learning—from  class-
rooms,  science  centers,  aquaria,  and  zoos  to  after-school  programs,  Internet  sites,
virtual spaces, hobby groups, and in the midst of family life. My research group in-
vestigates  how  youth  and  their  families  develop  science  and  technology  related  ex-
pertise  across  a  broad  range  of  formal  and  informal  environments,  groups,  and  ac-
tivities  in  their  lives.  We  construct  finely  detailed  cultural  and  ecological  accounts
of  where,  how,  why,  what,  and  with  whom  children  learn  over  years  with  special
attention  to  knowledge  and  expertise  that  has  real  consequences  for  the  youth  and
families  in  our  studies.  We  also  conduct  extended  multi-week  curriculum  design
studies in elementary science classrooms in collaboration with teachers to test theo-
retical  questions  about  how  we  can  bridge  what  the  children  learn  and  do  at  home
with  what  they  are  learning  at  school.  The  fieldwork  generates  principles  of  learn-
ing that inform educational design principles that are tested in the context of class-
room instruction.

Our  research  takes  place  within  multicultural,  urban  communities,  and  we  are
strongly  focused  on  understanding  how  to  broaden  participation  in  STEM  learning
and activities. As we document how children learn across different settings, we have
found  a  surprising  and  troubling  pattern  where  children  pursue  and  engage  in  so-
phisticated  STEM  learning  outside  of  school  but  where  those  interests  and  early
competencies  are  not  recognized  or  built  upon  in  the  classroom.  Just  as  one  exam-
ple:  we  followed  an  elementary  school-aged  boy  with  significant  expertise  with  me-
chanical  systems—from  building  robotic  kits  at  home  and  designing  solutions  to
complex  puzzles  at  a  science  center—who,  at  school,  was  perceived  as  not  being  in-
terested  in  academic  subjects.  Such  disconnects  in  learning  between  home  and
school  are  putting  these  particular  children  at  a  higher  risk  of  academic  failure  in
STEM. At the same time, many of the cases document how interest, personal identi-
fication  with  STEM  endeavors,  and  practice  with  the  tools  of  STEM  disciplines  are
sustained in important activities happening outside of school—while in summer pro-
grams at science centers and in collaborative activities with peers and parents. That
is,  STEM  academic  achievement  in  school,  although  crucial,  is  only  part  of  what  is
needed to cultivate personal expertise in STEM—and the activities with which people
engage in informal learning environments are an equally crucial platform for STEM
learning.  This  point  highlights  the  truly  complementary  role  of  schooling  and  infor-
mal learning environments in STEM learning.

Researchers in the LIFE center developed the following diagram to roughly char-
acterize the amount of time individuals spend in formal and informal learning envi-
ronments. The diagram highlights changes in this split between formal and informal
learning  environments  over  the  life  course  of  the  individual—what  we  call  life-long
learning—-and  it  gives  a  sense  of  the  breadth  of  different  social  settings  in  which
people  spend  time  in  daily  life—what  we  refer  to  as  life-wide  learning.  As  it  indi-
cates,  the  majority  of  our  time  is  spent  within  the  range  of  informal  learning  envi-
ronments in which we participate—in the ‘‘sea of blue’’ as we call it.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

22

The knowledge and practices of science shape people’s lives in fundamental ways.
It is increasingly understood that the science and technology enterprise plays a cru-
cial  role  in  our  economy  as  well  as  in  our  communities  and  in  our  personal  lives.
This  makes  it  imperative  that  we  leverage  informal  learning  to  support  workforce
development,  civic  participation  in  STEM  issues  and  policy,  and  to  promote  sci-
entific literacy among all citizens.

Efforts  to  enhance  the  scientific  capacity  of  society  typically  target  schools  and
focus  on  such  strategies  as  improving  science  curriculum  and  teacher  quality  and
strengthening the STEM pipeline. What is often overlooked or underestimated is the
potential for science learning in non-school settings, where people actually spend the
majority of their time.

Beyond  the  schoolhouse  door,  opportunities  for  science  learning  abound.  Each
year,  tens  of  millions  of  Americans,  young  and  old,  explore  and  learn  about  science
by  visiting  informal  learning  institutions,  participating  in  programs,  and  using
media  to  pursue  their  interests.  Thousands  of  organizations  dedicate  themselves  to
developing,  documenting,  and  improving  science  learning  in  informal  environments
for  learners  of  all  ages  and  backgrounds.  Countless  others  choose  to  learn  about
science  topics  in  ways  that  serve  their  interests  or  needs  and  engage  in  science-re-
lated  hobbies  with  others  who  share  their  interests.  So,  if  we  ask  the  crucial  ques-
tion:  Where  do  people  learn  science?  The  answer  is  everywhere—in  ways  that  we
only partially understand.

The  National  Science  Foundation  funded  a  consensus  study  through  their  Infor-
mal  Science  Education  program  with  the  Board  on  Science  Education  at  the  Na-
tional  Research  Council  with  the  goal  of  synthesizing  the  existing  research  about
how people learn science in informal environments. The Board on Science Education
at  the  NRC  is  an  advisor  to  the  Nation  on  all  issues  of  science  education  and
oversaw  the  project.  In  response,  the  Committee  on  Science  Learning  in  Informal
Environments  was  established  to  examine  the  potential  of  non-school  settings  for
science learning. The committee, comprised of 14 experts in science, education, psy-
chology, media, and informal education, conducted a broad review of the literatures
that  inform  learning  science  in  informal  environments.  The  charge  we  were  given
specifically  included  assessing  the  evidence  of  science  learning  across  settings,  for
different age groups, and over different time frames. We were asked to identify the
qualities  of  learning  experiences  that  are  unique  to  informal  environments  and  to
explore the relationship between the science learning that happens in informal envi-
ronments  and  the  learning  that  goes  on  within  school.  And  we  were  also  asked  to
develop  an  agenda  for  research  and  development  related  to  how  and  why  people
learn science in informal environments.

The committee organized its analysis by looking at the places where science learn-
ing  occurs  as  well  as  cross-cutting  features  of  informal  learning  environments.  The
‘‘places’’  that  we  considered  included:  everyday  experiences—like  hiking,  pursuing  a
hobby,  or  farming;  designed  settings—such  as  visiting  a  science  center,  zoo,  aquar-
ium, botanical garden, planetarium; and educational programs—such as after-school
or  summer  science  programs  for  youth,  environmental  monitoring  experiences  for
citizens,  or  Elderhostel  and  senior  center  programs  for  elders.  We  also  examined
cross-cutting features that shape informal environments including: the role of media
as a context and tool for learning and the opportunities these environments provide
for broadening participation in STEM for individuals from diverse communities that
are historically under-represented in STEM fields.

A critical missing piece in this area of research and development is a clear state-
ment  of  goals  that  are  appropriate  for  these  settings  and  which  can  be  measured.
The  committee  developed  and  used  a  ‘‘strands  of  science  learning’’  framework  that
articulates  science-specific  capabilities  supported  by  informal  environments.  It
builds  on  the  framework  developed  for  K–8  science  learning  in  the  NRC  Taking
Science to School report from 2007. The six strands illustrate how schools and infor-
mal environments can support complementary educational goals, and serve as a tool
for organizing and assessing science learning. The six interrelated aspects of science
learning  covered  by  the  strands  reflect  the  field’s  commitment  to  getting  learners
to  participate  and  connect  to  science  as  a  stimulating,  creative,  and  personally  rel-
evant endeavor.

Our efforts to improve STEM education frequently focus on the importance of the
disciplinary  content  of  science  and  how  people  come  to  understand  scientific  con-
cepts,  principles,  and  established  facts.  The  committee  agreed  that  the  knowledge
of  science  is  an  important  outcome  of  science  learning,  but  there  is  more  to  the
learning  of  science  than  understanding  content.  The  other  five  strands  help  bring
a  more  complete  image  of  learning  into  view.  These  broader  dimensions  of  science
learning are necessary for developing interest in young learners. For example, early
interest  in  science  is  clearly  associated  with  entry  into  STEM  fields.  In  this  vein,

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

23

it is also crucial for people to develop science-related interests and to experience en-
joyment, to come to identify with science, to know how to develop and evaluate sci-
entific  arguments  and  explanations  of  natural  phenomena,  to  know  how  scientists
actually  inquire  and  build  new  knowledge  using  specialized  tools  and  equipment,
and to understand the multifaceted role of the institution of science in society.

The six science learning strands help us understand how learners in informal en-

vironments:

Strand  1:  Experience  excitement,  interest,  and  motivation  to  learn  about  phe-
nomena in the natural and physical world.
Strand  2:  Come  to  generate,  understand,  remember,  and  use  concepts,  expla-
nations, arguments, models and facts related to science.
Strand  3:  Manipulate,  test,  explore,  predict,  question,  observe,  and  make  sense
of the natural and physical world.
Strand  4:  Reflect  on  science  as  a  way  of  knowing;  on  processes,  concepts,  and
institutions  of  science;  and  on  their  own  process  of  learning  about  phenomena.
Strand  5:  Participate  in  scientific  activities  and  learning  practices  with  others,
using scientific language and tools.
Strand  6:  Think  about  themselves  as  science  learners  and  develop  an  identity
as someone who knows about, uses, and sometimes contributes to science.

With  this  multi-dimensional  definition  of  science  learning,  we  then  explored  the
question:  What  is  the  contribution  of  informal  environments  towards  these  out-
comes?  The  report  describes  the  state  of  our  knowledge  about  how  the  strands  of
science learning are supported across the different informal learning environments.
For example, educational television and museum experiences can support conceptual
learning.  Family  conversations  can  help  children  learn  to  produce  scientific  con-
versations.  After-school  programs  can  give  learners  access  to  learning  to  use  the
specialized tools of science and support the learning of science content. Prior knowl-
edge,  interest,  and  identity—long  understood  as  integral  to  the  learning  process—
are  especially  important  in  informal  learning  environments,  where  opportunities  to
learn  can  be  fleeting,  episodic,  and  strongly  learner-driven.  At  any  point  in  the  life
span,  learners  have  knowledge  and  interests,  which—given  opportunities  and  sup-
port—they can develop into for further science learning. This includes their comfort
and  familiarity  with  science.  Although  learners’  knowledge  may  remain  tacit  and
may not always be scientifically accurate, it can serve as the basis for more sophisti-
cated learning over time. Educators can support learners of all ages by intentionally
querying,  drawing  on,  and  extending  their  interests,  ideas  about  self,  and  knowl-
edge.

So,  do  people  learn  science  in  non-school  settings?  This  is  a  critical  question  for
policy makers, practitioners, and researchers alike—and the answer is yes. The com-
mittee  found  abundant  evidence  that  across  all  venues—everyday  experiences,  de-
signed  settings,  and  educational  programs—individuals  of  all  ages  learn  science  in
significant  ways.  We  know  from  vast  literatures  in  the  science  of  learning  field  on
cognition  and  development  that  sophisticated  learning  only  results  from  concerted
effort  and  sustained  practice.  It  is  crucial  for  us  to  recognize  and  understand  how
such  learning  and  expertise  gets  supported  and  cultivated  across  the  settings  and
pursuits  in  a  person’s  life.  Understanding  the  cumulative  effects  of  STEM  learning
as  it  occurs  across  formal  and  informal  learning  environments  is  a  high-priority
area for future research.

Virtually all people of all ages and backgrounds engage in informal science learn-
ing in the course of daily life. Informal environments can stimulate science interest,
build learners’ scientific knowledge and skill, and—perhaps most importantly—help
people learn to be more comfortable and confident in their relationship with science.
Researchers  and  educators  interested  in  informal  settings  are  typically  committed
to open participation in science: building and understanding science learning experi-
ences  that  render  science  accessible  to  a  broad  range  of  learners  and  in  ways  that
serve their interests.

Everyday  experiences  can  support  science  learning  for  virtually  all  people  in  re-
sponse  to  the  interests  and  needs  that  matter  most  to  them—including  environ-
mental  risks,  health  decisions,  and  appreciation  of  the  natural  world.  If  educators
can  attend  more  deeply  to  the  ways  in  which  people  already  intersect  with  science
and technology in their lives then our educational efforts will be more powerful and
meaningful.

Designed  spaces—including  museums,  science  centers,  zoos,  aquariums,  botanical
gardens,  and  environmental  centers—can  also  support  science  learning.  Rich  with
real-world phenomena and unique learning experiences, these are places where peo-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

24

ple  can  pursue  and  develop  science  interests,  engage  in  science  inquiry,  and  reflect
on their experiences through sense-making conversations.

Educational  programs  focused  on  science  learning  take  place  in  schools  and  com-
munity-based  and  science-rich  organizations  and  include  sustained,  self-organized
activities  of  science  enthusiasts.  Such  programs  are  growing  in  number,  with  the
support  of  significant  federal  funding,  and  there  is  mounting  evidence  that  struc-
tured,  non-school  science  programs  can  feed  or  stimulate  the  science-specific  inter-
ests  of  adults  and  children,  may  positively  influence  academic  achievement  for  stu-
dents, and may expand participants’ sense of future science career options.

Science  media,  in  the  form  of  radio,  television,  the  Internet,  and  hand-held  de-
vices,  are  increasingly  pervasive  and  make  science  information  increasingly  avail-
able  to  people  across  venues  for  science  learning.  Science  media,  especially  inter-
active  forms  that  are  web-based,  are  fundamentally  changing  people’s  engagement
with science and offer new ways to support science learning. Although the evidence
is  strong  for  the  impact  of  educational  television  on  science  learning,  substantially
less empirical evidence exists on the impact of other media—digital media, gaming,
radio—on  science  learning  specifically.  There  is  good  reason  to  believe  that  such
media  are  increasingly  supporting  science  learning,  but  we  need  more  research  fo-
cused  on  how  and  why  people  learn  science  specifically  through  interactive  and  so-
cial media.

What  role  can  informal  learning  environments  play  in  broadening  participation
and promoting diversity in STEM fields? A report on diversity and learning recently
edited  Professor  James  Banks  from  the  University  of  Washington  states:  ‘‘Being
born into a racial majority group with high levels of economic and social resources—
or  into  a  group  that  has  historically  been  marginalized  with  low  levels  of  economic
and  social  resources—results  in  very  different  lived  experiences  that  include  un-
equal learning opportunities, challenges, and potential risks for learning and devel-
opment.’’

The  committee  recognized  that  there  is  increasing  interest  in  the  informal  learn-
ing  research  and  practitioner  fields  for  understanding  cultural  variability  among
learners  and  its  implications:  how  learners  participate  in  science  in  relation  to  the
values, attitudes, histories, and practices of their communities and those of science.
Studies  suggest  that  informal  environments  for  science  learning  may  be  particu-
larly effective for youth from historically non-dominant groups—groups with limited
social and political status in society who are often marginalized in educational expe-
riences.  For  example,  evaluations  of  museum-based  and  after-school  programs  sug-
gest that these experiences can support academic gains for children and youth from
historically  non-dominant  groups.  These  successes  often  draw  on  local  issues  and
the prior interests of participants—for instance, by integrating science learning and
service  to  the  community.  Similarly,  case  studies  of  community  science  programs
targeting  participation  of  youth  from  historically  non-dominant  groups—such  as
children  in  Native  American  or  recent  immigrant  communities—document  partici-
pants’ sustained, sophisticated engagement with science and sustained influence on
school  science  course  selection  and  career  choices.  In  these  programs,  children  and
youth  play  an  active  role  in  shaping  the  subject  and  process  of  inquiry,  which  may
include local health or environmental issues about which they subsequently educate
the community. Equally interesting in these contexts is the cross-generational learn-
ing—the  ways  in  which  informal  learning  opportunities  help  connect  children,  par-
ents, grandparents, and other community elders.

Many  designers  in  informal  science  learning  are  making  efforts  to  address  in-
equity  and  wish  to  partner  with  members  of  diverse  communities.  Effective  strate-
gies  for  organizing  partnerships  include  identifying  shared  goals;  designing  experi-
ences around issues of local relevance; taking the everyday patterns of participation
of  learners  into  account;  and  designing  experiences  that  satisfy  the  values  and
norms  and  reflect  the  practices  of  all  partners.  These  efforts  merit  replication  and
further  study,  including  analysis  of  how  science-rich  institutions  can  collaborate
with  and  serve  community-based  organizations  and  how  these  programs  support
and sustain participants’ engagement.

To  understand  whether,  how,  or  when  learning  occurs,  good  outcome  measures
are necessary, yet efforts to define outcomes for science learning in informal settings
have often been controversial. At times, researchers and practitioners have adopted
the  same  tools  and  measures  of  achievement  used  in  school  settings.  In  some  in-
stances,  public  and  private  funding  for  informal  education  has  even  required  such
academic  achievement  measures.  Yet  traditional  academic  achievement  outcomes
are  limited.  Although  they  may  facilitate  coordination  between  informal  environ-
ments  and  schools,  they  fail  to  reflect  the  defining  characteristics  of  informal  envi-
ronments  in  three  ways.  Many  academic  achievement  outcomes  (1)  do  not  encom-
pass the range of capabilities that informal settings can promote; (2) violate critical

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

25

assumptions  about  these  settings,  such  as  their  focus  on  leisure-based  or  voluntary
experiences  and  non-standardized  curriculum;  and  (3)  are  not  designed  for  the
breadth of participants, many of whom are not K–12 students.

The  challenge  of  developing  clear  and  reasonable  goals  for  learning  science  in  in-
formal  environments  is  compounded  by  the  real  or  perceived  encroachment  of  a
school  agenda  on  such  settings.  This  has  led  some  to  eschew  formalized  outcomes
altogether  and  to  embrace  learner-defined  outcomes  instead.  The  committee’s  view
is  that  it  is  unproductive  to  blindly  adopt  either  purely  academic  goals  or  purely
subjective  learning  goals.  Instead,  the  committee  prefers  a  third  course  that  com-
bines a variety of specialized science learning goals used in research and practice—
for example, the six strands of science learning developed in the report.

In closing, the following are some high-priority policy considerations related to re-

search on the role of informal learning environments in STEM education:

• There should be sustained support for high-quality informal programs and ex-
periences that focus on STEM, whether they occur in museums, aquaria, zoos,
science  and  technology  centers,  botanical  gardens,  in  out-of-school  program
settings  or  other  informal  efforts.  Significant  and  unique  science  learning
occur in these venues—in ways that can be leveraged to support school-based
academic  outcomes  and  in  ways  that  represent  important  experiences  with
STEM  disciplinary  fields  as  an  end  in  and  of  themselves.  The  report  offers
guidance for how these activities should be evaluated and studied so that we
can gain a better understanding of how and when they succeed.
• Although it is important to understand the impact of informal environments,
a  more  important  question  may  be  how  science  learning  occurs  across  the
range  of  formal  and  informal  environments.  The  science  learning  literatures
and  fields  are  segmented  (e.g.,  into  school  learning,  informal  education)  in
ways  that  are  at  odds  with  how  people  routinely  traverse  settings  and  can
engage  in  learning  activities  across  settings.  Thus,  research  should  attempt
to  explore  learners’  longer-term,  cross-cutting  (or  ‘‘life-wide’’)  learning  experi-
ences. Further work should increase understanding of the connections or bar-
riers in learning between more formal and more informal science learning en-
vironments.  These  inquiries  can  provide  critical  information  for  developing
better programs and experiences for learners.
• Media,  in  particular  television  and  Internet  resources,  are  the  most  sought-
out  tool  for  learning  about  science.  Through  various  forms  of  digital  media—
blogs,  virtual  spaces,  wikis,  serious  games,  RSS  feeds,  etc.—access  to  sci-
entific  ideas  and  information  and  knowledgeable  others  has  become,  if  not
pervasive, at least widespread. Arguments about the transformative power of
media  for  informal  science  learning  are  based  on  very  modest  evidence  and
warrant  further  investigation.  Research  on  the  impact  of  media  is  needed  to
understand  how  the  unique  features  of  media  can  support  different  aspects
of science learning (e.g., the six strands).
• The  committee  concluded  that  informal  learning  environments  may  be  par-
ticularly important for science learning for diverse groups. Research exists on
how  specific  groups  can  come  to  participate  in  specific  venues,  but  questions
remain  about  how  to  best  empower  science  learning  for  diverse  groups
through  informal  learning  environments.  There  is  variability  in  the  success
of  these  environments  in  attracting  and  engaging  diverse  audiences.  We  be-
lieve  that  a  better  understanding  of  the  naturally  occurring  science  learning
in historically non-dominant and dominant cultures is needed to inform basic
theory  about  learning  and  to  inform  the  design  of  learning  experiences  that
meaningfully attend to the cultural practices of diverse communities.

Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  present  to  the  Subcommittee  on  this  important

set of topics. I look forward to your questions and comments.

BIOGRAPHY FOR PHILIP BELL

Philip  Bell  pursues  a  cognitive  and  cultural  program  of  research  across  diverse
environments focused on how people learn in ways that are personally consequential
to  them.  He  is  an  associate  professor  of  the  Learning  Sciences  at  the  University  of
Washington  and  the  Geda  and  Phil  Condit  Professor  of  Science  and  Mathematics
Education, and he directs the ethnographic and design-based research of the Every-
day  Science  and  Technology  Group  (http://everydaycognition.org).  He  also  directs
the  University  of  Washington  Institute  for  Science  and  Mathematics  Education  fo-
cused on coordinating P–20 education efforts across the University. Bell has studied
everyday expertise and cognition in science and health, the design and use of novel

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

26

learning technologies in science classrooms, children’s argumentation, culturally re-
sponsive  science  instruction,  the  use  of  emerging  digital  technologies  within  youth
culture,  and  new  approaches  to  inquiry  instruction  in  science.  He  is  a  Co-Lead  of
the  Learning  in  Informal  and  Formal  Environments  (LIFE)  Center  (http://life-
slc.org/)  and  is  a  Co-PI  of  COSEE–Ocean  Learning  Communities  (http://cosee-
olc.org/).  Bell  serves  as  a  member  of  the  Board  on  Science  Education  with  the  Na-
tional  Academy  of  Sciences  and  co-chairs  the  National  Research  Council  Consensus
Committee on Learning Science in Informal Environments. He has a background in
human  cognition  and  development,  science  education,  computer  science,  and  elec-
trical engineering.

Chair LIPINSKI. Thank you, Dr. Bell, and Ms. Ingram.

STATEMENT  OF  MS.  ANDREA  J.  INGRAM,  VICE  PRESIDENT,
EDUCATION  AND  GUEST  SERVICES,  MUSEUM  OF  SCIENCE
AND INDUSTRY, CHICAGO
Ms.  INGRAM.  Thank  you,  Chairman,  and  Members  of  the  Sub-
committee, and thank you for inviting us here today to speak with
you. I would also like to thank NSF and Dr. Bell and his co-authors
for investing their time and thoughtfulness in producing this report
that is so important. It informs our efforts.

As  you  know,  which  is  why  we  are  here,  science  and  technology
are critically important to human well-being, economic growth and
a  sustainable  environment.  America’s  social  and  economic  future
depends on new generations of scientists who can help sustain our
legacy of innovation and science leadership.

Our  schools  cannot  do  this  alone.  Wonderful,  inspirational  and
important  resources  exist  outside  of  the  classroom  in  our  national
laboratories  and  our  universities  and  our  museums,  in  our  zoos,
and in our libraries.

If  we  share  the  objective  of  supporting  science  achievement  to
create our next generation of innovators, then we must ensure that
these resources are well-aligned to support the engagement and ex-
cellence  of  our  youth  in  science.  When  we  adopt  this  shared  objec-
tive,  the  lines  distinguishing  between  formal  and  informal  edu-
cation become blurred and lose relevance. What we have are a vari-
ety  of  learning  strategies  and  a  variety  of  tools  all  targeted  to  en-
sure broad access, opportunity and success in the sciences.

At the Museum of Science and Industry in Chicago, we have em-
braced  this  shared  objective  and  have  designed  our  historic  trans-
formation  to  reflect  this  new  direction.  We  are  unified  in  our  com-
mitment as an institution to become an esteemed educational insti-
tution  that  will  play  a  critical  role  in  the  advancement  of  science
education.  And  with  that  recognition,  we  have  adopted  the  vision
to  inspire  and  motivate  children  to  achieve  their  full  potential  in
the fields of science, technology, medicine, and engineering. And in
doing  so,  we  have  recognized  that  in  order  to  overcome  this  quiet
crisis in our scientists and engineers in the United States, we must
diversify and broaden those who are engaged and inspired into ca-
reers in the sciences.

So  in  adopting  that  vision  and  taking  this  new  direction,  that
means that we have changed our practices in the designs of our ex-
hibits  and  how  we  extend  the  reach  of  those  exhibitions  through
programming, and in our view, of our collaborative leadership role.
In our exhibitions, we have intentionally adopted an integrated ap-
proach in which our education teams participate in our exhibit de-
sign process to ensure that the content embedded in the exhibitions

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

27

is  aligned  with  national,  international,  and  local  learning  stand-
ards and objectives so that they can be broadly used as tools to en-
hance  science  achievement  in  the  classroom.  We  have  reflected  on
and  embedded  the  Atlas  of  Science  Literacy  created  by  the  Amer-
ican Association for the Advancement of Science, Project 2061, and
in  doing  so,  our  tools  will  become  world-class  instruments  to  ad-
vance science education.

Through  our  Center  for  the  Advancement  of  Science  Education,
which we have newly formed as part of this transformation, we ex-
tend  the  content  of  our  exhibitions  to  where  our  guests  and  youth
are. That means that within our museum, we have now poised our
staff  to  engage  in  fun,  inspirational  ways  with  our  guests  around
the content to give them an opportunity for contextual learning, to
have  fun,  to  provide  the  inspiration  for  which  we  are  known,  but
to provide them with minds-on, hands-on experiences. These oppor-
tunities are now available for our 1.5 million visitors a year almost
and to the nearly 300,000 students that visit us on field trips.

Our  vision  tells  us  to  do  more,  though,  with  a  series  of  commu-
nity 
initiatives.  We  work  with  57  community  organizations
throughout  Chicago.  We  have  developed  the  Institute  for  Quality
Science Teaching in which we support the capacity and competency
of our science teachers in our local school districts, and we have ac-
cepted a collaborative leadership role because none of this happens
without  partners.  So  in  our  Institute  for  Quality  Teaching,  that
means  we  work  with  our  universities  to  ensure  the  ability  of  our
teachers to receive credit hours and endorsements through Science
Chicago,  a  collaborative  effort  with  140  partners  throughout  the
Chicago  area.  We  have  built  awareness  of  the  scientific  resources
in  the  region  and  built  connections  to  them.  With  this  work,  we
have the capacity to share with others how to really propel science
education through informal settings.

Thank you.
[The prepared statement of Ms. Ingram follows:]
PREPARED STATEMENT OF ANDREA J. INGRAM

Introduction

Science  and  technology  are  critically  important  to  human  well-being,  economic
growth  and  a  sustainable  environment.  In  a  technology-driven  world,  America’s  so-
cial and economic future depends on new generations of scientists who can help sus-
tain  our  legacy  of  innovation  and  science  leadership.  However,  increasing  evidence
indicates that education and engagement in science is on the decline. The statistics
are  dismal  at  national,  State  and  local  levels.  By  eighth  grade,  American  students
have  fallen  behind  the  leading  ten  nations  in  science.  By  age  15,  these  youth  are
behind 27 other nations in math skills. In Chicago, nearly two-thirds of fourth grad-
ers  failed  to  display  even  the  most  basic  level  of  science  knowledge  and  skills  on
the National Assessment of Educational Progress (NAEP) in 2005.
Americans recognize the importance of this issue. ‘‘The State of Science in Amer-
ica’’ 1 national survey conducted by Harris Interactive®  on behalf of the Museum of
Science and industry found:

• 70  percent  believe  America  has  lost  its  edge  in  science,  and  only  35  percent

think the U.S. will be the world leader in science in the next 20 years.

• 87  percent  agree  that  science  is  important  and  that  they  personally  benefit

from it every day.

1 Museum of Science and Industry. (2008). The State of Science in America. Conducted by Har-

ris Interactive. www.stateofscience.org

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

28

• 79  percent  believe  science  is  not  receiving  the  level  of  attention  it  deserves
• 87 percent agree that, as a nation, we must begin to devote more funding to-

in our nation’s schools.

ward science education.

At a time when schools face shrinking resources and growing demands, reversing
this  trend  depends  on  leadership  from  civic  institutions  that  partner  with  families,
communities and schools.

Informal  learning  institutions  such  as  the  Museum  of  Science  and  Industry  are
ideally positioned for this leadership role. Our strategic vision, robust education pro-
gramming, and inspirational exhibits linked to classroom curriculum make our Mu-
seum and others like us natural partners in improving science education. Museums
are  visited  by  millions  of  schoolchildren  every  year;  at  the  Museum  of  Science  and
Industry,  over  260,000  students  came  on  field  trips  in  2008,  and  tens  of  thousands
more visit with their parents.

Several years ago, the Museum of Science and Industry convened a group of civic
leaders,  scientists,  educators  and  national  experts  from  many  disciplines  to  brain-
storm  new  ways  to  teach  and  inspire  children,  spark  innovation  and  explore  new
scientific  frontiers.  We  developed  a  bold  plan  to  help  us  realize  our  vision,  which
is  to  inspire  and  motivate  our  children  to  reach  their  full  potential  in  the  fields  of
science,  technology,  medicine  and  engineering.  This  plan  includes  three  strategies:
• Place  educational  programming  at  the  heart  of  the  Museum  of  Science  and
Industry  experience  by  developing  and  expanding  the  Museum’s  Center  for
the Advancement of Science Education.
• Provide  spectacular,  transformative  exhibitions  that  grab  attention  and  lead
• Enhance  the  experience  of  Museum  guests  by  presenting  a  unique,  dynamic
visit  that  engages  people  in  interactive  science  experiences  that  make  learn-
ing fun.

to learning.

As  a  result,  the  Museum  is  revolutionizing  the  way  we  reach  out  to  students,
teachers,  the  community  and  school  systems.  Our  Center  for  the  Advancement  of
Science Education works with our local school systems—especially the Chicago Pub-
lic  Schools—and  collaborates  with  some  of  the  best  minds  and  institutions  focused
on science and education, making the Museum of Science and Industry a laboratory
for  the  development  of  science  learning  and  teacher  professional  development  pro-
grams.

The Center’s programming aims to shape the attitudes about and participation in
science  by  minority  youth  during  their  middle-  and  high-school  years.  The  short-
term  goal  is  to  increase  awareness,  interest,  and  participation  in  science,  and
longer-term  goals  include  influencing  youth  to  choose  STEM  careers,  sustaining  a
supportive climate at the community level for science engagement and participation,
and facilitating high-quality science teaching and learning in schools. The Museum’s
approach  is  multifaceted  and  targets  students,  teachers,  community  organizations,
and  families  at  a  community-wide  level.  We  are  also  a  proving  ground,  thoroughly
analyzing and evaluating our programs and implementing the best ideas.

Research indicates it’s critical to align educational programs for students and pro-
fessional  development  opportunities  for  teachers  to  classroom  curriculum  to  ensure
that programs directly impact learning.2 An inquiry-based science curriculum helps
bridge  school  science  and  real-world  experiences.3 Studies  show  that  when  this  ap-
proach  is  incorporated  in  science  teaching,  students  (and  particularly  historically
under-served minority students) score higher on science achievement tests, have im-
proved  science  process  skills,  and  have  more  positive  attitudes  toward  science  than
students  taught  using  only  a  traditional  approach.4,5 The  Museum  of  Science  and
Industry makes sure the content of our workshops for students and teachers meets
state and national learning standards in science. Using Illinois Learning Standards
in science and the Atlas of Science Literacy created by the American Association for
the Advancement of Science’s Project 2061, we match program content to what stu-

2 ‘‘Teaching  Teachers:  Professional  Development  to  Improve  Student  Achievement,’’  Research

Points, American Education Research Association, Summer 2005, Vol. 3 Issue 1.

3 National  Research  Council.  (1996).  National  Science  Education  Standards.  National  Com-
mittee  on  Science  Education  Standards  and  Assessment.  Washington,  D.C.:  National  Academy
Press.

4 Basu, S., and Calabrese-Barton, A. (2007). Developing a sustained interest in science among

urban minority youth. Journal of Research in Science Teaching, 44(3), 466–489.

5 Gibson,  H.,  and  Chase,  C.  (2002).  Longitudinal  impact  of  an  inquiry-based  science  program

on middle school students’ attitudes towards science. Science Education, 86(5), 693–705.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

29

dents need to learn as they move from kindergarten through 12th grade. Our efforts
have been recognized by AAAS Project 2061, which enlisted our help to develop and
host an upcoming workshop for science museum staff called ‘‘Using Atlas of Science
Literacy in Informal Science Learning Settings.’’

Educational Programming Inspires and Informs

The  Museum  of  Science  and  Industry  has  placed  education  at  the  center  of  what
we do. We are no longer a museum with an ‘‘education department’’; we are an edu-
cational  institution.  As  cross-disciplinary  teams,  we  develop  and  implement  a  vari-
ety  of  strategies  to  engage  and  inspire  our  audiences  through  our  exhibitions  and
programming.

We  currently  have  three  new  permanent  exhibitions  under  design  and  develop-
ment.  We  have  taken  a  materially  different  approach  by  integrating  education  ex-
perts  onto  the  design  teams  to  ensure  the  content  is  developmentally  appropriate
for  our  youth  audiences,  includes  content  that  corresponds  to  classroom  learning
standards,  and  reflects  evidence-based  practices  on  learning.  For  example,  Science
Storms,  a  new  exhibition  under  construction,  will  use  seven  iconic  natural  phe-
nomena—avalanches, tornadoes, sunlight, tsunamis, atoms in motion, lightning and
fire—to  teach  principles  of  physics  and  chemistry.  One-of-a-kind  science  experi-
ences—such as measuring wind speed, humidity and temperature while standing in-
side  a  40-foot  tornado  or  creating  lightning  indoors  with  a  23-foot  Tesla  coil—will
make  the  exhibition  a  living  laboratory  for  students  on  field  trips.  The  experiences
and exhibitions being created will not only make the Museum a premier global des-
tination, but will become imperative learning tools for advancing science education.
The  Museum  recognizes  that  teachers,  mentors,  parents,  other  caregivers,  and
peers all play critical roles in supporting a young person’s access to and enthusiasm
for  science  learning.  By  taking  a  comprehensive  approach  to  science  education,  we
aim to connect the Museum and the community in a sustainable partnership where
learning  takes  place  in  many  different  locations.  To  this  end,  programs  offered  by
the Museum’s Center for the Advancement of Science Education are designed to ex-
tend  the  content  of  our  exhibitions  through  strategies  that  empower  teachers,  en-
gage  the  community,  and  excite  students.  Initiatives  reach  beyond  the  Museum
walls  into  schools  and  community  organizations  across  the  Chicago  area.  Programs
are  designed  to  provide  much-needed  support  to  teachers,  reach  children  in  a  vari-
ety of settings, and make it easy to participate.

Teacher Professional Development Programs

Effective  classroom  teaching  is  critical  to  helping  children  develop  the  essential
thinking  skills  they  need  to  weigh  evidence,  solve  problems,  balance  risks  and  re-
wards,  and  make  sense  of  their  environment.  In  the  Museum’s  new  Institute  for
Quality  Science  Teaching  (IQST),  middle-school  science  teachers  dive  into  profes-
sional  development  workshops  where  they  explore  science  topics  relevant  to  their
classroom  science  curriculum  and  return  to  the  classroom  with  new  ideas,  greater
confidence and the resources they need to make science engaging for their students.
Our  focus  is  on  enabling  teachers  who  are  in  the  classroom  today  and  creating  a
pipeline  of  quality  teachers  with  the  skills  to  inspire  passion  and  excitement  of
about  science.  More  than  1,000  teachers  attend  IQST  programs  each  year,  ulti-
mately impacting science education for an estimated 30,000 students annually.6

Our  goal  is  to  provide  quality  professional  development  while  working  with  the
Chicago  Public  Schools  (CPS)  towards  placing  a  content-qualified  teacher  in  every
middle  grades  science  classroom.  CPS  recently  adopted  a  policy  that  will  require
that all middle-school teachers who teach science must have a science endorsement.
We work in partnership with CPS to reach that goal and do it in a way that ensures
the endorsement is of a quality that will have an impact on classroom achievement.
For  three  years  the  IQST  at  the  Museum’s  Center  for  the  Advancement  of  Science
Education  has  tested  and  learned  from  partnerships  with  institutions  of  higher
learning  to  determine  what  model  works  most  effectively  for  the  teachers  and  the
achievement of their students.

a) National  Louis  University:  The  College  of  Education  at  National  Louis
University  offers  course  credit  ranging  from  one  to  three  credit  hours  for
IQST  programs.  Participants  in  summer  institutes  offered  in  partnership
with  Golden  Apple  Foundation  can  earn  one  hour  while  teachers  in  one  of

6 In the 2007–2008 academic year a total of over 300 teachers participated in IQST programs
certified for one to three credit hours with an additional 450 participating in more targeted half-
day to full-day workshops. Over 250 additional teachers participate in events designed to inform
and deepen the relationship amongst science teachers.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

30

our  year-long  workshop  series  can  earn  three  hours.  Credits  are  widely
transferable.  Teachers  must  register  with  National  Louis  and  pay  tuition.
Even when this was the only option offered in the 2007–2008 academic year,
few teachers participated as the tuition is viewed as prohibitive.

b) Illinois  Institute  of  Technology  (IIT):  Through  this  collaboration,  three
hours  of  graduate  course  credit  is  offered  at  a  reduced  tuition  rate  of  $100
per  credit  hour.  Nearly  one-third  of  the  teachers  in  our  core  teacher  profes-
sional  development  series  in  2008–2009  elected  to  enroll  with  IIT.  Teacher
participants selecting this option are responsible for paying all tuition costs.
IQST  and  IIT  are  working  towards  a  joint  endorsement  program.  The  pro-
gram  will  enable  teachers  to  enroll  in  a  combination  of  IQST  programs  and
IIT courses that would lead to a science endorsement with an option to add
a  middle  grades  endorsement.  The  planning  for  this  project  will  continue
through  2009,  with  the  potential  to  launch  the  new  endorsement  program
during  2010.  Upon  evaluating  the  success  of  the  endorsement  program,  an
option for a joint Master’s may be considered.

c) Loyola University: The Museum is a partner with the Center for Math and
Science Education at Loyola University Chicago in a planning grant received
from the Illinois Board of Higher Education. Through this partnership, IQST
will offer its professional development programs and other approved courses
as  part  of  new  degree  programs  leading  to  a  Master’s  in  either  Chemistry
Education or Earth and Space Science Education. Loyola will be the first in
the area to offer content-specific science education degrees including content
and grade level endorsements. The Museum’s component of the course work
is anticipated to begin in 2010.

d) Other  partnerships:  In  addition,  IQST  is  approved  to  grant  Continuing
Professional  Development  Units  (CPDUs)  through  the  Illinois  State  Board
of Education and approved to offer CPS Lane Placement Credits to teachers
participating in its programs.

Credentials themselves are not enough. With our partners we work to ensure that

our instruction will have an impact on student science achievement.

The  Museum’s  professional  development  workshops  are  designed  to  increase
teachers’  knowledge  of  science  content,  improve  their  teaching  skills  and  dem-
onstrate how to use museum programs and exhibits to enhance science curriculum.
We  offer  a  year-long  workshop  series  targeting  4th  through  8th  grade  educators
with  limited  experience  teaching  science.  Currently  we  run  two  concurrent  series:
• Get  Energized!  explores  concepts  related  to  energy,  such  as  energy  trans-
formation  and  conversion,  electricity,  sound,  light,  heat  and  more.  Activities
include  a  ball  drop  from  a  three-story  balcony  to  demonstrate  potential  and
kinetic  energy,  dissecting  flashlights,  creating  circuit  boards  from  everyday
materials and more.
• City  Science  focuses  on  topics  such  as  city  ecology,  the  science  behind  struc-
tures,  developing  cities  of  the  future  and  more.  Activities  include  exploring
the school yard ecosystem, studying types of pollution, constructing buildings
and more.

The  menu  of  topics  is  being  expanded  and  soon  will  include  five  distinct  courses.
Success  depends  not  just  on  the  right  content  but  evidence-based  delivery  prac-
tices. We focus on building whole school engagement and teacher communities. Prin-
cipals must be on board and benefits are conferred that can extend beyond the indi-
vidual  teachers  who  are  enrolled.  Teachers  are  recruited  in  pairs  to  ensure  shared
resources and continuity within schools, and most are from Chicago Public Schools.
The program targets schools most in need of resources—42 of the 50 schools partici-
pating in the 2008–2009 school year largely serve low-income children.

Teachers  attend  five  day-long  sessions  a  year,  where  Museum  educators  present
topic-focused,  inquiry-based,  hands-on  science  activities.  To  improve  accessibility,
the Museum has identified and removed barriers to participation. Workshops are of-
fered  at  no  cost,  content  is  aligned  with  Illinois  Learning  Standards  in  science,
teachers  receive  continuing  education  credit,  and  the  Museum  funds  the  cost  of  a
substitute  teacher  for  sessions  held  on  school  days.  Teachers  receive  lesson  plans,
all the materials they need to replicate the activities in their classrooms, and a class
field  trip  that  includes  funding  for  buses  and  an  educational  program  for  school
groups.  The  Museum’s  collaboration  with  IIT  also  offers  teachers  in  the  workshop
series three hours of graduate course credit at a reduced tuition rate.

Teachers  credit  the  workshops  with  showing  them  how  to  make  science  fun  and
exciting for their students. They say the comprehensive lesson plans, materials and

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

31

interactive  training  sessions  provide  exactly  what  they  need  to  help  their  students
learn science. Here’s just some of the feedback we’ve received:

‘‘I came into teaching not wanting to touch science with a 10-foot pole, and not
having the know-how to do so anyway. I really credit your professional develop-
ment programs with completely changing that. The training, the materials, the
lesson  plans,  everything  has  been  exactly  what  a  teacher  needs.  I  for  one  have
learned to love science (and know a lot more about teaching inquiry and assess-
ment)  and  have  decided  to  make  science  education  my  full  focus.  So  again,
thank  you  for  helping  inspire  and  prepare  me  for  this  challenge.  The  museum
is a great resource to the kids in Chicago and I have not seen any other institu-
tion do so much to make its offerings so available and accessible to the commu-
nity.’’
—Eric Santos, Fulton Elementary School, Chicago

‘‘This  is  my  first  year  teaching  and  I’m  doing  so  in  areas  that  are  outside  of
my original certification. Although I now see myself as a science teacher, I still
lack many tools of the trade, since I never took a science methods class or stu-
dent  taught  under  a  science  mentor.  Because  I’m  teaching  8th  grade  physical
science this year, the Get Energized workshops have been exceedingly valuable
in  making  up  for  those  deficiencies.  The  lessons  are  really  approachable  and
easy  to  implement,  and  the  focus  on  inquiry  fits  my  teaching  philosophy  . . ..
The  supplemental  resources  have  been  great  as  well.  I  cannot  get  over  the  lab
materials  we  receive  after  each  session.  It’s  amazing  to  be  able  to  bring  those
bins back to school and know that I can dig into my new lessons starting Mon-
day.  It  demonstrates  how  complete  the  program  is,  given  that  you  give  us  cur-
ricula,  guide  us  during  the  workshops  in  how  we  may  teach  many  of  the  les-
sons, and give us everything we need to put them to use in the classroom.’’
—Melissa Resh, Young Women’s Leadership Charter School, Chicago

Community Initiatives

The  Museum  of  Science  and  Industry  is  creating  programs  that  expand  our  role
in  a  community.  New  partnerships  with  schools  and  community  organizations  are
extending  science  engagement  beyond  the  classroom  and  Museum  walls  into  places
where  students  already  spend  their  time  after  school.  As  a  result,  children  and
teens  from  diverse  backgrounds  get  an  opportunity  to  discover  new  interests,  de-
velop  new  skills,  prepare  for  college,  and  learn  about  careers  in  science  and  engi-
neering. The focus of the Science Minors series of programs is on children and teens
in  the  community  who  are  in  need  of  new  opportunities.  The  series  includes  three
levels of engagement which reach over 5,000 students each year.

The  Museum  partners  with  schools  and  community-based  organizations  to  offer
pre-teen  students  early,  hands-on  exposure  to  science  through  after-school  Science
Minors Clubs. The program aims to increase science literacy and interest in science
in under-served neighborhoods. Currently, there are 57 sites throughout the Chicago
region and Northwest Indiana that serve about 4,700 students. Participating organi-
zations  receive  science  curriculum  modules,  training  and  on-site  support,  materials
for  hands-on  activities,  and  a  field  trip  and  Family  Day  at  the  Museum.  The  clubs
emphasize  informal  learning  that  builds  curiosity  and  encourages  teamwork.  Out-
of-school  time  science  programs  are  associated  with  more  positive  attitudes  toward
science and increased interest in science careers.7

In  the  second  level,  teens  in  the  Science  Minors  youth  development  program  at-
tend  10  weeks  of  science  education  and  training  by  Museum  staff  and  outside  sci-
entists  and  volunteer  to  demonstrate  science  experiments  for  Museum  guests.
Throughout  their  work,  Science  Minors  gain  a  better  understanding  of  science,  a
first-hand look at science career opportunities, and public speaking skills. Since the
program’s debut in 2003, about 400 teens have participated.

In  the  third  and  most  engaging  level,  Science  Achievers  deepen  their  work  with
the Museum by pursuing more rigorous science topics and preparing for college and
careers.  These  teens  participate  in  internships,  mentor  new  classes  of  Science  Mi-
nors and even facilitate Science Minors Clubs themselves. They have access to more
advanced  science  experiences  and  receive  additional  college  and  career  readiness.
This  program  is  based  on  research  that  indicates  programs  that  incorporate  role

7 National  Research  Council.  (2009).  Learning  Science  in  Informal  Environments:  People,
Places,  and  Pursuits.  Committee  on  Learning  Science  in  Informal  Environments.  Philip  Bell,
Bruce  Lewenstein,  Andrew  W.  Shouse,  and  Michael  A.  Feder,  editors.  Board  on  Science  Edu-
cation,  Center  for  Education,  Division  of  Behavioral  and  Social  Sciences  and  Education.  Wash-
ington, DC: The National Academies Press.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

32

models,  internships,  and  college-preparation  activities  have  been  shown  to  increase
self-confidence  and  interest  in  STEM  courses  and  careers,  as  well  as  improving
science knowledge and skills and graduation rates.8,9,10

The  Museum’s  community  programs  are  designed  as  a  pipeline  that  feed  each
other.  Students  in  science  clubs  can  join  Science  Minors  as  teens  and  go  on  to  be-
come  Science  Achievers,  where  they  have  the  chance  to  go  back  and  facilitate  a
science club, creating a cycle that connects to the community. Students credit these
programs with showing them the range of science careers that exist, teaching them
to  be  effective  public  speakers  and  demonstrating  the  benefits  of  teamwork.  After-
school program providers credit the program with exposing younger children to new
ideas and opportunities. Here’s some of the feedback we’ve received:

‘‘Science  is  a  challenge  for  our  students,  but  the  moment  they  get  into  it,  be-
cause  it’s  so  fun  and  hands-on  and  interactive,  they  look  forward  to  it.  After
school,  they  expect  to  have  fun,  but  this  program  lets  them  learn,  too.  When
they  love  what  they  do  here,  that  feeling  transfers  over  to  what  they’re  doing
in school.’’
—Jose Sanchez, Senior Program Director, Miracle Center, Chicago

School Group Programs

Children are drawn to engaging, hands-on learning opportunities that allow them
to  explore  new  ideas  at  their  own  pace.  School  groups  visiting  the  Museum  of
Science and Industry participate in inquiry-based Learning Labs, which use the Mu-
seum’s captivating spaces to investigate the science behind everyday life.

Learning  Labs  provide  facilitated,  focused,  engaging  learning  experiences  for
school  groups.  Over  16,000  students  each  year  in  grades  3  through  12  participate
in hands-on sessions led by Museum educators that are aligned with Illinois Learn-
ing  Standards  in  science.  Learning  Labs  have  pre-  and  post-visit  activities  along
with  additional  resources  to  enhance  what  students  learn  once  they  return  to  their
classroom. Topics include renewable energy (where students build hydrogen fuel cell
cars  to  discover  how  some  of  the  latest  renewable  energy  resources  work)  and  ad-
vanced forensics (where students use techniques such as DNA analysis, forensic an-
thropology and trace evidence analysis to solve a crime).

The  Museum’s  popular  videoconference  program  connects  an  on-site  classroom  of
students  with  three  other  remote  locations  anywhere  in  the  world.  This  technology
is a unique way to provide students on field trips with access to real science profes-
sionals.  Live  . . .  from  the  Heart,  the  Museum’s  premiere  videoconferencing  pro-
gram,  offers  students  in  grades  8  through  12  a  dramatic  exploration  of  the  human
heart. Students watch live open-heart surgery being done at a Chicago-area hospital
and  talk  to  the  surgical  team,  ask  questions  about  the  procedure,  get  tips  on  keep-
ing  their  heart  healthy  and  find  out  about  exciting  careers  in  medicine.  Since  the
program debuted in 2003, more than 17,000 students have participated. Demand for
the program is high; all sessions are booked before the school year begins, and more
than 40 schools are on the waiting list.

Civic Leadership in Advancing Science Education

Building  on  its  robust  set  of  programs,  the  Museum  of  Science  and  Industry  is
leading  a  collaborative  effort  to  broadly  impact  science  education.  Science  Chicago
is  a  collaboration  of  more  than  140  public  and  private  institutions  that  have  come
together  to  present  the  world’s  largest  science  celebration.  Designed  to  awaken  the
inner  scientist  in  each  and  every  one  of  us,  thousands  of  dynamic  and  interactive
activities  provide  hands-on  learning;  spur  thoughtful  debate;  enhance  classroom
learning;  and  build  enthusiasm  for  the  pursuit  of  cutting-edge  science  while  estab-
lishing the critical value of science and math education.

Our  vision  is  to  awaken  Chicagoans  to  the  wonders  of  our  region’s  scientific  re-
sources  and  the  importance  of  science  to  our  future.  We  have  worked  to  create  a
strategic framework connecting people, organizations, and opportunities to Chicago’s
wealth of science and technology resources. Our goal is to accomplish this vision by

8 Darke, K., Clewell, B., & Sevo, R. (2002). Meeting the challenge: The impact of the National
Science  Foundation’s  Program  for  Women  and  Girls.  Journal  of  Women  and  Minorities  in
Science and Engineering, 8(3/4), 285–303.

9 Degenhart, S.H., Wingenbach, G.J., Dooley, K.E., Lindner, J.R., Mowen, D.L., & Johnson, L.
(2007).  Middle  school  students’  attitudes  toward  pursuing  careers  in  science,  technology,  engi-
neering and math. NACTA Journal, 51(1), 52–60.

10 Building  Engineering  and  Science  Talent.  (2004).  What  it  takes:  Pre-K–12  design  principles
to  broaden  participation  in  science,  technology,  engineering,  and  mathematics.  Available  at
www.bestworkforce.org/publications.htm

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

creating an organizational and programmatic framework to achieve five overarching
goals:

33

• Engage  young  people  in  the  fun,  excitement  and  awe  of  science  and  inspire

them to consider careers in science and technology fields.

• Raise  awareness  of  the  importance  of  science  in  everyday  life  in  the  minds

of students, their parents and teachers—and thereby, the public at large.
• Enlighten Chicagoans to the region’s vast science and technology assets.
• Encourage partnership and collaboration between and among the science and

technology community and our target audience.

• Raise  Chicago’s  profile  as  a  national  leader  in  science  and  technology,  and
promote  the  message  that  our  city  and  region  can  and  will  continue  to  pros-
per because we are committed to supporting science and technology.

With the network built by the Museum of Science and Industry and the over 140
partner institutions that are part of Science Chicago, we have propelled the richness
of  our  region’s  scientific  resources  to  the  forefront  of  public  awareness  and  tapped
the advantages of connecting students and teachers to resources in the real and vir-
tual  world  through  the  web.  We  share  an  understanding  of  the  critical  importance
of  content-prepared  teachers  in  science  classrooms  and  strategies  to  improve  the
prevalence of such teachers in the Chicago Public Schools.

Our  opportunity  now  is  to  leverage  the  strength  of  the  Science  Chicago  partner-
ships  and  resources  to  enhance  the  quality  of  science  instruction  in  the  Chicago
Public  Schools  while  continuing  to  serve  as  an  important  bridge  between  students,
families and communities and the rich scientific resources of the region. Fundamen-
tally, our goal is to provide broad opportunity to exceptional science achievement by
ensuring  that  CPS  science  curriculum  is  aligned  with  national  and  international
science  achievement  benchmarks  and  assessment,  supporting  CPS  curriculum  with
quality  and  well-aligned  professional  development  programs,  and  aligning  and
building access pathways to external resources.

Assessing Museums’ Impact and Role

The  Museum  of  Science  and  Industry  is  committed  to  evaluating  the  success  of
our educational programs. We have partnered with the Chapin Hall Center for Chil-
dren at the University of Chicago to assess the real impact our programs are having
on  student  achievement,  and  Chapin  Hall  has  submitted  a  grant  to  the  National
Science Foundation to help fund this effort.

Educational programs provide a platform for museums to provide credible leader-
ship  in  addressing  the  larger  issues  facing  the  advancement  of  science  education.
With  other  museums,  educators,  universities  and  civic  leaders,  the  Museum  of
Science and industry is committed to addressing this challenge in a meaningful, sus-
tained manner. This means that we have committed people and resources to the pol-
icy  evaluation  and  collaboration  that  will  be  required  to  move  this  issue  of  advanc-
ing science education from talk to action.

BIOGRAPHY FOR ANDREA J. INGRAM

Andrea  Ingram,  appointed  in  2006,  serves  as  Vice  President  for  Education  and
Guest  Services  at  the  Museum  of  Science  and  Industry.  Ms.  Ingram  is  responsible
for  providing  strategic  vision  and  organizational  management  of  division’s  four  de-
partments:  Center  for  the  Advancement  of  Science  Education,  Science  Chicago,
Guest  Experiences  and  Guest  Operations.  All  staff,  contractors  and  volunteers  re-
sponsible for engaging with guests report to this division. In addition to all revenue
and  retail  based  operations,  the  division’s  work  includes  developing  and  delivering
experiences grounded in museum content through professional development of mid-
dle  school  science  teachers;  community  based  initiatives  serving  4000  youth
throughout Chicago; Learning Lab experiences targeting nearly 300,000 annual stu-
dent guests, and facilitated exhibit and venue based experiences for Museum’s near-
ly  1.5  million  annual  guests.  The  division’s  programming  also  provides  a  platform
for  the  Museum’s  leadership  role  in  advancing  science  education  through  public
awareness  and  engagement  initiatives  such  as  Science  Chicago  as  well  as  partner-
ships with local school districts to improve student access and opportunity to science
achievement and careers.

Prior  to  joining  the  Museum,  Ms.  Ingram  received  an  appointment  to  the  execu-
tive  management  team  of  the  Illinois  Department  of  Children  and  Family  Services
where  she  played  a  critical  role  in  major  strategic  decisions  and  was  instrumental
in  the  development  and  implementation  of  system  wide  initiatives.  Prior  to  her  ap-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

34

pointment at the State, Ingram worked at Voices for Illinois Children as the Direc-
tor  of  the  Budget  &  Tax  Policy  Initiative.  Ingram  joined  Voices  after  a  decade  of
practicing law in a business law firm in San Francisco in which she became a part-
ner.  She  has  litigated  cases  in  state  and  federal  court  involving  contracts,  real  es-
tate transactions, intellectual property, financial fraud, employment law, and bank-
ruptcy and has significant trial experience.

Ingram holds a J.D. from the University of California, Davis and a B.A. in Justice
from  The  American  University  in  Washington,  D.C.  She  is  licensed  to  practice  law
in both Illinois and California.

Chair LIPINSKI. Thank you. Ready for Mr. Lippincott.

STATEMENT  OF  MR.  ROBERT  M.  LIPPINCOTT,  SENIOR  VICE
PRESIDENT  FOR  EDUCATION,  THE  PUBLIC  BROADCASTING
SERVICE (PBS)
Mr.  LIPPINCOTT.  Good  morning,  Chairman  Lipinski,  Ranking
Member  Ehlers,  and  esteemed  Members  of  the  Subcommittee.  My
name  is  Rob  Lippincott,  and  I  am  Senior  Vice  President  for  Edu-
cation at PBS. As a former teacher, I greatly appreciate the oppor-
tunity  to  address  the  most  effective  role  of  informal  environments
in STEM education.

Public  Broadcasting  was  founded  to  lead  in  informal  education
on  the  air,  online,  on  the  ground,  guided  by  research,  and  actively
supporting  educators.  On  the  air,  Public  Broadcasting  has  been  a
leader  in  educational  television  for  more  than  50  years.  Available
free  of  charge  to  99  percent  of  Americans’  television  households,
PBS reaches more than 65 million people, 14 million of them kids,
each  week,  inviting  them  to  experience  the  worlds  of  science,  his-
tory, and public affairs.

Informal  science  education  begins  with  our  award-winning
science  television  programs,  some  of  which  you  may  recognize:
NOVA,  Nature,  Design  Squad,  Curious  George,  and  most  recently,
Sid the Science Kid. We even have Neil deGrasse Tyson, named the
sexiest astrophysicist alive by People magazine, hosting our NOVA
scienceNow magazine.

However, TV is only a small part of the informal education story.
Broadband  access  is  dramatically  changing  the  opportunities  for
the Nation’s educators to improve STEM education. I want to share
two examples of how PBS is trying to use the web to support infor-
mal  education,  PBS  Kids  GO!,  what  we  call  a  broadband  channel,
and  a  project  we  call  EDCAR,  the  Educational  Digital  Content
Asset Repository.

PBS  Kids  GO!  is  an  online  media  portal  which  includes  full-
length TV episodes, clips and games. I believe that this is the first
glimpse of what television may look like for all ages very soon.

[Video]
As  you  can  see,  kids  are  not  just  watching  TV  but  playing  with
the  characters,  learning  through  games,  and  exploring  ideas.  This
set of tools is a powerful first step in building STEM-savvy citizens.
We need to give students at every age and their teachers increased
resources to this kind of multi-modal learning.

EDCAR  is  a  database  of  video  and  digital  resources  created  by
public  media  producers  and  our  partners  in  museum,  university,
and  research  communities.  By  collecting  and  organizing  the  re-
sources  and  then  aligning  them  to  learning  standards,  we  create

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

35

the  best  STEM  learning  tools  for  use  at  home,  at  school,  and  in
every learning setting.

The first offering that we are creating is based on STEM for the
middle school. A teacher might use this kind of a lesson structured
with  an  introduction  and  objectives  to  select  a  learning  chunk  of
video,  a  small  clip  that  has  been  cut  to  introduce—in  this  case  a
lesson  on  the  hydrosphere,  a  video  called  ‘‘Where  is  the  water?’’  or
the teacher might select a very different kind of video asset or dig-
ital  asset,  this  one  based  on  two  different  images,  one  of  the  Muir
glacier  in  August  of  1941,  the  other  in  August  of  2004,  which  in
fact  might  lead  students  to  want  to  look  up  this  map  of  Arctic  ice.
To truly make a difference in informal education efforts, we have
developed a 360-degree approach to children, literally trying to sur-
round  them  at  home,  school,  and  at  play  with  learning  opportuni-
ties  in  media.  We  are  working  to  duplicate  this  success  across
STEM  disciplines.  Recent  findings  from  rigorous  studies  on
SuperWhy!  and  Between  the  Lions  show  clear  and  measurable
gains  in  every  area  targeted.  This  shows  that  PBS  is  able  to  use
media  to  move  the  needle  and  improve  abilities  of  kids  to  learn.
Again,  we  will  be  working  to  duplicate  this  success  that  we  have
had  with  literacy  across  STEM  disciplines.  Of  course,  if  we  really
want  to  change  learning,  both  informal  and  formal  in  a  lasting
way,  we  need  to  prepare  our  teachers  and  caregivers  so  they  are
equipped  and  excited  about  sharing  science.  Through  PBS
TeacherLine,  an  online  professional  development  program,  we  are
building  a  how-to  course  for  caregivers  and  early  preschool  and
after-school teachers.

[Video]
The  reception  of  this  course  has  been  exceptional.  For  example,
North  Dakota  has  approved  this  course  for  its  childcare  providers,
and this is working also in Arizona, Illinois, Louisiana, Minnesota,
Tennessee  and  Texas.  This  kind  of  anywhere,  anytime,  pajama-
compatible  professional  development  is  critical,  and  the  consistent
theme  across  all  of  what  we  are  doing  is  partnership,  and  I  would
be happy to explain more.

Thank you very much.
[The prepared statement of Mr. Lippincott follows:]
PREPARED STATEMENT OF ROBERT M. LIPPINCOTT

Good  morning,  Chairman  Lipinski,  Ranking  Member  Ehlers  and  esteemed  Mem-
bers  of  the  Subcommittee.  My  name  is  Rob  Lippincott,  and  I  am  Senior  Vice  Presi-
dent—Education  for  PBS—the  Public  Broadcasting  Service.  As  a  former  teacher,  I
greatly  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  answer  some  of  what  I  consider  to  be  one  of
the most important questions in education today—what is the most effective role of
informal environments in STEM Education?

There  has  never  been  a  more  critical  time  for  both  formal  and  informal  science
education and the continuing need to improve the quality of math and science edu-
cation we provide our young people. Public broadcasting was founded to lead in the
development of educational media, particularly informal education.

I will use my time today to give you a few digital glimpses of some of the impor-

tant work PBS and the public media community is doing with respect to:

• The role of digital and electronic media in educating students
Æ ‘‘on the air’’ with our traditional television programming;
Æ ‘‘online’’ with some very exciting new media programming.

• The  role  informal  education  plays  in  broadening  participation  and  promoting

diversity in STEM fields

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

36

Æ ‘‘on the ground’’ with a ‘‘360 degree’’ approach to community engagement;
Æ Impact of research to build, deliver and assess programs;
Æ The  importance  of  teacher  professional  development  to  raise  teacher  ef-

fectiveness.

• The role of partnerships with formal and informal education institutions.

The Role Digital and Electronic Media in STEM Education—On the Air

PBS’  best  known  role  in  informal  education  is  an  open,  universally  available
broadcast  invitation,  designed  to  do  exactly  what  the  newest  of  the  6  Strands  of
Science  Learning  recommends  in  the  recent  National  Academies  of  Science  study—
Learning Science in Informal Environments: People, Places, and Pursuits: to ‘‘experi-
ence  excitement,  interest,  and  motivation  to  learn  about  phenomena  in  the  natural
and physical world.’’

We  like  to  say  that  ‘‘we  educate  with  everything  that  we  do’’  and  as  a  system-
wide survey shows, more than 97 percent of the 174 Public Broadcasting Service li-
censees  use  technology  to  deliver  education  services.  For  instance,  Alabama  Public
television offers every teacher in the state access to an array of media resources and
professional development in a web service called ‘‘APTPlus.’’

There  are  many  more  examples  as  public  broadcasting  has  been  a  leader  in  edu-
cational  television  for  more  than  50  years.  With  its  356  member  stations  and  our
partnerships  with  community  organizations  and  institutions  of  higher  education  in
virtually every state in the Nation, PBS offers all Americans the opportunity to ex-
plore  new  ideas  and  new  worlds  through  television  and  online  content.  Available
free  of  charge  to  99  percent  of  America’s  television  households,  PBS  reaches  more
than  65  million  people  each  week—14  million  of  them  children—and  invites  them
to experience the worlds of science, history, nature and public affairs.

Among the many award winning science television programs you may recognize—
NOVA,  Nature,  Design  Squad,  Curious  George,  and,  most  recently,  Sid  the  Science
Kid—are leaders and models. We even have Neil deGrasse Tyson, named the ‘‘sexi-
est astrophysicist alive’’ by People magazine, hosting NOVA scienceNow.

The Role of Digital and Electronic Media in STEM Education—Online

Television  and  on-air  programs,  however,  are  a  small  part  of  the  entire  informal
education  story.  Online  broadband  access  and  digital  media  is  dramatically  chang-
ing the opportunities and challenges the Nation’s educators have to improve STEM
education.

PBS  has  two  new  online  initiatives  which  I  find  compelling:  the  PBS  Kids  GO!
Broadband ‘‘channel’’ and a project we call EDCAR, the Educational Digital Content
Asset Repository.

The online sites which collectively comprise www.pbskids.org draw a growing au-
dience—now over nine million two- to eight-year-olds every month. The latest exper-
iment with the six- to eight-year-olds in this audience is called PBS Kids GO!, which
presents an online media portal including full length TV episodes, clips and games.
I believe that this is the first glimpse of what ‘‘television’’ will look like for all ages
soon. Let me show you a short sample: (PBS Kids GO! Clip).

As  you  can  see,  kids  are  not  just  watching  TV,  but  playing  with  the  characters,
learning through games and exploring ideas—this set of tools is a powerful first step
in building STEM savvy citizens!

I believe that we need to give students at every age and their teachers increased
access to this kind of learning resource. EDCAR is the project to build a comprehen-
sive  public  media  database  of  the  video  and  related  digital  resources  that  public
media  producers  and  our  partners  in  the  museum,  university,  media  and  research
communities  are  creating  across  the  Nation.  By  collecting,  organizing  and  aligning
these  resources  to  learning  standards,  we  can  create  the  best  STEM  learning  tools
for  use  in  school,  at  home  and  in  every  learning  setting.  This  project  is  underway
with several dozen PBS stations and their partners. Let me give a very brief exam-
ple of some work we are testing with teachers: (EDCAR clip).

Research has shown the promise of systems like this and PBS is pursuing a first
offering  focused  on  STEM  skills  for  middle  school  learners.  PBS  and  stations  need
a  core  of  national  standards—in  the  words  of  the  Council  of  Chief  State  School  Of-
fers—‘‘fewer,  higher,  clearer’’  academic  standards  to  focus  upon.  And  we  need  the
help  of  the  educational  research  community  to  reveal  the  most  critical  goals  and
best practices for us to target.

EDCAR  will  provide  a  unified  reservoir  of  online  content  and  services,  accessible
and  relevant  to  all  of  America’s.  These  materials  are  produced  by  producers,  mem-
ber stations and partners across the public media community. The individual media

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

37

assets and the array of related media which comprises their educational context, of-
fers every teacher and student a comprehensive curricular supplement in every sub-
ject from pre-school, to elementary school and through secondary school. The service
is  presented  locally.  It  is  designed  to  assist  educators  achieve  measurable  improve-
ments in student achievement and be consistent and supportive of the standards set
by State and local educators.

With each member station working with the corresponding State education agen-
cy, all of the content will be directed to the most critical targets of each community’s
instructional core—with particular focus on those students at risk in our urban and
rural  areas.  The  State  education  agencies  will  provide  the  standards  which  the
media  addresses  and  will  lead  the  implementation  of  the  media  services  in  its
schools  and  classrooms.  The  learning  goals  identified  by  the  State  education  agen-
cies will specify the digital media produced by public media providers to fill out the
repository, allowing teachers in every part of the country to find and effectively use
the content that meets their students’ learning needs.

Role of Informal Education in Broadening Participation and Promoting Di-

versity—On the Ground

But  in  order  to  truly  make  a  difference  in  informal  educational  efforts,  we  also
need to go well beyond the ‘‘push’’ technologies of television and online program de-
livery. Our best example is PBS Kids Raising Readers which targets early childhood
literacy  where  our  best  evidence  of  learning  gains  come  from  what  we  have  called
a  ‘‘360  degree’’  approach  to  children—literally  surrounding  them  at  home,  school
and  at  play  with  learning  opportunities  and  media.  We  hope  to  duplicate  this  suc-
cess across STEM disciplines.

PBS  KIDS  Raising  Readers  literacy  initiative,  generously  supported  by  the  U.S.
Department  of  Education  in  a  partnership  with  the  Corporation  for  Public  Broad-
casting  targeted  specifically  at  under-served  populations  and  minority  groups.  Ap-
pendix A reveals a full discussion of how PBS stations partner with schools, colleges
and  community  organizations  nationwide  (Public  Television  Stations:  A  Trusted
Source for Educating America, Jan. 2008).

The  long-term  goal  is  to  achieve  measurable  results  in  improving  literacy  skills
of  children  in  low-income  families.  We  are  working  in  20  low  socioeconomic  strata
markets  in  order  to  build  successful  models  that  can  be  replicated  across  the  coun-
try.  PBS  is  also  eager  to  spread  this  success  to  STEM—to  use  these  proven  best
practices in programming and engagement to broaden participation and promote di-
versity in every STEM discipline and field of activity.

The Role of Research

Educational  media  providers  have  learned  to  base  all  of  their  programming  on
learning  research,  rigorously  testing  every  part  of  broadcast  and  online  offerings.
They  must  also  now  work  with  states  to  align  media  with  recognized  curricula  and
State  standards  to  ensure  that  these  materials  are  suited  for  use  in  formal  as  well
as informal settings.

PBS  measures  the  impact  of  its  children’s  series  to  ensure  that  they  are  accom-
plishing  their  goals.  Very  recent  findings  from  key  studies  on  two  children’s  series
designed  to  teach  early  literacy  skills—SuperWhy!  and  Between  the  Lions—show
clear,  measurable  gains  in  every  area  targeted.  The  test  results  show  that  PBS  is
able  to  move  the  needle  and  improve  the  abilities  of  kids  to  learn.  Again,  we  will
be working to duplicate this success with literacy in targeted STEM disciplines.

The Role of Teacher Professional Development

But  if  we  want  to  change  learning—both  formal  and  informal—in  a  lasting  way,
we  need  to  prepare  our  teachers  and  care  givers  so  that  they  are  equipped  and  ex-
cited  about  sharing  science.  We  need  to  invite  them  to  become  guides  and  coaches
for learners and teachers of every STEM field.

We  have  some  history  in  teacher  professional  development,  but  our  most  recent
work  is  what  I  find  the  most  promising.  Most  recently,  we  are  building  ‘‘how  to’’
courses  for  pre-school  and  after-school  teachers—caregivers,  parents  and  early  edu-
cators—to help them make every environment a learning environment. Let me show
you  just  a  moment  of  what  teachers  see:  (PBS  TeacherLine  ‘‘setting  up  your  room’’
clip).

PBS  TeacherLine,  an  online  professional  development  program  funded  through  a
U.S. Department of Education Ready to Teach grant, has the goal of making profes-
sional development accessible, affordable and engaging for teachers and care givers.
I  believe  that  this  kind  of  ‘‘anytime/anywhere’’  professional  development—we  have

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

38

called it ‘‘pajama-compatible’’ can help inspire and guide formal and informal STEM
learning at every age and in every discipline.

We  offer  more  than  135  courses—35  in  Science  disciplines  and  35  in  Math.  We
work  with  23  colleges  and  universities  in  all  50  states,  through  66  PBS  stations.
(See  Appendix  B  for  a  selected  list  of  PBS  TeacherLine  partner  universities  and
community  organizations).  More  than  42,000  educators  have  taken  a  course  since
2004. Graduate credit-bearing courses help teachers remain certified. A growing set
of tools support teacher leaders in their professional learning communities. Recently
published  research  (in  the  Journal  of  Computing  in  Teacher  Education,  Fall  2008)
attests  to  the  effectiveness  of  this  medium  to  build  teachers’  ‘‘competence  and  con-
fidence in instructional technology integration.’’

The Role of Partnerships

A  consistent  theme  I  hope  you  have  heard  is  ‘‘partnership.’’  PBS  and  its  member
stations are only part of any collective effort to build a scientifically literate commu-
nity.  The  federal  partnership  is  crucial  in  this  process.  PBS  has  received  generous
support  from  the  Department  of  Education  for  our  Ready  to  Learn  and  Ready  to
Teach  initiatives.  Last  year  the  Ready  to  Compete  Act  which  reauthorizes  both  of
these programs, was introduced by Congressman John Yarmuth from Kentucky. We
hope it will be introduced again in this new Congress and receive the strong support
we believe it deserves.

The  kind  of  research,  truly  a  scientific  discipline  and  a  burdensome  cost  to  pro-
ducers,  is  critical  to  establishing  the  techniques  and  practices  public  media  pro-
ducers need to serve educational goals. We continue to need academic and research
partners  in  universities  and  key  government  agencies,  including  the  National
Science Foundation, the National Institutes for Health, NASA, and NOAA. We have
good  working  relationships  with  each  of  these  agencies  and  strongly  support  their
programs.

Conclusion

I hope I have helped to make a case today for the importance of the role informal
environments play as well as the urgency of the effort to target science, technology,
engineering  and  mathematics  learning.  I  see  this  as  one  of  the  most  vital  roles  the
public  media  community  has  to  play:  on  the  air,  online,  on  the  ground,  guided  by
research, and actively supporting educators.

There is very promising evidence that media is a powerful way to facilitate learn-
ing in and out of the classroom. We need to apply the lessons we have learning pro-
ducing  appealing  television  programs,  effective  educational  media  resources  and
‘‘360  degree’’  community  engagement  for  topics  like  literacy  to  the  urgent  problems
of STEM education.

I want to close by once again expressing my appreciation to the Subcommittee for
the  opportunity  to  appear  today  to  discuss  the  role  of  informal  science  education.
The  Academies’  new  report  suggests  that  there  is  strong  evidence  that  we  are  on
the  right  track.  But  I  think  we  would  all  agree  that  we  still  have  a  long  way  to
go to ensure all of our students have the scientific and technical literacy and know-
how  needed  to  compete  in  today’s  highly  competitive  marketplace.  PBS  and  its
members  are  committed  to  playing  an  appropriate  role  using  our  resources  and  ac-
cess via the audiences we serve.

Thank you.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Appendix A

39

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

40

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

41

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

42

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

43

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

44

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

45

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

46

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

47

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

APPENDIX B

48

PBS TEACHERLINE STATION PARTNERSHIPS

Arizona—ASSET–Eight/KAET, Tempe
Arizona Teachers Excellence Program
School Readiness Council, Maricopa County
CCS Presentation Systems (statewide mobile training labs)
Qwest Foundation in Education

Arkansas Educational Television Network, Conway

Arkansas Department of Education
College Credit Partners:
University of Central Arkansas

Colorado—Rocky Mountain PBS, Denver

Colorado  Department  of  Education,  Office  of  Standards  and  Achievement  Sup-
port
Colorado Department of Education, English Language Acquisition Unit
Centennial BOCES, Learning Services
Northwest Consortium for Professional Development
Colorado Association of Science Teachers
Pueblo City Schools
Denver Public Schools, ProComp Office
Public Television Stations:
KTSC, Pueblo/Colorado Springs
KRMJ, Grand Junction
College Credit Partners:
University of Colorado at Colorado Springs

District of Columbia—WHUT

Howard University, School of Education
WHUR–FM

Florida—WLRN, Miami

Miami-Dade School District
Academica, Inc.
Public Television Station Partners:
WXEL, West Palm Beach, FL
WMTJ, San Juan, Puerto Rico
College Credit Partners:
Nova Southeastern University

Illinois—WSIU, Carbondale

Southern Illinois University, College of Education

Indiana Public Broadcasting Stations/WFYI, Indianapolis

Indianapolis Public Schools
Indiana College Network
Indiana Department of Education
Indiana Humanities Council’s Smart Desktop
ISTEM
Indiana Computer Educators

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

49

Public Television & Radio Station Partners:
WTIU–TV and WFIU radio, Bloomington
WNIN–TV and WNIN radio, Evansville
WFWA–TV, Fort Wayne
WFYI radio, Indianapolis
WYIN–TV, Merrillville
WIPB–TV, Muncie
WNIT–TV, South Bend/Elkhart
WVUT–TV, Vincennes
WBAA radio, West Lafayette
College Credit Partners:
Marian College

Iowa Public Television, Johnston

College Credit Partners:
Drake University

Louisiana Public Broadcasting, Baton Rouge
Associated Professional Educators of Louisiana
Louisiana Federation of Teachers

Maryland Public Television, Owings Mills

Anne Arundel County Public Schools
St. Mary’s County Public Schools
Washington County Public Schools
Baltimore City County Public Schools
Archdiocese of Baltimore Private Schools
Worcester County Department of Professional Development
Allegany County Public School

Massachusetts—WGBY, Springfield
Hampshire Regional School District
Easthampton Public Schools
Massachusetts Department of Education, Office of Instructional Technology
Public Television Station Partners:
Vermont Public Television
Connecticut Public Television
College Credit Partners:
Merrimack College
Westfield State College

Michigan—WKAR, East Lansing

Michigan  Department  of  Education,  Office  of  Early  Childhood  Education  and
Family Services
Michigan 4–C Association
Ingham County Health Department, Office for Young Children
Ingham Intermediate School District
Capitol Area Community Services Head Start

Mississippi Public Broadcasting, Jackson

Canton Public School District
Leake County School District
South Delta School District
Yazoo County School District

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

50

College Credit Partners:
Mississippi College

Nevada—Vegas PBS

Clark County School District, Licensed Personnel Department

Nevada—KNPB, Reno

Washoe County School District
Elko County School District
Western Nevada Regional Training Program
Northwest Regional Professional Development Program
Northern Nevada Mathematics Council
College Credit Partners:
University of Nevada–Reno, College of Education

New Hampshire Public Television, Durham

New Hampshire Department of Education
New Hampshire Local Education Support Center Network
New Hampshire Regional Professional Development Centers
College Credit Partners:
Plymouth State University

New Jersey Network, Trenton

New Jersey Department of Education

New Mexico—KNME, Albuquerque

New Mexico Public Education Department Rural Education Bureau
New Mexico Division of Higher Education
College Credit Partners:
University of New Mexico

North Dakota—Prairie Public Broadcasting, Fargo

North Central Council for School Television
North Dakota Department of Public Instruction, State Title I Office
Lakes and Prairies Child Care Resource and Referral
Children  and  Family  Services  Division  of  the  North  Dakota  Department  of
Human Services
College Credit Partners:
North Dakota State University
Minnesota State University, Moorhead

New York—WNED, Buffalo

Science Teachers Association of New York (STANYS)
Reading/Language Arts Association
New York State Mathematics Association
ECLIPSE Science Coordinators
BOCES Model School Coordinators
New York State Teacher Centers
New York State Department of Education
Public Television Station Partners:
WMHT, Albany/Schenectady
WSKG, Binghamton
WLIW, Long Island

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

51

WNET, New York
WCFE, Plattsburgh
WXXI, Rochester
WCNY, Syracuse
WPBS, Watertown

Ohio—WVIZ, Cleveland

Tri-County Educational Service Center
Logan County Educational Service Center
Cuyahoga County Educational Service Center
Cuyahoga Special Education Service Center
Greater Cleveland Educational Development Center
Public Television Station Partners:
Think TV, Dayton
WOUB and ETSEO, Athens
WCET, Cincinnati
WGBU, Bowling Green
WOSU/WPBO, Columbus/Portsmouth
WGTE, Toledo
College Credit Partners:
Ashland University
Cleveland State University
The University of Akron

Pennsylvania—WQLN, Erie

Northwest Tri-County Intermediate Unit
Northwest Regional Key (supports PA Early Learning Keys to Quality)

Pennsylvania—WITF, Harrisburg
Capital Area Intermediate Unit

South Carolina ETV, Columbia

South Carolina Department of Education
Public Television Station Partners:
Georgia Public Broadcasting, Atlanta
UNC–TV, Research Triangle Park, NC

Tennessee—Nashville Public Television

Tennessee Department of Education, Office of Early Learning
Metro Nashville Public Schools
Public Television Station Partner:
WLJT, West Tennessee State University
College Credit Partner:
Tennessee State University

Texas—KLRU, Austin & KLRN, San Antonio

Texas Computer Education Association
Texas  Education  Agency,  Division  of  Advanced  Academics/Gifted  and  Talented
Public Television Station Partners:
KACV, Amarillo
KEDT, Corpus Christi
KERA, Dallas
KMBH, Harlingen

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

52

KUHT, Houston
KNOT, Killeen
KTXT, Lubbock
KOCV, Odessa
KWBU, Waco

Virginia—WHRO, Norfolk

Virginia Society for Technology in Education
Virginia Department of Education
Public Television Station Partners:
MHz Networks, Falls Church
WVPT, Harrisonburg
WCVE, Richmond
WBRA, Roanoke
College Credit Providers:
James Madison University

Wisconsin Educational Communications Board, Madison

College Credit Partners:
Viterbo University

BIOGRAPHY FOR ROBERT M. LIPPINCOTT

As PBS Senior Vice President for Education, Mr. Lippincott is responsible for the
development and delivery of public media educational programming and services to
teachers,  students  and  their  parents  from  PBS  through  local  public  television  sta-
tions. He directs the PBS Teachers websites and a system-wide digital media reposi-
tory. And he oversees national projects and partnerships including federal grants for
PBS  TeacherLine,  offering  online  teacher  professional  development,  and  PBS  Kids
Raising Readers, offering programs on-air, online and in the classroom to help early
learners read.

Before  Joining  PBS,  Rob  has  served  in  a  wide  variety  of  leadership  positions  in
schools and businesses building and applying media and communications technology
to education. He has been a classroom teacher, a member of the faculty of Harvard
University, Graduate School of Education and a pioneer in multi-media and Internet
design for K–12 audiences.

Most recently, Mr. Lippincott served as Senior Vice President of product develop-
ment  for  Discovery  Education,  the  newest  division  of  Discovery  Communications,
Inc.,  responsible  for  the  digital  video  streaming,  online  and  hard  copy  products  de-
veloped  for  the  home  and  school  markets.  He  was  President  and  CEO  of  the  early-
childhood  assessment  company,  Children’s  Progress,  Inc.  He  also  served  as  Senior
Vice  President  and  General  Manager  for  the  Pearson  Education  Company,  Family
Education Network. And he was Director of interactive technologies at WGBH Edu-
cational Foundation. Boston’s public broadcasting station.

Rob holds a Bachelor’s degree from Swarthmore College in Literature and a Mas-

ter’s degree in Educational Technology from Harvard University.

Chair  LIPINSKI.  Mr.  Lippincott,  I  assure  you,  it  is  not  just  chil-

dren who enjoy the multi-modal learning there. Dr. Grajal.
STATEMENT  OF  DR.  ALEJANDRO  GRAJAL,  SENIOR  VICE
PRESIDENT  FOR  CONSERVATION,  EDUCATION,  AND  TRAIN-
ING, THE CHICAGO ZOOLOGICAL SOCIETY
Dr.  GRAJAL.  Mr.  Chairman,  Members  of  the  Subcommittee,  on
behalf of the Chicago Zoological Society, I thank you for the oppor-
tunity to appear before you today.

The  mission  of  the  Society  is  to  inspire  conservation  leadership
by connecting people with wildlife and nature. The Chicago Zoolog-
ical Society operates Brookfield Zoo, one of the top zoological insti-
tutions  in  North  America.  In  addition  to  being  recognized  as  one

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

53

of  the  global  leaders  in  conservation  biodiversity,  we  are  a  major
cultural attraction with 2.1 million visitors a year and over 90,000-
member households.

Just  as  the  witnesses  in  this  hearing,  our  institution  is  deeply
concerned  about  the  failure  of  our  nation’s  science  education  sys-
tem  to  stem  the  declining  performance  of  American  students.  Just
in  our  case,  for  example,  20  percent  of  the  high  school  students  in
Illinois  are  below  grade  level  in  science.  There  are  multiple  root
causes for this underachievement in science.

I  will  focus  on  four  major  fronts  that  we  are  tackling.  One  of
them  is  providing  science  exploration  for  families  and  children  as
they  come  and  visit  our  facility.  The  second  one  is  a  possibility  of
very strong science education for teaching by partnering with large
school districts, in our case, with the Chicago Public School System.
The  third  one  is  developing  science  careers  for  minorities  and
under-served communities, and the fourth is the exploration of pos-
sibilities to measure and provide metrics for informal learning.

I  will  briefly  mention  that  zoos  provide  unique  opportunities  for
everybody  to  explore  the  natural  world  outside  the  home  and  out-
side  the  classroom.  Over  two  million  people  visit  our  zoos  a  year.
We  are  providing  special  inquiry  comparative  level  for  environ-
mental issues such as climate change and species extinctions.

I also want to mention our education partnerships to build teach-
er  scientists.  One  of  the  main  problems  is  the  national  shortage  of
fully qualified science teachers. In our area, less than four percent
of  science  teachers  actually  hold  endorsements  in  science,  and  I
don’t  think  our  area  is  any  different  than  nationwide.  But  surveys
have  shown  that  teachers  that  have  little  scientific  expertise  actu-
ally  transmit,  in  direct  or  indirect  means,  that  lack  of  confidence
to  the  students,  making  science  seem  difficult  or  unexciting.  That
problem stems at the very early stages of the classroom life.

We  train  teachers,  and  in  this  case,  we  tackled  a  very  creative
partnership with the Chicago Public School System which is one of
the  largest  and  most  complex  school  systems  in  the  country.  We
have developed extensive teacher training program that starts with
developing  the  basics  of  scientific  inquiry  from  one-credit  hour
courses  to  summer  institutes,  all  the  way  to  science  graduate
school with several colleges in the mid-west region. This is a major
institutional  initiative  that  has  included  thousands  of  teachers  in
Illinois  and  nearby  states  in  the  Great  Lakes  Region  over  the  last
three  years,  and  it  is  a  source  of  personal  institutional  pride  that
these  teachers  are  actually  inspiring  under-served  segments,  in
particular,  school-age  Hispanic  girls  and  African  American  boys
when  they  are  finding  that  science  can  be  a  life  call  and  a  career
destination.

I  also  want  to  mention  how  we  are  developing  a  Career  Ladder
for  engagement  of  minorities  and  under-served  communities.  Our
society,  as  many  other  in  the  industry,  requires  a  highly  trained
technical  workforce.  We  have  zoologists,  engineers,  researchers,
statisticians, and geneticists with a very strong background. We as
an  institution  have  identified  diversity  as  one  of  the  institutional
strategic goals, and we decided we cannot take a passive approach
in  this.  We  are  developing  a  science-based,  lifelong  learning  start-
ing  with  thousands  of  families  of  prominently  African  American

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

54

and  Hispanic  neighborhoods  with  a  very  dedicated  outreach  pro-
gram  and  developing  opportunities  for  these  inner  city  families  to
develop  nature  and  science.  A  camping  trip  in  the  Indiana  Dunes
by inner city families is a lifetime experience that opens new fron-
tiers  in  developing  and  understanding  the  natural  world  and  in-
spiring new careers in science.

Once  these  children  move  to  high  school,  we  are  developing  a
youth  science  conservation  leadership  program  that  develops  pro-
fessional  preparation  schools  that  includes  a  dress  code,  engaging
the  public  speaking  skills,  team  building,  in  addition  to  carrying
independent  science  projects.  So  they  actually  carry  these  projects
at the very early age in high school.

We  are  developing  also  metrics  for  measuring  informal  science
education.  As  a  major  provider  of  informal  science  education,  we
have  helped  to  create  the  emerging  field  of  conservation  psy-
chology, the scientific study between the reciprocal relationship be-
tween  humans  and  nature.  Our  research  questions  are  addressing
how  humans  care  about  nature  and  how  do  they  engage,  and  psy-
chological factors that affect the engagement of humans in science.
Perhaps  also  one  of  the  most  pervasive  obstacles  are  the  lack  of
common standards and benchmarks for measuring informal science
learning and education. Just as other panel members, we really are
really  needing  these  psychological  metrics  for  developing  personal
comfort and confidence in applying this education. We call actively
for this partnership to develop these benchmarks and indicators.

Mr.  Chair,  thank  you  again  for  the  opportunity  to  appear  before
this  Committee,  and  I  would  be  happy  to  answer  some  questions.
Thank you.

[The prepared statement of Dr. Grajal follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF ALEJANDRO GRAJAL

Executive Summary

The Chicago Zoological Society is a global conservation organization committed to
expanding  the  role  of  informal  environments  in  educating  students  and  the  public
about  Science,  Technology,  Engineering  and  Mathematics.  Declines  in  participation
in  science  education  by  students  and  the  public  have  multiple  root  causes.  To  stem
this decline, the Chicago Zoological Society is focusing on three major fronts:

and children;

• Providing  fun  and  exciting  opportunities  for  science  exploration  by  families
• Developing strong science training opportunities for teachers through creative
partnerships  with  formal  education  systems,  such  as  the  Chicago  Public
School System; and
• Developing  a  science  career  ladder  for  youth  and  young  professionals  for  tra-

ditional under-served communities and minorities.

As a result of these efforts, the Chicago Zoological Society has:

field of science education;

• Helped  raise  the  competency  and  confidence  of  Chicago-area  teachers  in  the
• Worked to combat low minority representation in highly-technical workplaces
and  the  lack  of  scientific  role  models  for  students  in  highly-urbanized,  eco-
nomically distressed areas;
• Engaged youth from early childhood through college to position them for aca-
demic and professional growth in science, mathematics, engineering and tech-
nology; and

• Developed a new field of study; conservation psychology.

The need is large and the stakes could not be higher: investing in informal science
education  is  crucial  to  maintain  the  world  leadership  position  of  the  United  States

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

55

in science education. Federal funding, such as the American Recovery and Reinvest-
ment Act, correctly included some funds to continue innovation for science education.
Unfortunately  for  the  Chicago  Zoological  Society,  the  bill  also  included  a  provision
prohibiting  zoos  from  accessing  or  even  competing  for  economic  stimulus  funding.
As  Congress  continues  its  deliberations,  please  consider  the  consequences  that  zoos
across our nation will face if they are unable to improve and modernize their aging
infrastructures.  At  Brookfield  Zoo,  we  stand  ready  with  a  number  of  worthy,  well-
planned  and  much-needed  infrastructure  projects  that  will  create  jobs,  help  local
small business owners and contribute to the economic recovery of our nation.

Mr.  Chairman  and  Members  of  the  Subcommittee,  on  behalf  of  the  Chicago  Zoo-
logical Society, I thank you for the opportunity to appear before you today. My name
is Alejandro Grajal, and I am Senior Vice President for Conservation, Education and
Training at the Chicago Zoological Society, based in Brookfield, Illinois.

The mission of the Chicago Zoological Society is to inspire conservation leadership
by  connecting  people  with  wildlife  and  nature.  We  define  ‘‘conservation  leaders’’  as
any  person  who  acts  on  behalf  of  the  environment  and  influences  others  to  do  so.
Our  goal  is  to  create  conservation  leaders  among  our  guests,  our  community  mem-
bers, and people around the world.

The  Chicago  Zoological  Society  operates  Brookfield  Zoo,  one  of  the  top  zoological
institutions  in  North  America.  In  addition  to  being  recognized  as  a  global  leader  in
the  practice  of  animal  care  and  well-being,  Brookfield  Zoo  is  our  state’s  most  pop-
ular outdoor cultural attraction, with 2.1 million annual visitors and 90,000 member
households.

Brookfield  Zoo  is  also  an  economic  engine  that  pumps  more  than  $150  million  a

year into the Illinois economy while supporting 2,000 jobs.

While  we  are  certainly  proud  of  our  roles  as  a  global  conservation  leader,  eco-
nomic  engine  and  top  tourism  attraction,  we  are  particularly  pleased  with  the  im-
pact  that  our  award-winning  conservation  programs  have  had  in  the  lives  of  chil-
dren throughout Chicagoland.

As  a  leading  provider  of  informal  science  learning  for  families,  school  districts,
and universities in the region, the Chicago Zoological Society is working with teach-
ers,  students,  parents  and  school  administrators  to  usher  in  a  new  era  of  informal
education.

Just  as  the  other  witnesses  at  this  hearing,  my  institution  is  deeply  concerned
about the failure of our nation’s science education system to stem the declining per-
formance of American students. Middle school and high school students are consist-
ently  out-performed  by  their  peers  in  other  developing  nations.1 The  long-term  im-
pact on individual and national success in the 21st century is imminent: a mere 15
percent  of  United  States  undergraduates  are  majoring  in  science  or  engineering
compared  to  47  percent  in  France,  50  percent  in  China,  and  67  percent  in  Singa-
pore.2

Science  literacy  is  also  a  significant  challenge  in  Chicago  and  Illinois.  Although
the  percent  of  students  participating  in  public  schools  in  Illinois  has  shown  gains
in performance in science based on standardized test scores in recent years,3 slightly
more  than  20  percent  of  public-school  students  statewide  are  below  grade  level  in
science  as  measured  in  4th  and  7th  grades.  Furthermore,  the  percent  of  students
not reaching grade level far exceeds this percent at many individual Chicago Public
Schools in Illinois.

While  student’s  underachievement  in  science  has  multiple  root  causes,  we  at  the

Chicago Zoological Society are focusing on three major fronts:

• SCIENCE EXPLORATION FOR FAMILIES AND CHILDREN: Zoo visits pro-
vide  an  inquiry-driven  experience  every  day,  through  a  fun  and  personal  ex-
ploration of science by families and children

• TEACHERS’ SCIENCE CAPACITY AND CONFIDENCE: Developing creative
partnerships  with  formal  education  systems,  such  as  the  Chicago  Public
School  System,  allows  us  to  focus  in  providing  science  training  opportunities
for teachers

1 Toward  a  Systematic  Evidence-Base  for  Science  in  Out-of-School  Time:  The  Role  of  Assess-
ment,  Hussar,  Karen,  Ed.D,  Schwartz,  Sarah,  M.Ed.,  Boiselle,  Ellen,  Ph.D.,  Noam,  Gil  G.  Ed.
D., Ph.D.

2 Augustine,  N.R.  (Chair).  (2005).  Rising  above  the  Gathering  Storm:  Energizing  and  Employ-
ing  America  for  a  Brighter  Economic  Future.  National  Academy  of  Science,  National  Academy
of Engineering, Institute of Medicine. Washington DC: National Academy Press.

3 Illinois State Achievement Test results 2007.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

56

• CAREER  BUILDING  OPPORTUNITIES  FOR  UNDER–SERVED  COMMU-
NITIES  AND  MINORITIES:  Developing  a  science-based  career  ladder  for
youth  and  young  professionals  for  traditional  under-served  communities  and
minorities with the specific objective of increasing the diversity of views about
science and the natural world.

Engaging Zoo Visitors in Scientific Discoveries

Zoos  provide  unique  opportunities  for  everyone  to  explore  the  natural  world,  de-
velop inquiries about animals and habitats, and experience science outside the home
or the school. A day at the zoo is a fun, family experience in a friendly environment.
Recent  psychological  research  has  demonstrated  that  a  walk  in  natural  open  set-
tings significantly ‘resets’ higher skills in math and reading skills.

A family day at the zoo is a personal tour for active science exploration
of  major  environmental  issues  such  as  climate  change  and  species
extinctions.

Our  immersive  exhibits  with  live  animals  in  naturalistic  settings  incite  explo-
ration  and  self-paced  learning.  For  example,  we  provide  more  than  300  zoo  chats
a  week  by  keepers,  scientists  and  interpretive  staff.  Applying  the  latest  develop-
ments in active inquiry and comparative science, we are transforming our zoo to be-
come  a  personal  tour  for  active  science  exploration  of  major  environmental  issues
such  as  climate  change  and  species  extinctions.  However,  the  science  experience
does  not  end  beyond  our  fence:  we  continue  to  communicate  science  information  to
the  general  public  and  our  members  through  our  magazine,  website,  electronic
newsletters, and public events.

Innovative  Education  Partnerships  to  Build  Teacher  Scientific  Capacities
A second strong institutional direction is our active partnerships with formal edu-
cation  systems.  One  of  our  partners  is  the  Chicago  Public  Schools.  Initially  a
daunting  challenge  for  our  institution,  our  relationship  with  the  Chicago  Public
School System has developed into an exemplary effort because it operates one of our
country’s  largest  and  most  complex  school  systems.  Chicago  mirrors  a  national
shortage  of  fully-qualified  science  teachers:  only  one  percent  of  Chicago  Public
Schools  K–12  teachers  hold  an  endorsement  in  biology  and  only  two  percent  hold
endorsements  in  environmental  science.  Overall,  only  four  percent  of  the  system’s
science  teachers  hold  endorsements  in  science.4 This  problem  also  includes  sec-
ondary and post-secondary education.5

Illinois  teachers  ranked  ‘‘knowledge  and  application  of  scientific  in-
quiry’’  and  better  application  of  ‘‘how  living  things  interact  with  each
other  and  the  environment’’  as  their  highest  priorities  for  professional
development in science.

Limited  teacher  skills  in  science  go  beyond  actual  content  knowledge:  Illinois
teachers  ranked  ‘‘knowledge  and  application  of  scientific  inquiry’’  and  better  under-
standing  and  application  of  ‘‘how  living  things  interact  with  each  other  and  with
their  environment’’  as  their  highest  priorities  for  professional  development  in
science. Working with Chicago area school districts, we have developed an extensive
teacher-training  program  in  which  we  provide  sequential  levels  of  engagement  in
science  for  these  teachers,  from  one  credit-hour  courses,  to  summer  learning  insti-
tutes,  all  the  way  to  graduate  school  in  Advanced  Inquiry  skills.  Our  program  Lev-
els of Engagement is an inclusive learning process that emphasizes raising the com-
petency and confidence of teachers in science education.

One  of  the  great  advantages  of  informal  learning  institutions  is  that  we  are  not
bound  by  rigid  assessments  of  content  milestones.  Therefore,  we  emphasize  the
measurement  of  inquiry  skills,  comparative  scientific  method,  critical  thinking,  and
competence and confidence in teaching science. This is major institutional initiative
that has included thousands of teachers in Illinois and nearby states during the last
three years.

The  potential  impacts  in  working  with  a  large  urban  system  like  Chicago  can  be
significant.  For  example,  although  78  percent  of  the  participants  were  certified  by
the  Illinois  Board  of  Education,  less  than  eight  percent  had  an  endorsement  in

4 www.learn.niu.edu/ISBE2005
5 Raizen, S., & Michelsohn, A.M. (1994). The future of science in elementary schools: Educating

prospective teachers. San Francisco: Jossey-Bass.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

57

science.  Nearly  half  of  our  participating  teachers  work  at  schools  with  90  percent
or more low-income students. Furthermore, nearly half of the schools that we work
with were on the 2007–08 State Improvement Status list with at-risk potential.

These young adults overcame their reluctance toward science and asked
‘‘What  does  it  take  to  work  at  Brookfield  Zoo?’’  They  realized  that  a
science-based  career  can  be  part  of  their  future,  an  important  attitude
turning point for this highly diverse group of students.

Beyond the numbers, it is a source of personal and institutional pride to see tradi-
tionally  under-served  segments,  such  as  high  school-age  Hispanic  girls  or  African
American  boys  discovering  how  science  can  be  a  life  call  and  a  career  destination.
Last Spring 25 students from Chicago High School for Agricultural Sciences, one of
our  partner  Chicago  Public  Schools,  spent  a  day  at  Brookfield  Zoo  shadowing  staff
in 11 areas of the zoo, including the genetics, physiology and nutrition labs, and ani-
mal  hospital.  Several  of  these  young  adults  overcame  their  reluctance  toward
science  and  actively  engaged  in  spirited  questions,  such  as  ‘‘What  does  it  take  to
work at Brookfield Zoo?’’ and ‘‘How do I become one of your professional staff?’’ They
realized that a science-based career can be part of their future, a professional turn-
ing point for this highly diverse group of students.

Beyond our engagement with school districts, we also see a fertile ground for part-
nerships  with  colleges  and  universities.  Our  university-level  partnerships  include
programs  with  Aurora  University,  Benedictine  University,  National  Lewis  Univer-
sity,  Loyola  School  of  Medicine,  University  of  Illinois,  Miami  University  in  Ohio,
Chicago State University, and Morton College.

Chicago Zoological Society’s Career Ladder Opportunities for Under-served

Communities and Minorities

A  third  and  pervasive  problem  in  science  education  is  the  low  minority  represen-
tation in the workplace, and lack of scientific role models for under-served students.
The  Chicago  Zoological  Society  requires  a  highly  trained,  technical  workforce  that
includes  zoologists,  engineers,  researchers,  statisticians,  geneticists,  and  other  posi-
tions requiring strong science backgrounds. The lack of science-trained professionals
in the zoo industry is similar to that experienced by research labs and science-driv-
en  corporations  nationwide.  But  several  years  ago  we  realized  that  we  cannot  take
the  passive  approach  of  waiting  for  these  professionals  to  show  up  in  the  market-
place. So we have started a systemic approach at nurturing a diverse cadre of future
science, technology and engineering professionals, starting at an early age and pro-
viding career—building opportunities at critical life junctions.

We  believe  that  as  a  cultural  institution  we  should  be  an  active  participant  and
an agent for change in providing these opportunities. Our proactive approach is the
Career  Ladder  for  Youth  program,  which  was  awarded  the  prestigious  Institute  for
Museum  and  Library  Services  Medal  in  2008.  This  program  starts  by  developing
after  school  programs  at  Chicago  Metropolitan  Libraries.  We  engage  thousands  of
families  with  young  children  in  predominantly  African  American  and  Hispanic
neighborhoods.  Families  and  children  experience  nature,  discover  science  skills  at
the library and we support trips to the zoo, nearby forest preserves, and the shores
of Lake Michigan.

For  most  of  these  inner  city  families,  a  camping  trip  to  the  Indiana
Dunes  National  Park  is  a  once  in  a  lifetime  experience  that  opens  new
frontiers in understanding the natural world, and inspiring new careers
in science.

Once these children move to high-school age, they are eligible to participate in our
Youth  Volunteer  program,  one  of  the  largest  and  most  competitive  science-driven
youth volunteers programs in the state. Our selection process does not take into con-
sideration  school  grades  alone,  but  also  weights  the  value  of  cultural  diverse  back-
grounds,  abilities  in  other  languages,  overcoming  social  and  cultural  obstacles,  en-
thusiasm for science and personal drive. The end result is an economically and cul-
turally diverse group of over 150 youth every year that give the zoo over 100 hours
of volunteering service.

Career Ladder for Youth participants learn crucial professional preparation skills
that  are  not  taught  frequently  at  school,  including  dress  code,  engaging  the  public,
speaking  skills,  team  building  and  how  to  carry  an  independent  science  project.
Working  with  mentors  at  the  Chicago  Zoological  Society,  youth  volunteer  science
projects  include  public  perceptions,  genetics,  animal  behaviors  and  a  wide  range  of
ideas.  We  also  coordinate  a  meeting  with  many  other  cultural  institutions  in  the

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

58

greater  Chicago  region  that  have  active  youth  volunteer  programs,  and  this  is  rap-
idly becoming the preeminent youth scientific fair in the region.

Real-life  internships  and  work-study  opportunities,  as  well  as  relations
with  professional  mentors  and  scientific  role  models,  are  essential  step-
ping stones in the development of science career paths for minorities.

Our  Career  Ladder  effort  does  not  stay  just  at  high  school.  Once  a  young  person
decides to pursue a university education in science, it is necessary to provide intern-
ship  opportunities,  professional  developments  and  clear  career  paths  beyond  the
university  system.  For  one,  it  is  essential  to  provide  paid  internships  to  continue
to attract minorities that otherwise are shifted away to other careers with perceived
higher  financial  rewards.  We  have  strengthened  our  alliances  with  over  six  univer-
sities in the region, and particularly with historically black colleges, such as Chicago
State  University,  and  with  colleges  with  strong  Hispanic  populations,  such  as  Mor-
ton College.

This economic recession has increased the need for these professional internships,
as  many  young  professionals  want  to  remain  engaged  in  science  carriers.  Career
Ladder internships not only provide opportunities but also attract role models in the
highly technical and science positions that are needed in our institution.

MEASURING  THE  EFFECTIVENESS  OF  INFORMAL  SCIENCE  EDU-

CATION

As  a  major  provider  of  informal  science  education  we  are  taking  deliberate  steps
in  developing  good  metrics  to  evaluate  informal  environments.  The  Chicago  Zoolog-
ical Society helped to create the emerging field of Conservation Psychology, the sci-
entific study of the reciprocal relationships between humans and the rest of nature.
Using  an  exciting  blend  of  social  and  natural  sciences,  conservation  psychology  has
a  strong  mission  focus  related  to  biodiversity  conservation  and  environmental  sus-
tainability. Our research questions address how humans care about nature. We also
study  how  humans  behave  towards  nature,  with  the  goal  of  creating  durable  indi-
vidual and collective behavior change. Such approach has allowed us to develop im-
portant metrics that go beyond the traditional measures of scientific content knowl-
edge. We are currently exploring further into the realm of personal competence, con-
fidence  in  science,  and  how  professional  skills  lead  to  behavior  changes  toward  the
environment.

Informal  science  education  metrics  should  go  beyond  the  traditional
measures  of  scientific  content  knowledge  and  explore  measurements  of
comparative  inquiry  skills,  problem-solving  abilities,  and  psychological
metrics in applying science skills to real-life decisions.

But  as  exciting  as  this  research  can  be,  we  are  also  finding  major  barriers  to  de-
veloping metrics for informal learning. Perhaps one obstacle has been the over-reli-
ance  on  technology  as  a  metaphor  for  scientific  progress.  We  find  that  informal
science  instruction  tends  to  overemphasize  the  use  of  complex  technical  tools,  as-
suming  that  advanced  apparatus  give  us  better  results.  But  such  approaches  tend
to overlook that one of the basic components of effective science is the development
of  strong  inquiring  questions  that  translate  into  clear  hypothesis  and  comparative
studies.  We  advocate  for  a  balance  in  measuring  scientific  skills  within  the  realm
of comparative inquiry and problem-solving.

But perhaps one of the most pervasive obstacles is the lack of common standards
or  benchmarks  in  measuring  comparative  inquiry  skills,  problem  solving  abilities,
or  psychological  metrics  to  measure  level  of  comfort  and  confidence  in  applying
science skills to real-life decisions. We actively call for partnerships with other insti-
tutions  of  higher  learning  and  informal  science  peer  institutions  to  develop  case
studies and common benchmarking indicators toward effective science education.

CONCLUSIONS

Æ Institutions such as the Chicago Zoological Society can play an important role
in  STEM  because  they  engage  families  and  children  at  an  early  age.  Each
day  at  Brookfield  Zoo  we  help  break  early  barriers  to  science  education:  We
make  science  exploration  and  inquiry  as  a  fun,  self-learning  experience  that
can stay for life.

Æ Institutions  such  as  the  Chicago  Zoological  Society  can  engage  the  formal
education  system  through  partnerships  and  provide  crucial  inquiry  skills  for
math and science teachers. The teachers who participate in our programs be-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

59

come  science  leaders  that  are  capable  of  providing  innovative  and  high-qual-
ity lessons to their students.

Æ Institutions  such  as  the  Chicago  Zoological  Society  can  actively  promote  and
support science career paths for students from under-served urban and rural
communities by engaging them early and providing them clear opportunities.
We  are  currently  providing  these  students  with  career  options  and  training
through  high  school,  college  and  professional  skills  such  as  internships  and
work study opportunities at crucial life junctures.

The need is large and the stakes could not be higher: Investing in informal science
education  is  crucial  to  maintain  the  world  leadership  position  of  the  United  States
in  science  education.  Federal  funding  opportunities  through  legislation  such  as  the
American  Recovery  and  Reinvestment  Act  correctly  included  some  funds  to  continue
innovation for, among other things, science education. Unfortunately for the Chicago
Zoological Society, the bill also included a provision prohibiting zoos from being eli-
gible to even compete for funding. As Congress continues its deliberations, it should
not  prohibit  or  otherwise  restrict  any  qualified  provider  from  eligibility  for  federal
funds because the ultimate impact is that such restrictions prevent our institutions
from being part of the solution.

Mr.  Chairman,  thank  you  again  for  the  opportunity  to  appear  before  the  Sub-

committee and I am happy to answer any questions.

BIOGRAPHY FOR ALEJANDRO GRAJAL

Dr.  Alejandro  Grajal  is  Senior  Vice  President  for  Conservation,  Education  and
Training  at  the  Chicago  Zoological  Society.  In  this  position,  he  oversees  a  unit  that
combines  the  Society’s  major  conservation  programs  with  education  and  interpreta-
tion  initiatives  and  develops  the  capacity  of  conservation  leaders  in  Chicago  and
around the world. He oversees field programs, conservation grants in more than 20
countries, including the development of develops training programs for Latin-Amer-
ican  conservation  professionals.  He  also  oversees  all  aspects  of  the  Brookfield  Zoo
education  and  interpretation  programs,  which  impact  two  millions  visitors  yearly
and serve more than 250,000 school children annually. The unit organizes education
programs for families and children, summer zoo camp, and access programs for peo-
ple  with  disabilities;  create  exhibit  interpretation  and  messaging  throughout  the
zoo;  manage  community  outreach  ventures,  and  develop  benchmarks  as  part  of  our
audience  research  program,  including  the  innovative  field  of  Conservation  Psy-
chology.  In  addition,  he  guides  several  initiatives  to  widen  the  Society’s  leadership
in  programs  that  build  conservation  capacity,  such  as  the  Youth  Conservation  &
Science Leadership program. Prior to joining the Chicago Zoological Society in 2005,
he was the founder and Executive Director of the Latin America and Caribbean pro-
gram  of  the  National  Audubon  Society.  While  there,  he  worked  with  more  than  50
partner  organizations  in  15  countries  around  the  world.  Prior  to  that  appointment,
he was Director of the Latin American Program at the Wildlife Conservation Society
in  New  York  from  1991  to  1998.  He  was  born  in  Madrid,  Spain,  and  moved  as  a
child  to  Venezuela.  He  received  his  undergraduate  degree  in  Ecology  at  Simon
Bolfvar  University  in  Caracas  and  his  Ph.D.  in  Zoology  with  a  minor  in  Tropical
Conservation  and  Development  at  the  University  of  Florida.  He  has  participated  in
protected  area  planning  and  conservation  programs  with  the  United  States  Agency
for  International  Development,  the  Global  Environmental  Fund,  the  World  Bank,
and  the  European  Union.  His  publications  include  over  30  peer-reviewed  books,
chapters, popular articles, and scientific publications. His scientific interests include
ornithology,  biological  conservation,  environmental  education,  training  of  conserva-
tion  professionals,  and  the  sustainable  use  of  natural  resources.  Dr.  Grajal  has  ex-
plored public perceptions, social psychology, and marketing techniques. He is an ac-
complished  wildlife  artist  with  over  30  published  illustrations  in  books,  calendars,
stamps,  posters  and  limited  edition  prints.  His  art  has  been  exhibited  in  galleries
in Caracas, Miami, Chicago, and New York. He is married to Dr. Helena Puche and
has two children.

DISCUSSION

Chair  LIPINSKI.  Thank  you.  I  would  like  to  thank  all  of  you  for
your  testimony.  I  am  going  to  open  up  for  the  first  round  of  ques-
tions,  and  it  is  the  Chair’s  prerogative  to  go  first,  but  I  am  going
to recognize Mr. Griffith for five minutes.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

60

Mr.  GRIFFITH.  Mr.  Chair,  thank  you  very  much.  We  appreciate
each and every one of you coming. I would like to make just a com-
ment. I am a retired oncologist but a tadpole changed my life, and
the  transformation,  watching  the  tadpole  become  a  frog  and  have
my little brother ask me how did it know to do that, stimulated me
into a career of being interested in science.

One of the things that I think that we sometimes maybe overlook
and probably not overlook but in all fairness to what we are trying
to  accomplish  here,  my  great  question  for  America  is  that  why
aren’t  our  children  learning  to  read?  Why  aren’t  they  reading  at
grade level by the third grade? Because they learn to read and then
after  the  third  grade,  they  read  to  learn.  And  you  may  be  seeing
children  that  your  teachers  can  teach,  but  you  are  not  seeing  a
great  many  who  we  have  lost  along  the  wayside.  So  I  commend
you.  I  think  that  the  great  question  in  America,  because  we  only
represent six percent of the world’s population, yet we are number
one in space travel, we are number one in military, we are number
one  in  the  development  of  drugs,  and  entrepreneurialship,  means
that you have your work cut out for you because the statistics that
we  don’t  think  that  we  are  the  leaders  anymore  in  some  of  those
areas are wrong, but we are getting that feeling at times. But I ap-
plaud you and thank you for being here and our Chair for bringing
this subject up. Thank you.

Chair  LIPINSKI.  Thank  you,  Doctor,  and  we  look  forward  to  your
contributions to this subcommittee. I will now recognize Dr. Ehlers
for five minutes.

Mr. EHLERS. Thank you, Mr. Chair. I really appreciate your testi-
mony.  It  is  very  interesting.  I  grew  up  in  a  farming  community,
and  it  was  amazing  how  much  of  the  science  that  students  learn
was learned on the farm. Obviously they learned about pulleys and
levers  in  the  farm  work,  trying  to  get  the  hay  in  the  mound,  et
cetera. They learned a lot about the life sciences and the reproduc-
tive  cycle  and  genetics  in  their  work  on  the  farm  by  watching  the
animals. And that is missing today.

I am just wondering what—first of all, Dr. Bell, in the work that
you  did  in  the  report,  did  you  go  back  and  look  at  prior  years  and
see what the difference was today between informal education and
what it was 30 years ago, 70 years ago, et cetera?

Dr.  BELL.  Thank  you  for  the  question.  We  went  back  in  the  lit-
erature  as  far  as  we  could.  One  of  the  challenges  with  doing  the
consensus studies, informal science education is such a broad vari-
ety  of  different  endeavors  as  we  have  been  hearing  across  the
panel, and you can think of community programming for youth and
kind  of  layer  on  even  more  than  we  have  been  able  to  talk  about
thus  far.  We  had  discussion  about  generational  shifts  from  kind  of
over  the  last  50  years,  and  one  feature  that  is  really  unique  of  in-
formal  learning  environments  is  that  you  get  mixed  generational
groups  together  engaged  in  discussions  of  science.  And  so  in  that
sense,  people  that  did  grow  up  on  the  farm  but  now  reside  in  the
city  can  engage  in  conversations  with  their  children  and  grand-
children, and perhaps they are a docent at a museum and they can
engage  with  the  public  more  broadly  around  related  aspects  of  the
expertise they have been developing.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

61

That said, we also were orienting to a number of efforts that are
organized  across  the  country  where  farming  and  subsistence  agri-
culture  is  still,  you  know,  a  focus  of  community  life  and  activity.
And  so  we  are  looking  at  evaluation  reports  of  4–H  programs  and
those sorts of endeavors.

And  so  to  some  degree,  we  did  try  to  capture  that  in  the  report.
What  I  would  say  is  that  we  wanted  to  articulate,  as  we  looked
across  the  literatures,  this  shared  image  of  science  learning  across
six  strands  that  we  identify,  and  two  of  them  are  particularly  im-
portant  to  informal  learning  environments  around  the  prior  inter-
est that get cultivated. And I think we have already started to hear
a number of those stories. The tadpole story is exactly of that kind.
And  then  over  time  how  that  learning  gets  sustained  by  a  range
of  others  in  your  life  and  accessed  experiences  that  sustain  it  and
keep it deepening. And then you come to identify with science and
see  that  you  can  learn  from  it  and  contribute  to  it,  and  those  two
particular  dimensions  are  very  strong  within  the  work,  within  the
informal world. So that is a bit of a response.

Mr.  EHLERS.  Thank  you.  Dr.  Ferrini-Mundy,  can  you  just  give
some  insight  into  how  informal  science  education  supported  re-
search at the NSF differs from other education and human services
research or human resources research?

Dr. FERRINI-MUNDY. Yes, certainly. Thank you very much for the
question.  In  many  ways  the  research  questions  that  have  to  do
with  informal  science  learning  overlap  substantially  with  research
questions  that  have  to  do  with  learning  in  a  general  sense.  Your
last question actually caused me to think about a whole line of re-
search in my own field, in mathematics education, that looks at ev-
eryday  uses  of  mathematics,  everyday  mathematics.  And  some-
times in other countries, children who are street vendors or candy-
sellers, there have been really interesting studies that have looked
at how mathematics gets used in a day-to-day way in similar stud-
ies  in  science.  And  so  that’s  an  example  of  a  line  of  research  that
bears upon informal science education, but that doesn’t necessarily
come  up  through  the  informal  science  education  program.  So  we
have  several  programs  within  EHR  and  elsewhere  in  the  Founda-
tion  that  fund  basic  research  about  learning,  that  fund  programs
to look at motivation and engagement which are some of the funda-
mental  questions  here,  and  then  the  relationships  of  motivation
and engagement to learning, to long-term impact and so forth.

So  it  is  fair  to  say  that  both  the  informal  science  education  pro-
gram  itself,  which  includes  opportunities  for  research  on  learning,
but  also  the  formal  learning  kinds  of  programs  like  Research  and
Evaluation  on  Education  in  Science  and  Engineering,  the  REESE
program,  also  is  a  place  where  there  are  a  number  of  studies  that
bear  upon  these  general  cognitive  and  affective  issues  that  are  of
great  interest  for  moving  forward  in  informal  science  education,
along  with  the  development  of  instruments  which  is,  as  we  have
heard  from  everyone,  a  crucial  place,  and  that  occurs  across  pro-
grams.

Mr.  EHLERS.  Yes,  well,  I  admire  the  work  you  are  doing  and  I
deeply appreciate it. That is true for all of you, but it seems to me
it is very hard to get a handle on these things. Part of the problem
is the rapid changes in society. You know, what you are doing, Mr.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

62

Lippincott, is a good example of taking a new technology and using
it very well. At the same time, kids miss out on some other things.
I  recall  in  my  childhood  I  really  enjoyed  working  on  the  cars,  and
they  were  simple  enough  that  you  could  work  on  the  car  and  fix
it  yourself.  I  did  a  valve  job  on  my  car  myself.  Today,  you  don’t
even  dare  to  touch  anything  on  a  car.  It  will  take  $1,500  to  repair
the  damage  you  did.  And  similarly,  the  computers  are  marvelous
things,  wonderful  things  for  kids  to  use,  but  they  can’t  take  them
apart  and  see  how  they  work.  And  so  I  think  we  face  some  real
challenges  in  trying  to  address  those  issues.  I  see  my  time  is  ex-
pired.

Chair LIPINSKI. Yes, interesting ideas there, and I know that es-
pecially,  my  background  is  mechanical  engineering,  so  I  have  a
much  better  understanding  and  I  guess  more  of  a  love  of  mechan-
ics.  So  I  do  understand  Mr.  Ehlers’  concerns  there  about  what  we
can do now.

I am going to now recognize Mr. Carnahan for five minutes.
Mr.  CARNAHAN.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chair,  and  Ranking  Member.  I
come from St. Louis, Missouri, and we are blessed with the wealth
of  science  and  engineering  institutions  there  which  we  are  always
looking  for  great  opportunities  to  plug  kids  into  and  get  them  ex-
cited  at  an  early  age  because  of  the  practical  benefit  to  those  kids
but  also  they  are  the  next  generation  of  people  who  are  going  to
be  those  scientists  and  engineers  to  fill  in  those  great  public  and
private  institutions  that  we  have  around  the  St.  Louis  region.  But
my question is to the panel, what are the key factors in really forg-
ing  a  successful  partnership  between  the  informal  organizations
and formal educational institutions, and is it hard to quantify those
measurements?  Are  there  metrics  out  there  that  exist?  Are  there
barriers  to  measure  that  in  terms  of  how  we  assess  what  works
well? And really, to any and all the panel.

Ms. INGRAM. May I answer? Thank you for the question. Let me
address at least part of that which is that, and I think this relates
back  to  the  prior  discussion,  which  is  how  do  we  overcome  kind  of
the  distance  that  technology  might  have  imposed  between,  you
know, the inspiration and inquiry that was generated in prior gen-
erations  to  propel  the  interest  in  science,  and  that  is  the  oppor-
tunity that we have from that technology, however, is to better co-
ordinate  and  align  the  external  resources  that  do  exist  and  coordi-
nated  efforts  like  we  have  undertaken  in  Chicago  through  Science
Chicago and hopefully some additional work to really partner, iden-
tify  the  resources  that  exist,  identify  how  those  resources  align
with  the  learning  standards  and  the  curriculum  that  our  schools
are  trying  to  instill  in  our  youth,  and  to  make  those  resources
transparent and accessible to the families, communities and teach-
ers who can access them for the benefit of our youth.

So  to  the  extent  that  there  is  a  lot  of  great  programs  out  there,
we have this additional significant barrier of making sure that peo-
ple  know  what  those  programs  are  and  how  to  access  those  pro-
grams.  That  takes  significant  coordination  and  partnership  in  and
of  itself.  How  you  measure  that,  if  you  coordinate  that  through  a
website,  there  are  ways  of  doing  that.  You  can  build  in  manage-
ment  tools  to  make  sure  that  it  is  being  used,  that  the  conversa-
tions are happening, that the connections are being made. But you

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

63

have  to  partner,  you  have  to  work  closely  with  your  local  school
districts, you have to make sure you understand what they are try-
ing  to  accomplish  in  the  classroom  and  that  resources  are  reflec-
tive.  The  one  thing  that  you  can’t  do  is  assume  that  external  re-
sources  are  just  going  to  immediately  adopt  the  strategic  vision  of
your local school district. It has to be a shared objective and shared
strategic  visions,  and  we  have  to  build  our  programs  to  support
that  outcome  of  science  achievement  or  we  won’t  be  able  to  have
that impact. Thank you.

Mr. CARNAHAN. Thank you.
Dr.  BELL.  Within  the  bounds  of  the  report,  we  were  looking  at
a  range  of  different  kinds  of  articulations  between  schools  and
science-rich institutions in the informal sector. The first point to be
made,  there  was  a  time  and  place  where  the  idea  that  informal
learning  was  something  different  than  formal  learning,  that  might
have been a conversation. The Committee didn’t end up there. The
Committee  ended  up  actually  saying  there  is  a  shared  set  of  goals
related  to  science  learning  that  we  can  think  about  what  the
unique contributions are to be made in schools versus other places
where,  you  know,  within  the  informal  education  sectors.  That  is
kind  of  more  the  centerpiece.  We  looked  at  field  trip  studies  be-
cause school groups do make extensive use of museums and botan-
ical  gardens  and  zoos  and  aquaria,  and  you  know,  the  research
points to the important articulation between the goal of those, you
know,  experiences  outside  of  school  in  relation  to  what  is  being
learned  in  school,  both  before  the  visit  and  after  the  visit.  At  the
same time, it can be active involvement of the teacher in planning
those efforts. The teacher isn’t backing away from the activity once
they show up at the museum.

What  was  interesting  is  there  is  a  widespread  thing  that  muse-
ums  and  informal  learning  institutions  also  engage  in.  teacher
training,  but  there  isn’t  an  empirical  peer-reviewed  research  lit-
erature on how that plays out actually. So we couldn’t speak to the
details  of  the  quality  of  those  experiences,  and  it  is  an  established
gap in the literature.

Mr. CARNAHAN. Thank you.
Mr.  LIPPINCOTT.  I  wanted  just  to  address  it  if  I  might.  I  think
in  terms  of  public  television,  for  instance,  I  have  talked  a  little  bit
about  how  we  kind  of  are  perfectly  aligned  with  what  might  be
called  strand  one  of  Dr.  Bell’s  research  around  gathering  interest
and  motivating  interest  in  science.  When  we  have  tried  to  work
much more deeply with teachers and schools, because of course, the
real  gold  standard  is  that  if  kids  are  truly  interested  in  it,  we  can
show  their  achievement  so  that  for  instance  our  TeacherLine
courses required us to partner because we have to be really relent-
lessly  humble  about  really  what  impact  our  television  or  media
might have in the actual classroom. So we partner. We have 23 in-
stitutions that grant credit because of course that is their role, and
it  is  aligning  with  their  interest  that  allows  us  to  be  effective  and
also with hundreds of local organizations in every city in St. Louis,
in  Chicago,  and  across  the  country  who  are  the  point  of  service,
meaning,  really  the  4–H  Clubs  and  the  Boys  and  Girls  Clubs  as
well as in the city schools. The degree to which we can conform our
goals  for  the  program  to  the  goals  of  learning  achievement  that

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00067 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

64

have  been  set  by  local  standards,  that  is  the  degree  to  which  we
are successful. Trying to get that entire sort of life cycle of an idea
understood  and  measured  is  the  really  tricky  part.  What  we  have
been  trying  to  do  is  trying  to  talk  about  how  each  piece  of  what
we  are  creating  has  a  set  of  research  around  it  and  we  can  prove
that  it  is  well-crafted,  it  is  based  on  scientific  research,  and  that
it  will  work.  We  also  want  to  prove  that  the  way  we  are  using
teacher  professional  development,  the  process  that  we  are  using,
will  result  in  increased  confidence  and  competence  of  teachers
using  media.  And  of  course,  the  ultimate  test  I  think  of  a  partner-
ship is that it continues.

Mr. CARNAHAN. Thank you.
Dr.  GRAJAL.  Just  if  I  may  add,  we  receive  almost  250,000  school
children  in  our  zoo.  I  mean,  at  the  season  it  is  a  flood  of  yellow
buses  in  our  facility.  We  have  decided  we  really  need  to  focus  on
teacher  training.  It  is  an  issue  that  we  can  get  as  many  children
in our facility, but truly teachers are one of the key roles.

And  seconding  Dr.  Bell’s  testimony  is  the  issue  of  competency
and  confidence  in  teachers,  that  it  really  percolates  through  the
classroom. A teacher that is unsure about his or her credentials in
science or even exploring science, it doesn’t matter if she is accred-
ited  to  it,  it  transmits  that  insecurity  to  the  classroom.  So  one  of
the  issues  that  we  are  measuring  with  our  six  partner  degree
granting  institutions,  six  colleges  and  universities  that  we  are
working,  is  actually  developing  indicators  for  that  confidence  and
that  competency  in  teachers.  We  believe  that  that  is  one  of  the
stem  roles  of  our  facility.  And  developing  that  very  basic  inquiry,
comparative  inquiry  skills  in  teachers.  There  is  grave  emphasis
now on technology and issues about advanced science, but we have
lost what Mr. Ehlers presented is that inquiry that happens in the
farm,  that  comparative  issues  that  happen  when  you  are  in  the
field, and we believe that that is somewhat lost. We really want to
instill  those  very  early  stages  of  the  comparative  inquiry  in  teach-
ers.  And  that  is  the  root  of  many  of  the  training  that  may  happen
for teachers. Thank you.

Mr.  CARNAHAN.  Thank  you  to  the  panel,  and  thank  you,  Mr.

Chair.

Chair  LIPINSKI.  Thank  you.  It  certainly  is  a  critical  part  of  this,

is the putting together the informal in the formal education.

I  am  now  going  to  recognize  myself  for  five  minutes.  Plenty  of
questions  here,  but  I  want  to  start  out,  we  were  just  talking
about—a  lot  of  this  was  relationships,  partnerships  with  schools.  I
want to ask about partnerships with institutes of higher education,
partnerships  with  industry,  partnerships  with  National  labs.  Last
Congress I introduced a bill, and I am working again on doing that
in  this  Congress,  to  authorize  funding  for  partnerships  between
science museums and energy labs so that we can better utilize the
resources,  the  knowledge,  what  we  are  doing  putting  into  energy
labs  to  help  teach  STEM  education  which  also  will  help  educate
people, not just educate in STEM education but also educate them
about  what  is  going  on  and  the  investments  we  are  making  in  our
DOE  labs.  I  just  wanted  to  throw  that  question  out  there.  What
other partnerships do you have or that you know of between these

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00068 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

65

informal  education  institutions  and  some  of  these  other  institu-
tions? Doctor?

Dr. FERRINI-MUNDY. Thank you for the question. In many of our
funded  projects,  there  are  partnerships  with  institutions  of  higher
education,  particularly  around  these  research  issues  because  the
involvement  of  cognitive  scientists,  STEM  disciplinary  education
researchers,  sometimes  sociologists,  anthropologists  and  so  forth,
those become a part of this as well as of course the scientific exper-
tise  that  is  crucial  in  these  kinds  of  co-funded  efforts.  So  we  have
a number of examples, and I can get back to you with some specific
examples.

We  also  have  examples  of  some  collaborations  that  are  coming
through  the  National  labs  and  other  kinds  of  settings.  I  was  just
looking  at  a  project  today  about  helping  to  improve  students’  un-
derstanding  of  the  scientific  experiments  at  Fermilab.  And  so  we
have examples in many cases where these partnerships are crucial
because  this  field  is  so  broad  in  its  span  that  it  requires  lots  of
kinds of experts to move it forward well.

Chair LIPINSKI. Dr. Bell.
Dr. BELL. I can give one personal example, so I am kind of taking
off  the  Committee  hat  in  terms  of  the  consensus  report,  but  we
have  funding  from  the  National  Science  Foundation  through  the
COSEE  program,  the  Centers  for  Ocean  Sciences  Education  Excel-
lence, that has brought together, at the University of Washington’s
Seattle  area,  scientists  in  ocean  sciences  together  with  folks  like
myself that are learning scientists together with informal education
experts  at  the  aquarium  to  engage  the  broader  citizenry  in  citizen
science  activities  related  to  issues  that  are  kind  of  local  but  sci-
entifically  rich  questions  about  land-water  interaction,  and  kind  of
our individual behaviors that we make choices in daily life and how
that impacts the environment. Through a sustained, multi-year ef-
fort,  these  different  groups  have  been  able  to  productively  collabo-
rate, and how do you engage a broad network of citizens in helping
better  understand  this  issue  by  collecting  data  and  samples  from
across a broader variety of places that then come to the University
of Washington to be analyzed more directly. So there is a ripple ef-
fect  there  as  well  where  I  have  learned  a  lot  more  about  science
through  that  endeavor.  Our  collaborators  in  ocean  sciences  have
changed the way that they do their teaching on the campus in rela-
tion  to  knowing  more  about  how  people  learn  as  well,  and  I  think
that  is  kind  of  a  concrete  instance  of  what  can  be  done  in  those
sorts of partnerships.

Ms.  INGRAM.  In  addition  to  the  generalized  type  of  partnership
and  coordination  that  I  mentioned  earlier  as  being  imperative,  let
me share with you a couple of specific examples where the museum
and the youth that we serve have benefited from coordinating with
higher  learning  and  our  National  laboratories.  One  is  in  our  Insti-
tute for Quality Science Teaching. It is important to our school dis-
trict  that  their  science  teachers  become  credentialed,  and  it  is  im-
portant  to  us  and  to  our  youth  and  to  the  teachers  that  they  be-
come  credentialed  in  a  quality  manner  so  that  their  performance
actually  has  an  impact  on  the  student  achievement.  So  in  helping
the Chicago Public Schools reach their goal of having every teacher
subject  matter  credentialed  in  science  in  the  middle  grades  within

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00069 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

66

the next two years, we have had the advantage of having partnered
for the last two years with a couple different universities to try out
what programs might work to support teacher professional develop-
ment.

So  we  have  worked  with  National-Louis  University,  Loyola  Uni-
versity Chicago, as well as the Illinois Institute of Technology. IIT,
by way of example, we are building a jointly credentialed program.
Our  programs  target  teachers  who  are  not  comfortable  teaching
science  but  find  themselves  in  science  classrooms.  You  can’t  learn
or  inspire  youth  if  you  yourself  have  no  confidence  in  the  subject
matter.  So  we  focus  on  building  that  confidence  and  the  com-
petency  and  the  content  as  well  as  the  teaching  strategies.  So  we
have  a  pool  of  teachers,  128  annually,  who  are  with  us  in  a  pro-
gram that can earn them three credit hours, and these are teachers
that would not sign up with IIT for a science credentialing program
because frankly they never had it in their professional future to be
science  teachers.  But  because  we  have  built  the  access,  we  have
partnered  with  IIT  to  offer  low-cost  credit  hours,  they  find  them-
selves  moving  from  not  touching  it  with  a  10-foot  pole  to  having
three  hours  toward  an  18-hour  credential  by  the  end  of  the  year.
And  then  they  get  to  sign  up  for  another  workshop  with  us  the
next year, and all of a sudden they have six. So what we are trying
to  do  is  to  build  access  to  that  pool  of  teachers  that  don’t  even
dream of themselves as being science but find themselves teaching
it  anyway  and  to  build  that  pool  toward  being  the  competent  sub-
ject matter science teachers.

The  other  quick  example  in  partnership  is  with  Argonne  Na-
tional  Laboratories.  In  our  Fab  Lab  which  is  a  really  great,  hands
on  where  the  kids  can  come  in  and  design  and  fabricate  all  sorts
of  different  things  from  furniture  to  electronics  to  key  chains,  and
in  doing  that,  we  don’t  necessarily  have  the  technical  competency
around  the  software  and  the  evolution  that  our  MIT  partners
would  require  but  Argonne  does,  and  they  have  been  a  partner
from  the  beginning  with  us.  So  we  get  to  have  youth  from  our
youth  development  program,  the  science  achievers,  participate
every Saturday morning with the support from volunteers from Ar-
gonne  National  Laboratories  who  now  have  taken  ownership  of
that  vision,  the  work,  that  can  be  done,  to  extend  access  to  that
technological  and  engineering  learning  in  the  museum.  So  there
are  a  lot  of  opportunities,  but  it  takes  working  together  to  find
where  your  common  interests  are  so  that  we  can  access  the  sci-
entific  competencies  of  Argonne  scientists  but  then  help  bridge  it
to the youth that want to be inspired by it.

Chair LIPINSKI. I would like to come there and use the Fab Lab.

Sounds like a lot of fun.

Ms. INGRAM. You are more than welcome, and it really is.
Chair LIPINSKI. Mr. Lippincott.
Mr.  LIPPINCOTT.  Just  as  a  quick  example,  I  showed  you  a  little
bit,  just  a  smidgen,  of  STEM  science  resources  that  we  are  trying
to  gather  as  part  of  EDCAR.  We  started  on  that  project  by  trying
to  figure  out  where  we  could  contribute  the  most,  and  we  asked
that  question  of  a  broad  variety  of  students  and  teachers  and
school  systems  and  universities.  And  most  people  said  STEM,  and
in  fact,  most  people  said  within  the  STEM,  they  wanted  Earth

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00070 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

67

science  which  is  such  a  pivotal  part  of  the  sequence  of  learning
science  in  school  and  a  bump  in  the  road  for  a  lot  of  kids.  Within
Earth science, climate science. And we asked why, and it is because
kids  are  so  excited,  they  are  so  interested  in  climate  science.  They
all  know  about  weather,  and  they  all  hear  about  things  on  the
news  and  they  are  all  interested  but  also  puzzled.  The  more  we
looked  at  this,  the  more  we  needed  partners.  And  so  we  went  cer-
tainly  to  the  NSF  who  have  been  a  great  partner  for  us  in  many
ways. The STEM digital library is an outstanding collection of ma-
terials that now we think we can help present. But we needed the
curriculum,  so  we  went  to  NOAA  which  has  produced  a  very  care-
fully mapped strands of the science curriculum for climate science,
and  of  course,  we  went  to  school  systems  where  in  fact  school  sys-
tems in every state have standards and have exact standards about
which  part  of  the  science  curriculum  they  need  to  learn.  We  have
been actually working with the CCSSO, the Council of Chief States
School Officers, who are after what they call fewer, higher, clearer,
maybe perhaps national standards at some point about this.

But clearly, in order to get to kids in the area that they said they
are most interested, we have to help teachers because they told us
even  if  they  have  advanced  degrees  in  science,  let  alone  are  chal-
lenged by not thinking of themselves as scientists, they don’t know
how  to  teach  this  science.  They  don’t  really  know  what  this
science—and they don’t have the resources. They look in their text-
books  and  there  is  not  very  much  in  that  chapter.  And  so  we  felt
like that was a place to start. So by working through partners like
this,  we  can  go  to  where  the  science  is  best,  we  can  really  help
science  teachers  where  they  really  need  it  the  most  and  where  we
think actually media has a really appropriate role to play, not sub-
stituting  for  field  experience  but  really  amplifying  what  teachers
need.

Chair LIPINSKI. Thank you.
Dr. GRAJAL. Just one, simple example is that we are now launch-
ing our second graduate degree, Master’s degree, for science teach-
ers  actually.  Many  of  the  graduate  programs  for  teachers  have
been  in  education.  We  are  trying  to  develop  these  science  degrees
for  teachers,  and  there  is  quite  a  market  for  that.  Teachers  are
truly interested in this.

Our  first  experiment  was  a  consortium  between  Fermilab,  Mor-
ton  Arboretum,  Brookfield  Zoo,  and  Benedictine  University,  and
now  we  are  launching  a  national  program  with  Miami  University
in Ohio that is bringing five zoos in the country. It is an advanced
inquiry  program  that  develops  basic  scientific  inquiry  skills  for
teachers that really want to jump into that level of scientific train-
ing.  And  it  is  about  teaching  science  but  also  pedagogical  tools  for
teaching science. Thank you.

Chair  LIPINSKI.  Thank  you.  Thank  you  for  your  extensive  an-
swers. I think the partnerships are really critical in forming those,
and  all  of  you  head  over  a  lot  of  different  areas  and  a  lot  of  dif-
ferent partners, and I think that is something we need to work on
also on the federal level and see what we can do to encourage more
of that.

We are joined by another new Member on the Subcommittee, and

I will recognize Ms. Fudge for five minutes.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00071 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

68

Ms.  FUDGE.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chair.  I  would  like  to  thank  all  of
you  for  being  here  today,  and  I  do  have  just  a  couple  of  questions
after  I  make  a  brief  comment.  I  want  to  first  share  with  you  that
on  Friday  of  last  week  I  had  the  opportunity  to  attend  the  grand
opening  of  our  first  STEM  school  in  the  city  of  Cleveland.  It  is
called  MC2  STEM.  The  thing  that  is  exciting  about  it  is  that  it  is
actually  housed  in  General  Electric’s  lighting  division,  Nela  Park
Campus.  Obviously,  the  setting  of  the  school  creates  some  of  just
what we are talking about today, I mean, because the young people
will have an opportunity to, on a weekly basis, have lunch with en-
gineers,  with  scientists,  they  will  have  hands-on  experience.  So  we
are  talking  about  the  same  kinds  of  things  that  you  are  talking
about  today.  But  I  guess  my  question  really  becomes  that,  in  the
City of Cleveland if you are not familiar with our area, it has been
deemed the number one or two poorest city in America for the last
three years. What happens to the young people who don’t have the
resources  to  attend  the  zoo  or  to  go  to  the  science  center  or  to  go
to  museums  if  their  schools  do  not  take  them?  And  most  of  the
schools  don’t  have  the  resources  either.  So  I  am  really  looking  at
how  we  address  the  issue  of  under-served  youth.  MC2  STEM  is
wonderful,  but  it  is  a  very  small  group  of  children.  How  do  we  get
to the rest of them? That is my first question, and that is for any-
one on the panel.

Ms.  INGRAM.  If  I  may  briefly  answer  that  question,  I  think  part
of  what  the  Museum  of  Science  and  Industry  in  Chicago  has  done
is reflect on how to leverage what we do in the inspiration that we
have  built  in  our  exhibitions  as  well  as  our  expertise  and  inquiry
based  science  teaching  and  thought  about  how  to  extend  that  into
our  communities  and  to  build  partnerships  with  our  communities.
So we have designed a set of community initiatives that is intended
to  build  an  ecosystem  where  the  ultimate  outcome  in  my  mind  is
that  youth  and  community  organizations  are  getting  their  first
taste of science from the coolest, hippest communicators of science,
their  brother’s  best  friend  who  is  in  one  of  our  other  programs.  So
we  start  that  with  the  science  club  approach  where  we  don’t  have
to  replicate  after-school  programs.  There  are  hundreds  of  commu-
nity  organizations  throughout  our  urban  areas  that  are  with  kids
every day after school. What they need is help in developing sound
subject  matter,  curriculum  that  is  fun  and  engaging  and  that  the
kids can relate to in their organizations after school. So we develop
the curriculum, we provide the materials, we train them on the de-
livery  of  it,  but  we  do  more  than  that.  We  do  this  as  an  entry  to
a  relationship,  not  just  with  the  community  organizations  but  also
with the children and their families.

So we bring them on buses that we provide back to the museum.
On  family  days,  the  kids  deliver  their  activities  on  the  floor  of  the
museum to our guests to help develop in them a sense of ownership
over  our  institution  and  invite  their  parents  in,  many  of  whom
have never been to any museum. And we want them to not only—
sometimes  you  have  to  do  more  than  just  invite.  You  have  to  take
the  hand  and  show  them  through  the  door  and  say,  this  is  your
place,  we  are  here  to  support  you.  This  is  the  intention  of  this  set
of  programs.  Then  we  have  from  that  extended  service  learning,
youth  development  that  is  all  grounded  in  the  science  content,

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00072 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

69

building the public speaking skills and the confidence of the youth
from these organizations, and then bridging them into universities.
Last  year  of  the  approximately  100  kids  that  participated  in  the
highest  level  of  this  series  of  programs,  the  science  achievers,  26
of  them  were  seniors  in  high  school.  These  are  regular  kids  who
were  not  screened  from  the  Chicago  Public  Schools.  Of  those  kids,
every one of them ended up graduating from high school, every one
of  them  ended  getting  into  a  four-year  college,  and  60  percent  of
them  ended  up  getting  scholarships  that  we  had  advocated  for
them  for  and  supported  them  in  applying  for.  These  kids  need  ac-
cess,  opportunity  and  a  bridge  to  engage  in  science  to  the  full  ex-
tent.  And  unless  we  build  these  well-structured  commitments  to
our communities, it is not going to be enough. We have to help, in-
vite  them  in,  and  hold  their  hand  and  have  conversations  about
what is going to work where they are.

Ms. FUDGE. Thank you.
Mr.  LIPPINCOTT.  I  would  like  to  add  just  a  little  bit  to  that.  We
have  actually  some  very  important  experiences  in  what  we  have
been  calling  a  360-degree  because  it  is  exactly  what  you  suggest,
that  you  need  to  go  well  outside,  in  our  case,  of  any  sort  of  tele-
vision  or  media  approach  actually  into  the  community  and  really
understand  how  that  works.  Where  we  have  had  the  most  success
is  where  we  have  had  the  most  funding  from  the  Department  of
Education.  That  has  to  do  with  early  literacy  because  there  are
kids  coming  to  school  with  800  words  where  they  should  have
10,000.  And  so  starting  that  kind  of  problem  set,  how  do  you  help
parents  in  their  homes  and  around  their  homes,  in  every  part  of
their  lives,  use  the  grocery  store  as  the  way  to  understand  lan-
guage.  Show  them  billboards  that  invite  them  to  try  new  kinds  of
language  learning,  and  you  do  that  through  all  kinds  of  pieces  of
the community as it stands now. Obviously, your best friend’s older
brother would be a great ambassador for science or for literacy. But
we  have  had  to  go  and  we  targeted  twenty  specifically  low  socio-
economic  stratus  markets  in  the  United  States  over  the  last  two
years  to  really  experiment.  We  got  the  San  Diego  Chargers  to  go
on the radio and television and endorse and really help kids get in-
vited. We have put billboards, we have done all kinds of alternative
activities.  We  have  wrapped  the  resource  and  referral  vans  in
southern  Illinois  in  Carbondale  with  our  logos  and  driven  around,
giving  free  DVDs  targeted  to  parents.  We  have  tried  things  that
public  television  has  never  done  before  but  really  need  to  be  done
in  order  to  get  inside  the  community.  And  by  proving  that  we  can
make a difference in a few communities, we get other communities
to pay attention. And therefore, we play this kind of beginning role.
But it really is a 360 approach.

Dr. BELL. Thank you for the question, and I have kind of two——
Chair  LIPINSKI.  I  just  wanted  to  say,  we  are  going  to  be  having
a  vote  probably  in  10  minutes  or  less  but  we  never  know  if  it  is
more  or  less.  So  I  just  want  to  keep  this  going  but  if  we  can—I
know  there  are  some  more  questions,  so  I  just  want  to  make  you
aware  of  that.  I  want  to  hear  the  rest  of  the  response  to  the  ques-
tion, but just be aware of that.

Dr.  BELL.  Very  quickly.  So  there  is  a  line  of  research  within  my
field  of  science  education  that  tries  to  orient  to  the  expertise  that

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00073 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

70

children  develop  in  their  life  around  their  interest.  So  you  can
think  of  some  of  the  examples  we  have  been  hearing  about,  these
pockets  of  expertise  that  kids  orient  to.  And  it  is  something  that
teachers can orient to as well but often they don’t, kind of stopped
to  do  that.  So  we  have  a  lot  of  efforts  in  the  curriculum  to  build
on prior knowledge but not to build on prior interests or developing
identities  of  children.  And  so  within  the  culturally  responsive  in-
struction approach, there are efforts to try to take the interests and
particular  circumstances  of  everyday  life  as  something  to  be
brought  kind  of  into  a  science-related  learning  experience.  So  that
is kind of one response.

Within the Committee report that we did for the NRC, there are
a  range  of  partnerships  that  we  have  been  hearing  about  between
science-rich  institutions  and  communities  to  try  to  figure  out  how
to  kind  of  be  bringing  access  to  phenomena  and  engaging  experi-
ences  to  a  broader  set  of  populations  who  tend  to  be  marginalized
in  school  settings  just  from  the  research  point  of  view.  And  those
partnerships  require  active  engagement  from  both  sides,  between
the  science-rich  institution  and  the  community  representation  to
try  to  figure  out  how  to  broker  the  experience  in  relation  to  the
local interest and needs of the communities, the way they talk, the
way they engage in particular ways of sense-making to try to nego-
tiate the design of those programs. And when that is done, learning
outcomes  do  represent  kind  of  growth  in  science  knowledge  and
deeper participation engagement in science-related activity.

Chair LIPINSKI. Dr. Grajal.
Dr. GRAJAL. It is essential to engage, and in our case in Chicago
has  been  with  community  councils.  We  actually  work  with  almost
11 community councils, and we have programs in the libraries very
similar  to  one  other  panelist.  It  really  requires  a  lot  of  dedication
from  the  councils  and  from  us.  We  have  to  actually  pay  for  the
buses  for  the  kids  to  come  to  the  zoo,  we  actually  have  to  engage
those  community  councils.  We  have  breakfast  with  the  local
churches,  with  the  local  minister’s  association.  We  really  need  to
engage  them  to  get  that  kind  of  involvement.  We  believe  that  for
example we have a library pass system. Every family can go to any
library  in  the  metropolitan  area  and  check  out  four  free  passes  to
the zoo, and those are very, very heavily used, particularly in these
communities. Every culture institution has a variation of that, and
it really requires that very, very active engagement.

Chair LIPINSKI. Dr. Ferrini-Mundy.
Dr.  FERRINI-MUNDY.  Yes,  just  very,  very  briefly,  in  addition  to
these wonderful and exciting ways of engaging the parts of the in-
formal science education community directly with community orga-
nizations, youth-serving organizations, I would underscore also the
importance  of  the  connections  to  the  formal  education  community,
to  leverage  the  enormous  knowledge  base  within  the  informal
science education community and to find ways to replicate at least
pieces  of  what  the  school  in  Cleveland  is  able  to  deliver.  So  lunch
with scientists, there are other ways that the informal science edu-
cation  community  connects  wonderfully  with  schools.  And  I  think
emphasis on playing those out more fully is another way to be sure
that we are reaching broadly.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00074 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

71

Chair  LIPINSKI.  I  thank  Ms.  Fudge  for  her  excellent  question.  I

look forward to your contributions to our subcommittee.

Ms. FUDGE. Thank you, Mr. Chair.
Chair LIPINSKI. I would like to recognize Dr. Ehlers for five min-

utes.

Mr.  EHLERS.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chair,  and  thank  you  very  much.
You  have  thrown  out  a  lot  of  good  ideas,  and  I  am  very  excited
about  this  and  the  progress  that  you  have  made,  in  particular  the
point  about  educating  the  teachers,  professional  development,  and
that  is  why  I  played  quite  a  role  in  setting  of  the  Math-Science
Partnership Program in the Department of Ed and similar program
in  NSF.  And  it  is  crucial  that  we  do  this.  Personally,  when  I  was
still  a  professor  I  did  a  couple  of  summer  institutes  trying  to  de-
velop  new  science  programs  in  the  local  schools,  and  it  became
clear  to  me  immediately  the  problem  is  not  the  teachers  in  the
sense that they are incompetent. The problem is that we have com-
petent  teachers  who  desperately  want  to  teach  science  and  math
well and who never learned it themselves because they have never
been  taught  it  properly  and  have  not  been  taught  how  to  teach
properly. So thank for you what you are doing on that.

informal  education.  We  have  done  some  work 

I just have something sort of off the wall about this type of edu-
cation, 
in
nanotechnology  legislation,  and  there  are  some  concerns  about  the
social  implications  of  nanotechnology,  in  particular,  the  products.
And we heard from many groups that the general public has to be
better  informed  on  this  issue.  Well,  I  could  write  a  long  list  of
things  like  that,  you  know,  high-powered  power  lines  for  distribu-
tion of the grid. There is a longstanding belief that somehow living
near one of those can cause cancer in your children. Similarly, vac-
cinations. There are a number of parents, a growing number of par-
ents,  who  are  refusing  to  have  their  children  vaccinated  because
there is a belief out there that somehow vaccinations cause autism.
And  yet,  there  are  other  areas  where  things  that  should  happen
but  aren’t  because  the  public  really  doesn’t  understand  it.  A  good
example  is  weight  and  obesity.  I  just  cringe  at  some  people  I  see
walking  down  the  sidewalk,  and  I  can  just  lay  out  for  them  their
life path, what it is going to be in terms of diabetes and other dis-
eases as a result of their weight. I think we need a lot more infor-
mal  education  for  adults  as  well  as  for  children.  Obviously  PBS
could  play  a  major  role  there.  But  there  are  a  lot  of  other  things
that could happen, too. Involving parents on field trips for example,
saying  we  would  like  your  kids  to  go  on  this  field  trip.  It  is  very,
very  important,  but  we  would  really  like  to  have  you  come  along
so that you can discuss it at home afterward or you can even mask
it  and  say  we  just  need  you  to  control  this  bus  full  of  kids.  You
know, we need 15 parents to go along with these 20 kids.

So I hope you will put that in your thinking and try to figure out
some  way  to  really  educate  the  general  public  about  science  as
well. I would appreciate any comments you would care to make on
that.

Dr.  BELL.  One  thing  it  makes  me  think  of,  in  the  report  there
is  a  chapter  on  media  and  its  kind  of  growing  prevalence  in  dif-
ferent  forms,  and  Mr.  Lippincott  was  already  kind  of  giving  us  a
sense  of  that.  In  terms  of  the  research  base  on  what  people  learn

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00075 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

72

from  engaging  media,  so  kind  of  the  broader  communication  of
science,  the  research  is  pretty  clear  around  educational  television
and the science learning that goes on around that in ways that you
can  measure  directly.  Although,  you  know,  access  to  other  digital
media  blogs,  virtual  spaces,  and  Wiki’s  and  serious  games  and  all
these  new  emergent  technologies,  people  are  engaging  with  sci-
entific information in radically new ways. And we don’t necessarily
understand  the  details  of  what  science  they  are  learning  in  those
moments because we don’t have those research literatures to really
guide  us.  So  that  is  kind  of  the  one  kind  of  insight  that  the  Com-
mittee  developed  related  to  your  question  which  is  really  a
foundational,  important  question  related  to  science  literacy  in  the
broadest sense.

Mr. EHLERS. Now, if we can just get people to watch public tele-

vision, it might help. Dr. Ferrini-Mundy.

Dr.  FERRINI-MUNDY.  Yes,  thank  you  for  the  question  and  of
course,  our  programs  do  invite  proposals  that  span  the  range  and
are  concerned  with  public  understanding  at  all  levels.  One  quick
example,  the  Nanoscale  Informal  Science  Education  Network  is  a
model for how it is possible with partnerships of museums, labora-
tories,  universities,  and  so  on  to  bring  attention  to  a  particular
topic for all age ranges, including a number of public forums based
on European models for communicating and engaging the public in
science.  We  have  several  examples,  and  I  agree  it  is  a  very  impor-
tant area.

Mr. EHLERS. Yes, I thought I saw one other hand. Yes?
Mr. LIPPINCOTT. I would like to say, we think we are onto some-
thing with the media that I tried to show you a little bit about. The
fact  that  kids—not  only  can  we  put  it  in  the  television  programs,
but  you  pointed  out  what  my  daughter  has  said  to  me  which  is
Dad,  if  you  wanted  me  to  watch  it,  why  did  you  put  it  on  public
television?  I  guess  she  doesn’t  watch  public  television.  But  in  fact,
she is 17 so that is a difficult audience to reach. But our programs
do  attract  broad  audiences,  and  in  fact,  these  online  services,  just
as  Dr.  Bell  has  said,  we  know  we  are  doing  something  right,  but
in  many  cases  we  don’t  even  know  yet  what  we  are  doing  right.
The  first  week  that  the  service  that  I  showed  you  last  September
was  made  available,  we  didn’t  even  publicize  it  and  we  had  a  mil-
lion  streams  a  week,  and  ever  since  then  we  have  had  a  million
streams  a  week.  Kids  who  are  6  to  8  years  old  are  coming  to  get
information. They are exploring it actively in a way that they can’t
do  on  television.  There  is  something  wonderful  happening,  but  the
foundational questions of what is really going on, just as with tele-
vision,  we  know  they  are  learning.  The  question  is,  what  are  they
learning?  And  we  really  need  to  really  understand  that  as  media
professionals so that we can do a better job of what you are saying.
Mr.  EHLERS.  I  totally  agree,  and  I  think  you  should  tell  your
daughter  that  you  can’t  give  her  an  allowance  because  not  enough
people watch public television so you don’t get paid enough.

Dr. BELL. I will try that.
Mr. EHLERS. Dr. Grajal.
Dr. GRAJAL. The one thing we are finding is that the competition
is for leisure time and how people can become active practitioners.
One of the things, to consume science information is different than

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00076 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

73

practicing  science.  One  of  the  issues  that  we  are  facing  is  not
enough  time  outside,  the  initiative  No  Child  Left  Inside,  the  issue
of  not—this  is  the  most  sedentary  generation  and  we  are  finding
linkages  between  overweight,  Attention  Deficit  Disorder,  and
enough time being outside and exploring nature. The fact that you
as a farm boy were doing with your animals and so on is an experi-
ence that almost no children have these days.

So we believe that one of the main issues for scientific discoveries
by  scientific  discovery  by  itself  and  actually  promoting  more  time
exploring  science  as  active  actors.  It  can  be  in  the  classroom,  but
informal  settings  are  unique  to  provide  that  experience.  So  that
partnership between being active players of science instead of pas-
sive consumers is a really relevant issue here for formal and infor-
mal education.

Mr. EHLERS. Ms. Ingram, you get a chance to close it out.
Ms.  INGRAM.  Just  briefly,  we  recognize  that  families  are  critical
to  whether  or  not  children  are  going  to  excel  and  continue  on  in
their sense of wonder and inspiration in science.

We talk a lot about youth and how to engage because it is a par-
ticular  problem  that  exists  in  advancing  science  education  for  our
students in K through 8, but families need to be integrated. When
we  build  our  exhibitions,  we  make  sure  they  are  accessible  for  our
youth,  but  they  are  really  designed  for  the  whole  family  so  that
they  can  talk  together.  It  inspires  conversation  amongst  them.  It
is  not  a  singular  experience,  it  is  a  shared  communal  experience.
And  all  the  community  initiatives  we  talked  about  earlier,  family
days  programs  need  to  be  embedded  in  all  of  that.  We  truly  have
to have this be something that the family understands is an oppor-
tunity  for  their  youth  and  an  opportunity  for  them  to  participate
in.

Mr. EHLERS. Thank you very much.
Chair LIPINSKI. Thank you, and we are about seven minutes left
in the vote, although we might have a little more time because not
many Members have gotten down there. But I just wanted to—one
thing I was going to ask, I was just going to throw out there quick-
ly,  Dr.  Ferrini-Mundy  had  talked  about  the  Nanoscale  Informal
Science Education Network Initiative. I am not going to ask you to
do  it  here  for  lack  of  time,  but  I  would  certainly  like  to  hear  more
about  that  and  how  it  was  developed  and  the  ongoing  work  with
that because I really am a strong supporter. I really believe, I have
said  many  times  that  I  have  drunk  the  Kool-Aid  and  believe
nanotechnology  is  the  next  Industrial  Revolution.  I  truly  believe
that,  and  I  think  it  is  something  that  people  ought  to  be  educated
more about.

But  I  want  to  thank  all  the  witnesses  for  their  testimony  today.
I  had  mentioned  how  I  had  always  been  excited  by  science  engi-
neering,  going  to  the  Museum  of  Science  and  Industry.  I  certainly
watched  PBS  an  awful  lot.  I  probably  would  have  been  better  off
if  I  would  have  watched  more,  maybe,  and  I  was  a  member  of  the
Brookfield  Zoo  when  I  was  a  kid  and  spent  a  lot  of  time  there  at
the zoo and learned a lot there.

So  I  appreciate  very  much  the  importance  of  informal  science
education.  I  think  we  need  to  continue  to  do  more.  It  is  good  to
hear  your  testimony,  but  to  anything  further  down  the  line  that

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00077 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

74

you  can  recommend  to  us  that  we  can  do  here  on  the  federal  level
to help with this, we certainly do want to hear from you. And I just
want  to  say  the  record  will  remain  open  for  additional  statements
from  the  Members  and  for  answers  to  any  follow-up  questions  the
Committee may ask of the witnesses, and with that, the witnesses
are excused and the hearing is now adjourned.

[Whereupon, at 11:33 a.m., the Subcommittee was adjourned.]

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00078 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Appendix 1:

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

(75)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00079 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

76

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

Responses  by  Joan  Ferrini-Mundy,  Director,  Division  of  Research  on  Learning  in
Formal and Informal Settings, Directorate for Education and Human Resources,
National Science Foundation

Questions submitted by Chair Daniel Lipinski
Q1. In  your  testimony  you  discussed  the  challenge  of  appropriately  assessing  arid
evaluating learning in informal environments, Please elaborate on the standards
and  benchmarks  currently  used  to  evaluate  the  impact  of  informal  STEM  edu-
cation  programs  funded  by  the  NSF.  What  is  NSF  doing  to  continue  to  develop
anti improve metrics for evaluation?

A1. The  NSF  has  assumed  a  lead  role—drawing  on  the  expertise  ire  its  Informal
Science  Education  (ISE)  program—in  creating  a  framework  of  broad  categories  of
potential  project  impact.  In  2008,  NSF  published  an  online  guidebook,  Framework
(http://
for  Evaluating 
www.informalscience.org/research/show/3643).  The  guidebook  helps  Principal  In-
vestigators  (PIs)  develop  appropriate  research  designs  for  the  evaluation  of  their
projects.

Informal  Science  Education  Projects 

Impacts  of 

Five impact categories for the assessment of informal education and outreach are

discussed in the guidebook (pp. 22–23):

• Awareness, knowledge, or understanding of STEM concepts, processes, or ca-

reers

• Engagement or interest in STEM concepts, processes, or careers
• Attitude towards STEM-related topics or capabilities
• Behavior resulting from experience
• Skills based on experience.

These  categories  represent  the  types  of  impacts  that  are  desirable  as  a  result  of
informal  science  education  activities,  and  provide  a  possible  framework  for  stand-
ards and benchmarks in the field. The guidebook provides detail about the elements
of  each  of  these  types  of  impacts;  for  example,  ‘‘engagement  or  interest’’  is  elabo-
rated  for  public  audiences  as  ‘‘measurable  demonstration  of  assessment  of,  change
in,  or  exercise  of  engagement/interest  in  a  particular  scientific  topic,  concept,  phe-
nomena, theory, or careers central to the project.’’ (p. 21). An impact relative to en-
gagement  ‘‘could  be  supported  by  evidence  that  a  project  deliverable  has  evoked
short-term  interest,  or  has  strengthened  prior  longer-term  interest,  in  a  topic  or
area of STEM.’’ (p. 22).

The guidebook also includes recommendations on study designs, assessment strat-
egies,  examples,  and  resources  to  help  potential  awardees  who  may  be  unfamiliar
with  evaluation  of  learning  in  informal  settings.  The  NSF  solicitation  for  the  ISE
program  points  directly  to  this  document.  Also,  project-level  evaluation  was  a  pri-
mary focus of the 2009 conference for all PIs supported under the ISE program. As
projects reach completion, information about their outcomes is captured in an online
project  monitoring  system  for  future  analysis  and  synthesis.  Some  projects  provide
self-generated  quantitative  benchmarks  for  the  analysis  of  their  outcomes,  though
this  has  not  been  mandatory  because  the  idiosyncratic  nature  of  impacts  and  audi-
ences makes for large, inherent variability in expected outcomes.

The  NSF-funded  National  Research  Council  report,  Learning  Science  in  Informal
Environments  (2009)  includes  a  ‘‘strands  of  science  learning’’  framework  that  pro-
poses  the  types  of  science-specific  outcomes  that  might  be  sought  through  informal
learning  environments.  According  to  this  framework,  learners  in  informal  environ-
ments:

1. Experience excitement, interest, and motivation to learn about phenomena in

the natural and physical world.

2. Come  to  generate,  understand,  remember,  and  use  concepts,  explanations,

arguments, models, and facts related to science.

3. Manipulate,  test,  explore,  predict,  question,  observe,  and  make  sense  of  the

natural and physical world.

4. Reflect  on  science  as  a  way  of  knowing;  on  processes,  concepts,  and  institu-

tions of science, and on their own process of learning about phenomena.

5. Participate  in  scientific  activities  and  learning  practices  with  others,  using

scientific language and tools.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00080 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

77

6. Think about themselves as science learners and develop an identity as some-
one  who  knows  about;  uses,  and  sometimes  contributes  to  science.  (p.  ES–
3, Prepublication Copy).

Together,  the  framework  and  the  strands  provide  the  basis  for  the  development

of more specific standards and benchmarks.

The  NRC  report  also  includes  a  chapter  on  contemporary  evaluation  issues,  ap-
proaches,  and  methods  to  help  move  the  field  forward.  Synthesis  documents  such
as  this  provide  us  with  the  information  we  need  in  order  to  advance  the  field  of
evaluation of informal science education/outreach.

The  Foundation  also  utilizes  online  resources  to  improve  evaluation  of  informal
science  education  activities.  For  example,  the  NSF  Innovative  Technology  Experi-
ences  for  Students  and  Teachers  (ITEST)  program  sponsors  a  Learning  Resource
Center  web  site  where  ITEST  project  staff  can  share  information  and  explore  eval-
uation and assessment practices. It is hoped this type of online community will en-
courage  evaluators  to  collaborate  in  the  development  of  standard  instruments.  Sev-
eral  DRL  program  solicitations  include  invitations  for  proposals  to  explore  assess-
ment methods.
Q2. In  your  testimony,  you  used  the  Nanoscale  Informal  Science  Education  (NISE)
Net initiative as an example of a collaborative effort at the Foundation to broad-
en participation through informal STEM education. Could you elaborate on the
development  and  ongoing  work  of  NISE  Net?  Has  the  NISE  Net  program  been
evaluated yet? If so, what are tire findings?

A2. The Nanoscale Informal Science Education Network (NISE Net) was funded by
NSF  in  FY  2005  through  a  five-year  cooperative  agreement  with  the  Museum  of
Science  in  Boston,  Massachusetts  in  partnership  with  the  San  Francisco-based
Exploratorium and the Science Museum of Minnesota, along with many other orga-
nizations. Its purpose is to increase public awareness and understanding of, and en-
gagement  with,  nanoscale  science  and  technology  through  formation  of  a  national
network  consisting  of  science  museums  linked  with  nanoresearch  centers.  Through
its growing number of partners, NISE Net has been developing a ‘‘catalog’’ of exhibit
units,  demonstrations,  programs,  forums,  media,  and  other  resources,  as  well  as  a
community of practice around their development and use (see www.nisenet.org). For
example, NanoDays was established last year as a rational week-long series of edu-
cational  activities  supported  by  the  NISE  Network.  This  year,  during  the  period
March  28  through  April  5,  more  than  200  sites  in  48  states,  the  Commonwealth  of
Puerto Rico, and the District of Columbia are expected to take part.

Evaluation  is  integral  to  NISE  Network  activities.  To  guide  educational  efforts,
front-end studies were developed in order to gather initial data on public awareness
and understanding. Resources in the ‘‘catalog’’ mentioned above were developed and
are  being  improved  through  ongoing  collaborative,  formative  evaluation.  Since  the
project is not yet in its final year, summative evaluations have not been completed;
however, some initial findings are available. For example, based on a sample of mu-
seum  visitors  exposed  to  nano-topic  programs,  exhibits,  forums  and  activities,  sig-
nificantly  more  of  the  treatment  group  than  the  control  group  reported  an  aware-
ness  of  benefits  and  risks  of  nanotechnology  [Multi-media  Research  (Bellport,  New
York,  September  2008)  Summative  Evaluation  of  Awareness  of  Nanotechnology  by
the  Museum  Public].  Participants  in  another  study  who  were  engaged  in  a  public
forum  on  the  potential  societal  impacts  of  nanotechnology  showed  gains  in  knowl-
edge  and  awareness  of  viewpoints  other  than  their  own  [Multi-media  Research
(Bellport,  New  York,  September  2008)  Summative  Evaluation  of  NISE  Network’s
Public  Forum:  Nanotechnology  in  Health  Care].  This  study  also  demonstrated  the
multiplier  effort  of  inspiring  significant  portions  of  attendees  to  discuss  with  others
what is nanotechnology and its associated benefits and risks. Additional studies are
being carried out, including an evaluation of the effectiveness of the Network itself.

Questions submitted by Representative Vernon J. Ehlers
Q1. What are the biggest research questions in need of answers in the field of infor-

mal science education?

A1. Little  formal  research  has  been  conducted  on  the  relationship  between  largely
voluntary activities and their consequent impacts on STEM learning and continued
engagement  with  science.  There  are  questions  and  issues  in  several  areas  that  de-
serve study and research.

The  most  pressing  questions  have  to  do  with  the  effectiveness  of  learning  in  the

intersection of formal and informal learning environments:

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00081 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

78

What is the optimal relationship between institutions of informal learning and
institutions  of  formal  learning,  particularly  in  anticipation  of  dynamic  shifts
due  to  cyber-learning?  What  are  better  models  of  formal-informal  collaboration
than  just  good  field  trips  or  teacher  professional  development,  and  what  do  we
know  about  their  effectiveness?  What  are  the  key  elements  of  effective  models
for  coupling  the  strengths  of  the  formal  environments  (emphasis  on  abstrac-
tions,  symbolic  learning,  and  reflection  aided  by  a  knowledgeable  guide)  with
the  strengths  of  the  informal  learning  environments  (direct  access  to  phe-
nomena,  self-directed  learning,  affective  components)?  How  can  the  informal
education  community’s  strong  understanding  of  motivation  and  audience  needs
be more accessible and useful in the formal education environment?
In  addition,  questions  about  outcome  measures  and  the  nature  of  learning  in
informal settings also need to be addressed:
As noted in the NRC study (Learning Science in Informal Environments), learn-
ing  can  comprise  multiple  strands.  How  are  they  woven  together  in  informal
settings?  For  example,  how  does  affective  learning  (learning  that  is  emotion-
based  and  often  driven  by  curiosity)  relate  to  cognitive  understanding  or  build-
ing a science-related identity?
Finally,  ongoing  work  is  needed  to  address  learning  over  the  lifespan,  the  role
of technology, and the creation of a theoretical base:
How  do  people  maintain  and  gain  new  knowledge  of  modem  and  emerging
science  throughout  their  lives?  Do  informal  science  institutions  play  a  major
role in increasing the science knowledge of learners as they age and participate
in  the  activities  and  requirements  of  democracy?  What  other  information
sources and settings provide lifelong learning opportunities in science, and what
features  are  most  effective?  How  do  learners  currently  transition  across  set-
tings/media/communities as they learn science throughout their lives? What are
the  barriers  to  creating  a  sustainable,  custom-designed  trajectory  of  life-long
learning of science?
How  can  new  technologies  and  participatory  models  (like  Web  2.0,  simulations
and virtual activities) be harnessed to create a K-to-gray environment where all
people play the roles of teachers and learners in their lives? What are the essen-
tial design principles of this kind of cyber-enhanced learning infrastructure?
What  kinds  of  intellectual  infrastructures  will  be  effective  for  building  knowl-
edge in the field of informal learning? What kind of structure will support accu-
mulation of results of research and evaluation, building on the wisdom of prac-
tice,  and  involving  both  researchers  and  practitioners  in  a  common  endeavor?
How  do  we  effectively  utilize  cyber-learning  technologies  so  that  the  field  cre-
ates, maintains its own truly useful knowledge base?

Q2. How  is  the  existing  research  made  available  to  the  diverse  group  of  informal

science practitioners?

A2. The  NSF  sponsors  and  supports  a  major  online  resource  [InformalScience.org]
to promote and advance the field of informal learning in science and other domains.
This  site  is  a  place  to  share  knowledge  and  support  a  community  of  learners  to  in-
form informal science learning theory, evaluation, standards and practices. The web
site  was  redesigned  in  September  2008  and,  subsequent  to  the  site  renovation,  log
server data is now collected. Based on Google Analytics reports for September 2008–
March  2009  (seven  months),  the  site  received  16,294  unique  visits  (avg.  2327/
month). It served 84,328 individual page views (avg. 12,046/per month) with an av-
erage  of  5.18  pages  viewed  per  visit.  The  site  sustained  a  healthy  00:04:18  average
time-on-site and over 70 percent were new site visits with a unique IP address. The
most heavily used sections of the site ordered by content type were Member Pages,
Research,  Projects,  Evaluation  and  Events.  As  of  30  March  2009,  the  site  has  218
members,  a  searchable/downloadable  repository  of  168  evaluation  reports
(summative,  formative,  and  front-end)  that  are  largely  NSF/ISE  funded.  The  re-
search literature database contains 7,628 references relevant to the field of informal
learning  and  science  education  and  the  site  maintains  a  calendar  of  important
events, conferences, seminars, and funding deadlines.

The  NSF-funded  Center  for  Advancement  of  Informal  Science  Education  (CAISE)
provides online tools and resources that connect the informal science education com-
munity  by  stimulating  conversation  and  collaboration  across  the  entire  field—in-
cluding broadcast media, science centers and museums, zoos, and aquariums; botan-
ical  gardens  and  nature  centers,  digital  media  and  gaming,  science  journalism,
youth,  community  and  after-school  programs.  CAISE  is  a  partnership  among  NSF,

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00082 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

79

the Association of Science-Technology Centers, Oregon State University, the Univer-
sity  of  Pittsburgh  Center  for  Learning  in  Out-of-School  Environments,  and  the  Vis-
itor Studies Association. Inverness Research Associates serves as evaluator.

NSF-funded  reports  (i.e.,  the  NRC  Learning  Science  in  Informal  Environments
and the Frameworks for Evaluating informal Science Education Projects) contribute
to the dissemination of new knowledge, as well as scholarly contributions to profes-
sional  journals  such  as  the  Journal  of  Museum  Education,  Curator,  Science  Edu-
cation,  and  the  Journal  of  Research  in  Science  Teaching.  NSF  program  staff  lead
and  participate  in  regional  and  national  conferences  such  as  the  American  Edu-
cational  Research  Association,  the  Association  of  Science  and  Technology  Centers,
the Visitors Studies Association, National Science Teachers Association, and the Na-
tional Association of Research in Science Teaching.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00083 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

80

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

Responses  by  Philip  Bell,  The  Geda  and  Phil  Condit  Professor  of  Science  and  Math
Education,  Associate  Professor  of  the  Learning  Sciences;  Director,  Institute  for
Science  and  Mathematics  Education,  University  of  Washington,  Seattle;  Co-
Chair,  Committee  on  Learning  Science  in  Informal  Environments,  Board  on
Science Education, National Academy of Sciences, The National Academies

Questions submitted by Representative Vernon J. Ehlers
Q1. What  are  the  reasonable  outcomes/goals  for  informal  science  learning  environ-
ments  on  which  evaluations  should  be  based?  How  can  the  controversy  over  de-
fining  such  outcomes  be  removed?  Are  the  ‘‘six  strands’’  formatted  in  a  user-
friendly way for informal science programs to utilize?

A1. The  NRC  Learning  Science  in  Informal  Environments  report  advances  the  six
strands  of  science  learning  (introduced  in  Chapter  2)  as  the  set  of  comprehensive
outcomes that relate to the educational opportunities associated with informal envi-
ronments  and  experiences.  The  summaries  and  findings  of  research  and  evaluation
studies  included  in  the  report  are  largely  framed  in  terms  of  the  six  strands  in  a
way  that  we  hope  allows  informal  science  researchers,  evaluators,  developers  and
informal  staff  to  see  how  the  six  theoretically-grounded  strands  relate  to  their  ac-
tivities.  The  follow-on  NRC  volume  that  is  currently  in  development  called  Sur-
rounded by Science is intended for the practitioner audiences. It is designed to make
the six strands—and the findings of the research report, more generally—accessible
to  a  broader  audience  by  documenting  in  a  more  practical  way  how  they  relate  to
a set of case studies from informal science education.

One  of  the  main  challenges  at  present  in  the  informal  science  education  field  is
the  development  of  means  for  assessing  participants’  learning  across  the  range  of
experiences. Currently, studies that measure similar constructs often include unique
measures, scales, or observation protocols. The NRC committee believed more atten-
tion  should  be  given  to  the  development  of  systematic,  shared  measures  and  meth-
ods for understanding and assessing learning in evaluation and research studies, es-
pecially  if  researchers  and  evaluators  are  to  attempt  assessment  of  cumulative
learning  across  different  episodes  and  in  different  settings.  Evaluations  do  need  to
attend to unique program elements and local contextual features, but the committee
was convinced that there were many benefits to be gained from evaluation activities
being more explicit about their theoretical foundations. We proposed the six strands
as the core dimensions of learning to attend to in those efforts.

It  should  also  be  said  that  the  committee  was  convinced  that  researchers  and
evaluators should use assessment methods that do not violate participants’ expecta-
tions  about  learning  in  informal  settings.  Learners  in  informal  environments  are
often motivated by a range of factors, including entertainment, family care, tourism,
etc. and so engage in these settings with related expectations (e.g., enjoyment, fam-
ily  bonding,  etc.).  The  educational  measures  and  methods  associated  with  formal
academic  learning  experiences  are  frequently  problematic  in  this  regard.  Methods
should address the science strands, provide valid evidence across topics and venues,
and  be  designed  in  ways  that  allow  educators  and  learners  alike  to  reflect  on  the
learning taking place in these environments. Chapter 3 of the NRC report provides
significant  detail  on  state-of-the-art  assessment  methods  related  to  the  six  science
learning strands.
Q2. Where do you go to find research when developing ISE programs? Have you used
NSF-funded or other federal agency-funded research? Are you aware of the 2008
Framework for Evaluating Impacts of Informal Science Education Projects men-
tioned  by  Dr.  Ferrini-Mundy?  And  can  you  provide  examples  of  how  federally-
sponsored educational research has been applied to existing programs?

A2. The  NRC  committee  found  that  the  literature  on  learning  science  in  informal
environments is vast, but the quality of the research is uneven, at least in part due
to  limited  publication  outlets  (i.e.,  dedicated  journals  and  special  editions)  and  a
lack  of  incentives  to  publish  for  many  researchers  and  evaluators  in  non-academic
positions. We recommended that researchers, evaluators, and other leaders in infor-
mal  education  should  broaden  opportunities  for  publication  of  peer-reviewed  re-
search and evaluation, and provide incentives for investigators in nonacademic posi-
tions to publish their work in these outlets.

The committee concluded that further development of common frameworks, stand-
ards  of  evidence,  language  and  values  will  require  new  ways  to  share  knowledge
and  expertise.  Several  leading  thinkers  have  recognized  this  need.  Journal  special

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00084 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

81

issues,  the  new  Center  for  Advancement  of  Informal  Science  Education  (CAISE),
and  2008  framework  from  the  National  Science  Foundation  on  evaluating  the  im-
pact  of  informal  science  education  have  initiated  and  furthered  this  work,  with  the
goal of contributing to better knowledge integration. We are not aware of a system-
atic  comparison  of  our  NRC  Learning  Science  in  Informal  Environments  consensus
volume  and  the  2008  Framework  for  Evaluating  Impacts  of  Informal  Science  Edu-
cation Projects (mentioned by Dr. Ferrini-Mundy during the hearing). However, two
of  the  NRC  committee  members  also  served  on  the  committee  that  authored  the
Framework  report.  They  have  stated  to  me  that  the  two  reports  are  intellectually
compatible and mutually informative. It seems to me that the NRC report provides
a theoretical framing for how to conceptualize and approach evaluation work for dif-
ferent purposes and points to state-of-the-art assessment methods while the Frame-
work report provides more extended treatment of the specific measures and methods
that  could  used  for  different  venues  and  configurations  for  informal  science  activi-
ties.

When  the  NSF  funded  the  NRC  Learning  Science  in  Informal  Environments  con-
sensus volume, one of its goals was to compile the high-quality research from infor-
mal  science  education  together  into  one  volume  so  that  it  could  serve  as  a  guiding
resource  for  that  quickly  developing  field.  The  committee  hopes  that  this  research
report  and  the  follow-on  practitioner  volume,  Surrounded  by  Science,  serve  that
function  to  a  useful  degree.  Much  of  the  initial  reaction  from  practitioners  to  the
NRC  report  has  been  in  this  direction;  they  say  that  it  captures  in  words  much  of
the  wisdom  of  practice  as  they  understand  it.  Researchers  have  reported  that  the
volume  will  help  frame  productive  discussions  within  the  field  that  will  help  guide
its development.

Beyond  the  NRC  volume,  the  NSF  has  been  developing  resources  that  allow  the
work  of  the  informal  science  education  field  to  be  increasingly  cumulative  and
impactful.  The  online  portals,  InformalScience.org  and  the  ExhibitFiles.org,  as  well
as the more recently funded Center for Advancement of Informal Science Education
(CAISE), a coordinating effort for the field, are leading examples in this regard. My
personal sense as a learning scientist is that InformalScience.org is heavily used by
researchers,  program  and  exhibit  developers,  and  evaluators  looking  to  build  upon
prior  projects,  much  of  which  is  federally  funded  work.  In  fact,  recently  funded
projects  under  NSF’s  informal  science  program  are  required  to  post  project  evalua-
tions  to  InformalScience.org.  Clearly,  the  results  of  prior  federal  investment  are
being used in significant ways to inform new developments in the field. Program of-
ficers  within  the  NSF’s  Informal  Science  Education  program  would  have  a  detailed
sense of these historical lineages in the work.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00085 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

82

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

Responses  by  Andrea  J.  Ingram,  Vice  President,  Education  and  Guest  Services,  Mu-

seum of Science and Industry, Chicago

Questions submitted by Representative Ralph M. Hall
Q1. Your  teacher  professional  development  workshops  sound  very  successful.  I  am
impressed  that  you  offer  these  workshops,  lesson  plans  and  follow-up  materials
to these teachers at no cost AND fund their substitute teacher while they attend
AND provide a class field trip afterwards. How long have you been doing these?
How  many  teachers  have  participated?  How  are  they  selected?  And,  how  is  this
program funded?

A1. The  Museum’s  Institute  for  Quality  Science  Teaching  has  offered  a  year-long
teacher  professional  development  workshop  series  since  the  2006–07  school  year,
making  this  the  third  year  of  the  program.  Since  the  program  began,  320  teachers
have  participated  in  the  year-long  series.  We  also  work  with  an  additional  700
teachers  annually  in  other  workshops  ranging  from  half-day  sessions  to  three-day
programs. Our entire scope of professional development programs cost $565,000 an-
nually  and  are  supported  with  funds  raised  by  the  Museum  from  individuals,  cor-
porations, and foundations.

The  workshop  series  uses  an  application-based  process  to  select  participants.  We
consider how many years an applicant has taught science, his comfort with teaching
science, grades taught (we target 4th through 8th grade), and previous professional
development  experience  in  science.  Our  goal  is  to  enable  teachers  who  most  need
our  help.  We  aim  to  work  with  teachers  who  are  new  to  the  profession  as  well  as
those who are more seasoned but are new to teaching science. We consider an appli-
cant’s school to help ensure that we work with high-need schools largely in the Chi-
cago Public Schools system but also from high-need suburban and parochial schools.
Teachers  are  required  to  apply  in  pairs  from  schools—to  ensure  shared  resources
and continuity within a school—and principals are required to indicate their support
of their teachers participating in this program.
Q2. Could you expand a bit on your Community Initiative programs, specifically the
Science  Minors  youth  development  program  and  Science  Achievers  program.  I
am  especially  interested  to  know  if  you  are  following  these  students  after  they
finish  high  school  to  see  if  they  continue  their  education  and,  if  so,  choose  to
pursue  a  STEM  major?  If  not,  I  would  certainly  encourage  you  to  do  so,  as  I
believe  this  would  be  a  real  measure  of  the  programs’  success.  As  the  program
matures, it would be interesting to see if they continue with a career in a STEM
field.

A2. The  focus  of  the  Science  Minors  series  of  programs  is  on  children  and  teens  in
the community who are in need of new opportunities. The series includes three lev-
els of engagement which reach over 5,000 students each year. Teens in the Science
Minors youth development program attend 10 weeks of science education and train-
ing by Museum staff and outside scientists and volunteer to demonstrate science ex-
periments for Museum guests. Throughout their work, Science Minors gain a better
understanding of science, a first-hand look at science career opportunities, and pub-
lic speaking skills. Since the program’s debut in 2003, about 400 teens have partici-
pated.

In the most engaging level, Science Achievers pursue more rigorous science topics
and  prepare  for  college  and  careers.  These  teens  participate  in  internships,  mentor
new  classes  of  Science  Minors  and  even  facilitate  Science  Minors  Clubs.  They  have
access  to  more  advanced  science  experiences  and  receive  additional  college  and  ca-
reer  readiness.  This  program  is  based  on  research  that  indicates  programs  that  in-
corporate  role  models,  internships,  and  college-preparation  activities  have  been
shown to increase self-confidence and interest in STEM courses and careers, as well
as improving science knowledge and skills and graduation rates. About 100 students
participate each year.

We have built a network to provide ongoing support to and communications with
our  students  who  have  gone  on  to  college.  Through  social  networking  sites  like
Facebook,  Museum  staff  members  maintain  relationships  with  grads  and  invite
them  back  for  programs  held  throughout  the  year.  Last  year,  20  of  the  24  partici-
pants  who  were  seniors  received  full  or  partial  scholarships.  We  know  at  least  half
of last year’s graduates are currently interested in STEM majors.

To fully understand the impact of our programs, we are working with the Chapin
Hall Center for Children at the University of Chicago on a project to collect longitu-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00086 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

83

dinal  data  on  our  students.  Chapin  Hall  has  submitted  a  grant  to  the  National
Science Foundation to help fund this effort.
Q3. The House recently reauthorized the National Nanotechnology Initiative. During
consideration of this measure in the last Congress, we heard from many groups
that  the  general  public  needs  to  be  better  informed  on  the  pros  and  cons  of  the
use of nanotechnology. What role do, or could, your organizations play in public
awareness campaigns such as this?

A3. The Museum has several initiatives related to this issue. We are connected with
NISE–NET  and  are  participating  in  their  NanoDays  program—a  week-long  series
of hands-on activities for the public about nanoscience and technology. Museum staff
members  as  well  as  Northwestern  University  graduate  students  are  conducting
these  activities  for  Museum  guests  March  28–April  4,  2009.  We  will  continue  this
program in subsequent years.

The  Museum  also  is  in  the  process  of  developing  a  permanent  exhibition  on
nanotechnology  that  will  feature  basic  information  as  well  as  new  developments  in
nanoresearch and applications.

The  Museum  produced  a  symposium  on  ‘‘Innovations  in  Nanotechnology’’  on  Jan.
26, 2008. This event was supported by the American Academy for the Advancement
of  Science  as  a  sub-award  from  an  NSF  grant.  The  audience  was  middle-  and  high
school students, their parents, teachers, and Museum of Science and Industry mem-
bers.  The  symposium  was  done  in  collaboration  with  the  University  of  Chicago  and
Northwestern University. We produced a DVD with education demonstrations which
will be posted on the Museum’s website.

The Museum also was the location for an episode of PBS’s ‘‘Dragonfly TV’’ science
show  that  featured  nanoscience.  The  episode,  ‘‘Small  is  Different,’’  was  filmed  in
summer 2008 and aired in fall 2008 on PBS stations across the country. In the epi-
sode,  the  young  stars,  Chicagoans  Alettie  and  Yvonne,  learn  that  nanoparticles  are
responsible  for  the  colors  in  some  medieval  stained  glass  and  see  that  nanogold
makes glass red.

Questions submitted by Representative Vernon J. Ehlers
Q1. Where do you go to find research when developing ISE programs? Have you used
NSF-funded or other federal agency-funded research? Are you aware of the 2008
Framework for Evaluating Impacts of Informal Science Education Projects men-
tioned  by  Dr.  Ferrini-Mundy?  And  can  you  provide  examples  of  how  federally-
sponsored educational research has been applied to existing programs?

A1. When  developing  ISE  programs,  we  utilize  publications  and  resources  from  a
variety  of  resources  including  the  National  Research  Council,  U.S.  Department  of
Education, Illinois State Board of Education, American Association for the Advance-
ment  of  Science  (AAAS)  Project  2061,  National  Science  Teachers  Association
(NSTA),  Informalscience.org,  the  Association  of  Science  and  Technology  Centers
(ASTC),  the  Education  Development  Center  (EDC)  and  the  Coalition  for  Science
After  School  to  inform  our  practices.  The  2008  Framework  for  Evaluating  Impacts
of Informal Science Education Projects has been reviewed and we have started inte-
grating the framework into our planning and development efforts.

Staff  with  our  Center  for  the  Advancement  of  Science  Education  use  federally
funded  research  to  develop  programs  for  teachers  and  school  groups.  This  includes
our year-long professional development workshops series and our hands-on Learning
Lab  programs  for  school  groups  visiting  the  Museum.  We  use  a  range  of  materials
from  AAAS  Project  2061,  including  the  Atlas  for  Science  Literacy,  Benchmarks  for
Science  Literacy,  and  Science  for  All  Americans,  to  match  program  content  to  what
students  need  to  learn  as  they  move  from  kindergarten  through  12th  grade.  By
identifying  key  ideas,  the  connections  between  those  ideas,  and  the  ages  at  which
students are most ready to learn them, these tools provide a framework for effective
science instruction. For example, in our Get Energized! teacher professional develop-
ment workshop series, we use the Atlas to select which energy topic to cover at what
time.  Our  curriculum  introduces  mechanical  energy  before  moving  on  to  electrical
energy, thermal and sound energy, and light energy.

Our  efforts  have  been  recognized  by  AAAS  Project  2061,  which  enlisted  our  help
to develop and host a recent workshop for science museum staff called ‘‘Using Atlas
of  Science  Literacy  in  Informal  Science  Learning  Settings.’’  This  workshop  was  the
first  time  the  materials  were  presented  specifically  for  an  informal  science  institu-
tion audience.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00087 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

84

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

Responses  by  Robert  M.  Lippincott,  Senior  Vice  President  for  Education,  The  Public

Broadcasting Service (PBS)

Questions submitted by Representative Ralph M. Hall
Q1. Who  developed  the  content  for  the  lesson  plans,  interactive  resources  and  class-
room  activities  for  PBS  Teachers,  your  web  service  for  pre-K–12  educators,  and
for  PBS  TeacherLine,  your  professional  development  of  teachers  service?  How
are  these  products  reviewed  and  assessed  and  how  are  they  correlated  to  state
standards, given the broadness of these standards?

A1. PBS  Teachers  and  the  associated  websites  on  PBS.org,  including  PBS
TeacherLine,  have  been  designed  and  developed  by  educators,  educational  consult-
ants  and  public  media  producers  working  with  PBS  and  local  PBS  stations.  Each
has its own advisory group (see attachment).

The kinds of resources sought, and the topics needed for PBS Teachers are speci-
fied  by  the  Teacher  Advisory  Group,  a  select  team  of  educators  who  meet  monthly
by  phone  and  annually  in  Washington,  DC,  to  review  and  guide  the  development
of the PBS Teachers sites.

PBS  TeacherLine  has  a  national  advisory  group  of  educational  leaders  who  over-
see  the  professional  development  services  offered  and  how  these  services  are  cor-
related  to  state  needs.  The  group  meets  via  webinar  four  times  per  year  to  review
iterative  formative  product  research  and  to  provide  guidance  on  development.  The
research  and  evaluation  of  the  services  that  are  most  needed  and  that  prove  most
effective begin with formative research and include longitudinal studies. The evalua-
tion components of our services are critical to maintaining their educational quality
and are supported by approximately one-quarter of the total budget.

Each  resource  submitted  is  carefully  reviewed  for  accuracy  and  utility  by  PBS
education  content  managers.  It  is  then  assigned  a  grade  level  and  tagged  with  the
metadata  that  will  allow  it  to  be  more  precisely  searched  by  users.  The  fields  of
metadata include standard descriptors, including the title and type of resources. We
are currently working with teachers to ensure that the resources are aligned to the
state standards from each of the 50 states.

PBS will use the services of a nationally recognized vendor competitively selected
for quality of service and utility of alignment to encode the state educational stand-
ards alignment. Each of these alignments are reviewed by PBS editors, and the ma-
terials  are  commissioned  by  PBS  or  contributed  by  stations  and  producers.  As  I
mentioned in my testimony, with the launch of our new project we call EDCAR, the
Educational  Digital  Content  Asset  Repository,  these  standards-based  lesson  plans
will be available to educators nationwide later this year.
Q2. You  testified  that  less  than  20  percent  of  PBS  funding  is  federal  dollars.  Ap-
proximately what percentage of that federal money is spent on STEM education
activities, and which federal entities are the sources of the funds? In what other
ways  are  PBS  STEM  education  activities  supported?  How  closely  do  you  work
with industry, and please describe some of those partnerships?

A2. Technically, PBS itself does not receive any federal dollars specifically dedicated
to  STEM  activities.  However,  PBS’  online  and  on-air  content  constitutes  a  wide
array  of  informal  learning  resources,  many  of  which  focus  on  the  areas  of  science,
technology,  engineering  and  mathematics.  All  sources  of  funding  are  invested  by
PBS  for  the  public  media  production  community,  according  to  the  programming  in-
terest and educational needs of our member stations and the American public.

The  money  that  we  receive  from  CPB  and  other  federal  sources,  such  as  the  De-
partment  of  Education,  are  invested  in  content  that  spans  many  genres  and  indi-
vidual  projects  such  as  our  interconnection  system—the  infrastructure  that  allows
PBS to distribute programming to local public television stations—as well as Ready
To Learn and TeacherLine.

Our system-wide Science, Technology, Engineering and Mathematics (STEM) Col-
laborative is creating digital education resources that will ensure that students and
educators  have  access  to  high-quality,  standards-based  digital  education  content—
in  each  of  the  STEM  areas.  Within  the  first  stage  of  the  EDCAR  launch,  we  are
primed to have a significant pool of digital content focused on topics such as climate
science  and  other  STEM-related  areas.  We  understand  that  television  and  on-air
programs are a just one part of the entire informal learning environment approach.
Online  broadband  access  and  digital  media  are  dramatically  changing  the  opportu-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00088 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

85

nities  and  challenges  the  Nation’s  educators  have  to  improve  STEM  education.  As
one educator noted to us when describing her classroom:

‘‘I  have  found  both  video  and  lessons  very  helpful.  The  website  is  also  fun  for
students.  I  use  the  videos  as  focuses  in  some  of  the  classes  and  the  lessons  are
pretty  awesome.  Other  than  videos  students  completed  an  interactive  activity
called  Building  Big,  which  helped  them  understand  many  concepts  that  go  into
the  construction  of  buildings.  They  used  this  knowledge  to  construct  their  own
earthquake  proof  building  which  was  later  tested.’’ —Sally  from  Texas,  PBS
Teacher

Several  of  our  stations  are  partnering  with  education  organizations  to  determine
the  key  needs  of  STEM  awareness  and  how  to  engage  people  in  the  subject.  Cur-
rently,  74  percent  of  our  stations  offer  education  services  that  address  STEM  con-
tent. There are plans to create half-hour and hour-long programs; feature STEM re-
lated  content  on  existing  magazine  programs;  and  run  interstitial  programming—
30-to-60  second  programs  that  air  between  our  longer  shows—with  enough  fre-
quency to impact the viewer.

We  continue  to  work  very  closely  with  higher  education  institutions.  Nearly  70
percent  of  our  stations  have  established  partnerships  with  universities.  For  exam-
ple, for the past three years, WFSU in Tallahassee has partnered with Florida State
University’s laboratory to develop a two-week, hands-on science camp for 80 seventh
and eighth grade girls with support from local engineering firms. The camp had tre-
mendous success and has become a signature event for WFSU.

PBS  TeacherLine  partners  with  23  colleges  and  universities  in  all  50  states  (see
attachment)  to  provide  professional  development  on  STEM-related  topics.  PBS  de-
velops  its  TeacherLine  online  professional  development  courses  through  collabora-
tions  with  organizations  such  as  the  International  Society  for  Technology  in  Edu-
cation  (ISTE),  the  National  Council  of  Teachers  of  Mathematics  (NCTM)  and  the
Concord Consortium. PBS Teachers also provides free STEM-based webinars to edu-
cators, hosted by educational experts, authors and program producers.

As previously noted, many of our award-winning science and math television pro-
grams—NOVA,  CYBERCHASE,  DRAGONFLYTV  and  DESIGN  SQUAD—are  lead-
ers and models, and many of these programs are funded by industry partners, such
as the National Science Foundation (NSF):
funding 

• NOVA,  which  receives 

from  several  organizations, 

including
ExxonMobil, has consistently been the #1 most-used video resource in all U.S.
high school classrooms, including all public, cable and network programs, ac-
cording  to  studies  conducted  by  Grunwald  Associates  over  the  past  several
years.
• CYBERCHASE—the  only  math  series  for  children  on  American  TV—reaches
five  million  viewers  weekly  and  receives  major  funding  from  NSF,  Northrop
Grumman  and  Ernst  &  Young.  The  program’s  companion  website,
CYBERCHASE  Online,  has  had  more  than  1.7  billion  page  views.  According
to  a  study  conducted  by  MediaKidz  Research  &  Consulting,  students  who
watched  CYBERCHASE  found  solutions  to  math  problems  that  were  mathe-
matically more sophisticated than students who did not watch the series.
• DRAGONFLYTV—the  only  all-science  television  show  for  elementary  and
middle-school kids—receives major funding from NSF and Best Buy Children
Foundation.  Because  the  show  encourages  students  to  pursue  careers  in
science,  each  episode,  along  with  its  website,  features  a  ‘‘Real  Scientist’’  seg-
ment, which highlights scientists discussing their chosen career. This is note-
worthy,  considering  that  ‘‘75  percent  of  Nobel  Prize  winners  in  the  sciences
report that their passion for science was first sparked in an out-of-school envi-
ronment.’’
• DESIGN  SQUAD  is  a  show  in  which  kids  compete  in  a  series  of  engineering
challenges  for  a  chance  at  a  college  scholarship.  The  show  receives  major
funding  from  the  Intel  Foundation  and  additional  funding  from  the  National
Council  of  Examiners  for  Engineering  and  Surveying,  United  Engineering
Foundation  (which  comprises  ASCE,  ASME,  AIChE,  IEEE,  AIME),  Noyce
Foundation,  Northrop  Grumman,  the  IEEE  and  the  Intel  Corporation.  The
show has worked to address a critical need in engineering education and chil-
dren’s television. Since 2007, DESIGN SQUAD and its partners have held 75
trainings  for  2,900  engineers  and  educators  and  involved  94,805  kids  and
families in engineering activities.

With additional investment, PBS could do even more to advance STEM education

in informal learning environments.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00089 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

86

Q3. The House recently reauthorized the National Nanotechnology Initiative. During
consideration of this measure in the last Congress, we heard from many groups
that  the  general  public  needs  to  be  better  informed  on  the  pros  and  cons  of  the
use of nanotechnology. What role does, or could, your organization play in public
awareness such as this?

A3. Nanotechnology, as you might recall, was the subject seen during the audio-vis-
ual part of my testimony highlighting our website pbskidsgo.org, which is aimed at
elementary school-aged children. The site allows a user to find video clips that focus
on a particular subject—in this case, nanotechnology—send the clip to a friend, play
the  full  episode  of  the  program  that  contained  that  clip  and  even  play  a  game  that
relates  to  the  video.  This  video  was  just  one  of  the  many  multi-media  interactive
features of DRAGONFLYTV’s website. DRAGONFLYTV is the only all-science show
for elementary and middle-school kids on television today.

In  November  2008,  DRAGONFLYTV  focused  its  entire  seventh  season  on
nanotechnology,  with  the  premiere  of  DRAGONFLYTV  as  part  of  a  special  grant-
initiative  funded  by  NSF.  The  series  was  among  the  first  television  science  series
to  explore  this  subject  area  and  informed  a  mass  audience  about  the  revolutionary
advances  taking  place  in  nanoscience  and  nanotechnology.  The  series  is  seen  by
more  than  one  million  people  each  week  and  airs  on  nearly  200  public  television
stations  nationwide.  And  because  14  million  children  compose  our  audience,  our
award-winning  programs  such  as  DRAGONFLYTV  and  NOVA  have  educated  chil-
dren, adults and educators on this emerging field.

Nanotechnology is a topic covered by PBS for nearly a decade, currently reaching
more  than  65  million  people  weekly,  our  news  and  public  affair  programs,  such  as
NIGHTLY BUSINESS REPORT, NEWSHOUR WITH JIM LEHRER and CHARLIE
ROSE,  have  all  highlighted  the  benefits  and  issues  of  concern  raised  by
nanotechnology.

With adequate funding, our vast reach, strong partnerships, innovative producers
and  high-quality  programs  leave  us  well-positioned  to  successfully  address  a  range
of timely and relevant topics from science to literacy. PBS continues to bring a 360-
degree approach to address topics that affect all Americans.

Questions submitted by Representative Vernon J. Ehlers
Q1. Could you elaborate on your discussion of the need for national academic stand-

ards so that broadcasters, too, have a clearer target upon which to focus?

A1. As I noted in my testimony, PBS is in full agreement with the Council of Chief
State  School  Officers,  that  it  would  be  more  useful  and  powerful  to  have  a  single
set  of  national  statements  (in  the  words  of  a  Gates  Foundation  report)  that  are
‘‘fewer, higher, and clearer’’ standards shared by all 50 states. This would allow pub-
lic  media  and  other  educational  producers  to  focus  more  efficiently  their  creativity
and  innovation  on  the  shared  goals  of  the  Nation’s  educators.  Not  incidentally,  it
would  also  serve  the  Nation’s  educators  and  students,  allowing  a  stronger,  fairer
basis  for  each  learner,  teacher,  school  and  state  to  chart  and  track  progress  and
achievement.

PBS  and  its  production  community  pride  themselves  on  creativity  and  effective-
ness as educational media producers. We have traditionally been focused on the ap-
peal  and  the  ability  of  media  to  attract  and  to  hold  the  attention  of  the  learning
audience.  In  service  to  school  populations,  it  is  critical  that  we  have  aligned  our-
selves  to  the  tasks  teachers  need  to  accomplish.  There  is  no  more  powerful  state-
ment of those tasks than the state standards that every state has articulated. How-
ever, the detailed nature of these standards, the sheer number of different—similar,
but not the same—statements of goals, benchmarks and milestones reflects the indi-
viduality  of  every  state  (indeed,  Kentucky  has  three  sets  of  such  standards).  This
makes  for  a  burdensome  task,  absorbing  financial  resources  well  beyond  the  costs
of  design  and  production,  of  aligning  media  and  teaching  resources  to  such  a  data-
base and further, for maintaining that alignment as standards are revised.
Q2. Where do you go to find research when developing ISE programs? Have you used
NSF-funded or other federal agency-funded research? Are you aware of the 2008
Framework for Evaluating Impacts of Informal Science Education Projects men-
tioned  by  Dr.  Ferrini-Mundy?  And  can  you  provide  examples  of  how  federally
sponsored educational research has been applied to existing programs?

A2. The  producers  of  PBS  informal  science  television  program  and  online  content
are well-versed in NSF research and use this knowledge when developing programs.
In  some  cases,  we  have  benefited  from  having  leading  experts  host  our  shows  for
example, Neil deGrasse Tyson, host of NOVA scienceNOW. He is a renowned astro-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00090 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

87

physicist  who  has  served  on  several  presidential  science-based  commissions  and
often provides his insight and knowledge to the program.

The  PBS  staff  includes  former  teachers  in  both  our  education  and  programming
departments.  PBS  KIDS  content  begins  with  curriculum,  and  series  are  created  to
build  knowledge,  critical  thinking,  imagination  and  curiosity.  For  example,  SID
THE SCIENCE KID, which debuted in September 2008, is based in national science
learning  standards,  cognitive  learning  theory  and  on  the  preschool  science  cur-
riculum, Preschool Pathways to Science©.

I  am  aware  of  the  2008  Framework  for  Evaluating  Impacts  of  Informal  Science
Education  Projects;  many  of  our  producers  apply  it  when  creating  programs.  NSF
continues to be a major funder of many of our award winning science and math tele-
vision  programs,  including  CYBERCHASE,  the  only  math  series  for  children  on
American  TV,  and  DRAGONFLYTV,  the  only  all-science  show  for  elementary  and
middle-school kids on television today.

education.  This 

In  late  2007,  DRAGONFLYTV  started  an  interesting  experiment  in  informal
science 
collaboration  between
DRAGONFLYTV  and  a  total  of  30  science  museums.  This  collaboration  resulted  in
putting science museums on television for the first time in an ongoing childrens se-
ries.  Each  episode  was  based  on  students  visits  to  science  museums,  carrying  out
science  inquiry  and  then  continuing  that  inquiry  outside  the  institution,  as  well  as
learning  about  careers  in  STEM.  As  required  by  NSF-affiliated  ISE  programs,  the
summative  evaluations  of  this  experiment  and  other  NSF-funded  programs  such  as
CYBERCHASE are all posted on the website informalscience.org.

In  the  case  of  DRAGONFLYTV’s  evaluations,  students  were  generally  positive
about replicating the science investigations they saw modeled on television. As a re-
sult, DRAGONFLYTV continued its collaboration with science museums for the next
season.

We have also received feedback from educators on informal science education such

as:

experiment 

involved 

the 

‘‘We  enjoy  programs  that  combine  math  and  science  skills  to  promote  learning.
One of our favorite ways of learning is through TV science and animal programs
and Internet sites. The kids love to watch educational programs on TV and then
play related online games and search for more related information on what they
have learned.’’ —Terri from South Carolina, PBS Teacher

As  I  mentioned  in  my  testimony,  we  continue  to  engage  academic  and  research
partners  in  universities  and  key  government  agencies,  including  NSF,  the  National
Institutes for Health, NASA and NOAA.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00091 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Appendix A

88

PBS TEACHERLINE ADVISORY GROUP

Our  Advisory  Board  includes  leaders  from  educational  institutions  and  profes-

sional organizations.
Chris Dede is the Timothy E. Wirth Professor of Learning Technologies at Harvard
Graduate School of Education.
Barry  Fishman  is  an  Associate  Professor  of  Learning  Technologies  in  the  Univer-
sity of Michigan School of Education.
Rob  Ramsdell  founded  FreshPond  Education  in  1996  and  has  spent  the  past  10
years  leading  the  development  of  professional  development  programs  for  K–12  edu-
cators.
Margaret Riel is a Senior Researcher at SRI, International, and Visiting Professor
at Pepperdine University’s online Master in Educational Technology program.
Dr.  Mark  Schlager  is  Associate  Director  of  Learning  Communities  in  SRI  Inter-
national’s Center for Technology in Learning (http://ctl.sri.com).
Claudette  Rasmussen  is  a  Senior  Professional  Development  Associate  with  the
Professional Services Group of Learning Point Associates.
JoEllen  Killion  is  the  National  Staff  Development  Council’s  Director  of  Special
Projects.
Raymond M. Rose is the President of Rose & Smith Associates.

PBS TEACHERS ADVISORY GROUP, 2008–2009
Anthony J. Augustin

Now  in  his  25th  year  of  teaching,  Anthony  Augustin  has  spent  more  than  half
of his life serving the students of his rural Tennessee school system. During his ten-
ure  with  the  Lawrence  County  school  system,  Anthony  has  taught  students  in
grades  7–12.  He  holds  a  Master  of  Arts  in  Education  degree  from  the  University
of North Alabama and is currently working toward an Educational Specialist degree
in  Educational  Leadership.  Throughout  his  career  as  an  educator,  Anthony  has  fo-
cused on putting technology into the hands of his students. He has been recognized
at  local,  State,  and  national  levels  for  his  excellence  in  teaching,  and  in  2006,  he
was named a Joseph B. Whitehead Educator of Distinction by the Coca-Cola Schol-
ars Foundation and honored with the Foundation for Rural Education and Develop-
ment’s  Rural  Teacher  of  the  Year  Award.  He  currently  teaches  physical,  Earth  and
environmental sciences at Loretto High School in Loretto, Tennessee.
Babs L. Bengtson, Ph.D.

Babs  L.  Bengtson,  Ph.D.,  is  the  Director  of  Educational  Services  at  Penn  State
Public  Broadcasting  (PSPB).  Bengtson  comes  to  PSPB  with  20  years  experience  in
education, winning national awards in instructional design and one national award
for her research. She has worked for a variety of companies, including U.S. Airways
and Ford Motor Company, where she gained international instructional design expe-
rience.  Bengtson  created  and  managed  her  own  company,  Bridge  Builders,  for  sev-
eral  years  before  joining  Penn  State  University  full  time.  After  joining  Penn  State
in  1998,  Bengtson  developed  professional  development  programs  for  K–12  teachers,
and  has  taught  several  courses  for  pre-service  teachers,  helping  them  learn  how  to
incorporate  multimedia  in  the  classroom.  Bengtson  earned  her  Ph.D.  in  Workforce
Education/Training  and  Development  from  Penn  State  in  1994  and  a  Master’s  of
Education  in  Adult  Education,  also  from  Penn  State.  Her  Bachelor  of  Arts  degree
in History and English is from Geneva College, a small, liberal arts college in Bea-
ver Falls, PA.
Kevin Clark

Dr.  Kevin  Clark  is  an  Associate  Professor  and  Instructional  Technology  Program
Coordinator at George Mason University in Virginia. He received his Bachelor’s and
Master’s  degree  in  computer  science  from  North  Carolina  State  University,  and  a
Ph.D. in instructional systems from Pennsylvania State University. Prior to George
Mason  University,  Dr.  Clark  worked  for  an  educational  software  company  and  was
a faculty member at San Jose State University. Dr. Clark’s corporate experience in-
cluded  positions  as  a  software  tester,  consultant,  content  designer,  program  man-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00092 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

89

ager, and founder/director of a non-profit youth program. Dr. Clark’s research inter-
ests  include  the  application  of  instructional  design  principles  and  learning  theories
to  the  design  and  development  of  online  learning  environments.  Dr.  Clark  is  also
interested in the integration of technology into non-formal learning environments as
well as issues related to digital equity. For more information, please visit his home-
page.
Traci Feldhousen

Traci  Feldhousen  is  beginning  her  fourth  year  home-schooling  her  two  children,
currently a third grader and a kindergartener. She graduated from James Madison
University  in  Harrisonburg,  Virginia  with  a  double  degree  in  history  and  Russian
language. Over the past few years, she has been a participant in several educational
cooperatives  and  is  currently  one  of  the  leaders  of  her  local  home-school  support
group.
Jane Ching Fung

Jane  Ching  Fung  has  over  24  years  of  experience  in  the  field  of  teaching  and
learning. She is in her 21st year of teaching for the Los Angeles Unified School Dis-
trict  and  currently  teaches  full-day  kindergarten  at  the  Alexander  Science  Center
School in Exposition Park. She has facilitated professional development in Early Lit-
eracy at the school, district, and State level. Jane is an active member of the Center
for  the  Future  of  Teaching  and  Learning  (www.cftl.org),  serves  on  the  board  of  the
National  Commission  on  Teaching  and  America’s  Future  (www.nctaf.org)  and  The
Larchmont  Charter  School  in  Los  Angeles  (www.Iarchmontcharter.org).  She  is  a
2002  Milken  Educator,  National  Board  Certified,  and  holds  a  Master’s  degree  in
Curriculum  and  Instruction  (Reading  and  Language  Arts).  In  2001,  Jane  served  on
Governor  Guinn’s  Education  Commission  of  the  States’  Early  Literacy  Council  and
was a member of the Independent Citizens for California’s Children Committee. Her
research  with  Teachers  Network  Leadership  Institute  (www.teachersnetwork.org/
tnli/index.htm) on new teacher collaboration is included in TNLI’s book: Taking Ac-
tion with Teacher Research.
Mary Henton

Since  joining  National  Middle  School  Association  in  1999,  Mary  Henton  has  had
several positions with the Association, from Director of Professional Development to
Director of Integrated Media Initiatives (current). Mary is responsible for providing
direction  about  leveraging  technology  and  media  to  benefit  the  Association  and  its
stakeholders.  Mary’s  entire  career  has  been  in  education.  She  has  been  an  English
teacher,  outdoor  education  teacher,  adventure  and  experiential  education  trainer
and  curriculum  developer,  and  consultant  in  team  development  and  learning.  She
has a B.A. in English (Gordon College) and an Ed.M. (Harvard University, Graduate
School of Education).
Eric Hoefler

Eric  Hoefler  taught  English  and  creative  writing  at  Woodbridge  Senior  High
School’s  Center  for  the  Fine  and  Performing  Arts  (CFPA)  in  Woodbridge,  Virginia
for  the  past  nine  years.  While  there,  he  helped  to  design  and  implement  the  CFPA
program  and  the  Center’s  four-year  creative  writing  program.  In  1999,  he  created
a  community-based  website  for  teachers  of  English  and  creative  writing  at  the
school,  which  originally  connected  students  through  forum  discussions  but  grew  to
include  profiles,  blogs,  and  file  sharing.  During  that  time,  Eric  also  helped  to  de-
velop  and  teach  an  online  creative  writing  course  as  part  of  the  county’s  Virtual
High  School  initiative.  In  2001,  Eric  became  the  Technology  Liaison  for  the  North-
ern Virginia Writing Project (NVWP), housed at George Mason University. Through
that  service,  he  has  helped  to  integrate  online  technologies  into  the  Project’s  work
and  has  led  numerous  workshops  that  help  teachers  to  understand  how  emerging
online  technologies  can  further  improve  the  teaching  of  writing.  Currently,  Eric  is
working  with  a  contracting  agency  for  the  Children’s  Bureau  to  help  bring  online
solutions to the Child Welfare Reform Project, and he continues to work with teach-
ers through his role with NVWP.
Don Jepsen-Minyard

Don  Jepsen-Minyard  has  taught  at  Crescent  Valley  High  School  in  Corvallis,  Or-
egon  since  1990.  Currently,  he  designs  and  teaches  courses  relating  to  images:
Graphic  Design,  Interactive  Design,  Photography  and  a  new,  team  taught  English
course, Story and Film. Throughout his career, He has maintained an interest both
in  designing  instruction  and  in  personal  development.  He  created  a  video  class  for
high  school  students  in  conjunction  with  the  Journalism  department  at  Oregon

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00093 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

90

State  University  and  the  Northwest  Film  Center.  He  completed  the  Film  Center’s
Media Arts for Teachers program. For two academic years, he collaborated with Bob
Madar,  winner  of  the  Christine  McAuliffe  grant,  to  design  and  implement  project-
based  curriculum.  Two  of  his  students  produced  ‘‘People  of  the  Walamala,’’  a  video
about the ethnobotany of the Kalapuya Indians, which has been added to many Uni-
versity  library  collections  in  the  Pacific  Northwest.  He  worked  briefly  as  a  consult-
ant for JD Hoye, formerly the National Director of the Federal School to Work pro-
gram, to design video-based training materials.
Gregg Legutki

Gregg Legutki is currently a Lead Project Specialist for California Technology As-
sistance Project (CTAP) in Southern California, covering Riverside, Inyo, Mono, and
San Bernardino Counties. Prior to working for CTAP, Gregg was a classroom teach-
er for over 25 years, mostly in special education. Gregg started out using technology
in the classroom with the original Apple for the Teacher Program in the early ’80s.
He  was  a  technology  mentor  both  at  the  district  and  school  site  level.  Gregg  has
been  involved  with  technology  integration  for  classroom  use  for  well  over  20  years.
In  his  current  position,  Gregg  works  with  schools  and  districts  developing  work-
shops for teachers and site administrators on effective classroom technology integra-
tion.  He  also  teaches  a  teacher  prep  class  for  Chapman  University  on  technology
integration.
Marnie Lewis

Mamie Lewis received a B.S. in elementary education from Northeastern Univer-
sity  in  1994  and  in  2002  completed  graduate  work  in  instructional  technology
through  George  Mason  University.  She  has  taught  in  third,  fifth  and  eighth  grade
classrooms  over  the  past  10  years.  She  is  currently  entering  her  third  year  as  an
Instructional  Technology  Coordinator  for  Arlington  Public  Schools  in  Virginia.  Her
role  affords  her  the  opportunity  to  review  and  evaluate  educational  sites  and  soft-
ware to enhance instruction. She works directly with staff on a daily basis designing
and teaching technology infused lessons.
Dan McDowell

Dan  McDowell  has  spent  the  last  eleven  years  teaching  social  studies  at  West
Hills.  During  that  time,  he  has  actively  been  involved  in  technology  integration  at
the  local,  State,  and  national  levels,  giving  numerous  workshops  and  presentations
on  variety  of  topics  including  WebQuests,  blogs,  wikis,  and  digital  video.  Most  re-
cently McDowell presented at the National Education Computing Conference in San
Diego.  In  2002  he  was  named  Classroom  Connect’s  Internet  Educator  for  the  Year
for the Western United States. In Spring 2006, he completed his MA in Educational
Technology  at  San  Diego  State  University  and  was  award  the  privilege  of  rep-
resenting  the  graduating  class  as  the  honor  graduate  for  the  department.  This  fall
he was hired by SDSU to teach a graduate level seminar on digital video. At http:/
/www.ahistoryteacher.com/wordpress,  McDowell  blogs  about  issues  related  to  his
day-to-day experiences as a classroom teacher and educational technologist. His on-
line portfolio may be accessed at http://ahistoryteacher.com/.
Susim Munshi

Susim  Munshi  is  a  Senior  Analyst,  Technology  Planning  and  Integration,  Office
of  Technology  Services-eLearning,  Chicago  Public  Schools.  Susim  has  over  20  years
of experience working with students, teachers and administrators. In his current po-
sition Susim assists schools with professional development, curriculum design, tech-
nology planning, and grant writing. Susim has presented at numerous State and na-
tional conferences on cutting edge technology integration solutions in classrooms.
Alicia Narvaez

Alicia Narvaez is Creator/Director of the ‘‘Virtual Pre-K & K’’ program, a national
multi-media  parent  involvement  initiative  based  out  of  the  Chicago  Public  Schools
Office of Early Childhood Education. She is responsible for overall program develop-
ment  and  implementation  in  Chicago  and  with  school  districts  in  Illinois,  Texas,
California, Colorado and Nevada. In May 2006, the Virtual K program was awarded
the  Codie  Award  for  ‘‘Best  Instructional  Solution:  Students  at  Home.’’  Prior  to  her
current work in public education, Alicia spent a decade in educational television and
media production. Her credits include work for the Discovery Channel, National Ge-
ographic Television, CBS News, NOVA, and the BBC.
Sara Reibman

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00094 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

91

Sara Reibman is a librarian at Biblioteca Las Ame´ricas where she works with the
staff  and  students  of  the  Science  Academy  and  the  South  Texas  High  School  for
Health  Professions,  both  magnet  schools  in  the  Rio  Grande  Valley.  Sara  works  on
the  BLA  web  site  (http://bla.stisd.net),  the  VIVA!  Peer  Tutor  Program  (http://
bla.stisd.net/viva.htm),  online  services,  and  photo  classes.  In  2006,  her  library  won
the  National  School  Library  Media  Program  of  the  Year  award  from  the  American
Association of School Librarians and she received the Information Technology Path-
finder of the Year award from the same institution. Sara received her B.A. from the
University  of  Maryland  in  1975  and  her  M.L.I.S.  from  Texas  Woman’s  University
in 2000.
Annie Schleicher

Annie Schleicher is an Associate Editor for NewsHour Extra, the teen site for the
Online  NewsHour  with  Jim  Lehrer.  Prior  to  joining  the  NewsHour  she  was  a  high
school  English  teacher  and  Peace  Corps  volunteer  in  Mongolia.  She  lives  in  Wash-
ington, DC.
Bob Sprankle

Bob  Sprankle  is  a  graduate  of  the  University  of  Southern  Maine.  He  has  been  a
3/4  Multi-age  teacher  in  Wells,  ME  for  ten  years  and  now  serves  as  the  school’s
Technology  Integrator.  He  was  involved  with  the  SEED  group  in  Maine  as  a  Tech-
nology  Learning  Leader  and  helped  train  the  first  wave  of  teachers  using  laptops
for  the  seventh  and  eighth  grader  MLTI  project.  Bob  was  awarded  Maine’s  Tech-
nology Teacher of the Year in 2006 from ACTEM. His students have received world-
wide recognition for their ‘‘Room 208 Podcast,’’ and have appeared in numerous arti-
cles,  including  The  New  York  Times  and  Apple’s  Education  Site.  Bob  has  his  own
podcast  (‘‘Bit  by  Bit’’)  to  help  teachers  incorporate  technology  into  their  classrooms.
Both podcasts can be found at http://www.bobsprankle.com/
Sandy St. Louis

Sandy St. Louis is educational outreach manager for FRONTLINE where she de-
velops  content  for  the  FRONTLINE  Teacher  Center,  an  online  destination  that  of-
fers  lesson  plans  and  activities  to  teachers.  Prior  to  joining  FRONTLINE,  she
worked  for  nearly  a  decade  in  documentary  film  and  video  distribution  to  the  edu-
cational marketplace.
Ceit Zweil

Ceit  Zweil  is  a  producer  of  kids’  Web  sites  at  WGBH  in  Boston.  After  five  years
at  the  helm  of  the  highly-acclaimed  ARTHUR  web  site,  she  is  currently  producing
the  companion  site  for  the  new  kids  engineering  series  DESIGN  SQUAD.  She  has
worked with PBS to pilot new Parents & Teachers editorial guidelines on ARTHUR
(and continued efforts to deliver rich supporting online content for grown-ups as pro-
ducer  of  the  CURIOUS  GEORGE  Parents  &  Teachers  area.  Ceit  has  served  as
Project  Manager  and  Content  Producer  for  several  other  WGBH-produced  sites,  in-
cluding  ZOOM,  TIME  WARP  TRIO,  AMERICAN  EXPERIENCE’s  WAYBACK,  and
the ARTHUR/Children’s Hospital Boston portal for kids. She has a BA in European
History from Smith College, and a MA in Theatre Education (with a focus on inter-
disciplinary education through the arts) from Emerson College. Prior to WGBH, Ceit
developed  an  interdisciplinary  arts/science  curriculum  for  a  local  education  com-
pany. She is a performer and dance teacher in the Boston area.

APPENDIX B

PBS TEACHERLINE STATION PARTNERSHIPS

Arizona—ASSET–Eight/KAET, Tempe
Arizona Teachers Excellence Program
School Readiness Council, Maricopa County
CCS Presentation Systems (statewide mobile training labs)
Qwest Foundation in Education

Arkansas Educational Television Network, Conway

Arkansas Department of Education
College Credit Partners:

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00095 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

92

University of Central Arkansas

Colorado—Rocky Mountain PBS, Denver

Colorado  Department  of  Education,  Office  of  Standards  and  Achievement  Sup-
port
Colorado Department of Education, English Language Acquisition Unit
Centennial BOCES, Learning Services
Northwest Consortium for Professional Development
Colorado Association of Science Teachers
Pueblo City Schools
Denver Public Schools, ProComp Office
Public Television Stations:
KTSC, Pueblo/Colorado Springs
KRMJ, Grand Junction
College Credit Partners:
University of Colorado at Colorado Springs

District of Columbia—WHUT

Howard University, School of Education
WHUR–FM

Florida—WLRN, Miami

Miami-Dade School District
Academica, Inc.
Public Television Station Partners:
WXEL, West Palm Beach, FL
WMTJ, San Juan, Puerto Rico
College Credit Partners:
Nova Southeastern University

Illinois—WSIU, Carbondale

Southern Illinois University, College of Education

Indiana Public Broadcasting Stations/WFYI, Indianapolis

Indianapolis Public Schools
Indiana College Network
Indiana Department of Education
Indiana Humanities Council’s Smart Desktop
ISTEM
Indiana Computer Educators
Public Television & Radio Station Partners:
WTIU–TV and WFIU radio, Bloomington
WNIN–TV and WNIN radio, Evansville
WFWA–TV, Fort Wayne
WFYI radio, Indianapolis
WYIN–TV, Merrillville
WIPB–TV, Muncie
WNIT–TV, South Bend/Elkhart
WVUT–TV, Vincennes
WBAA radio, West Lafayette
College Credit Partners:
Marian College

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00096 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

93

Iowa Public Television, Johnston

College Credit Partners:
Drake University

Louisiana Public Broadcasting, Baton Rouge
Associated Professional Educators of Louisiana
Louisiana Federation of Teachers

Maryland Public Television, Owings Mills

Anne Arundel County Public Schools
St. Mary’s County Public Schools
Washington County Public Schools
Baltimore City County Public Schools
Archdiocese of Baltimore Private Schools
Worcester County Department of Professional Development
Allegany County Public School

Massachusetts—WGBY, Springfield
Hampshire Regional School District
Easthampton Public Schools
Massachusetts Department of Education, Office of Instructional Technology
Public Television Station Partners:
Vermont Public Television
Connecticut Public Television
College Credit Partners:
Merrimack College
Westfield State College

Michigan—WKAR, East Lansing

Michigan  Department  of  Education,  Office  of  Early  Childhood  Education  and
Family Services
Michigan 4–C Association
Ingham County Health Department, Office for Young Children
Ingham Intermediate School District
Capitol Area Community Services Head Start

Mississippi Public Broadcasting, Jackson

Canton Public School District
Leake County School District
South Delta School District
Yazoo County School District
College Credit Partners:
Mississippi College

Nevada—Vegas PBS

Clark County School District, Licensed Personnel Department

Nevada—KNPB, Reno

Washoe County School District
Elko County School District
Western Nevada Regional Training Program
Northwest Regional Professional Development Program
Northern Nevada Mathematics Council

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00097 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

94

College Credit Partners:
University of Nevada–Reno, College of Education

New Hampshire Public Television, Durham

New Hampshire Department of Education
New Hampshire Local Education Support Center Network
New Hampshire Regional Professional Development Centers
College Credit Partners:
Plymouth State University

New Jersey Network, Trenton

New Jersey Department of Education

New Mexico—KNME, Albuquerque

New Mexico Public Education Department Rural Education Bureau
New Mexico Division of Higher Education
College Credit Partners:
University of New Mexico

North Dakota—Prairie Public Broadcasting, Fargo

North Central Council for School Television
North Dakota Department of Public Instruction, State Title I Office
Lakes and Prairies Child Care Resource and Referral
Children  and  Family  Services  Division  of  the  North  Dakota  Department  of
Human Services
College Credit Partners:
North Dakota State University
Minnesota State University, Moorhead

New York—WNED, Buffalo

Science Teachers Association of New York (STANYS)
Reading/Language Arts Association
New York State Mathematics Association
ECLIPSE Science Coordinators
BOCES Model School Coordinators
New York State Teacher Centers
New York State Department of Education
Public Television Station Partners:
WMHT, Albany/Schenectady
WSKG, Binghamton
WLIW, Long Island
WNET, New York
WCFE, Plattsburgh
WXXI, Rochester
WCNY, Syracuse
WPBS, Watertown

Ohio—WVIZ, Cleveland

Tri-County Educational Service Center
Logan County Educational Service Center
Cuyahoga County Educational Service Center
Cuyahoga Special Education Service Center
Greater Cleveland Educational Development Center

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00098 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

95

Public Television Station Partners:
Think TV, Dayton
WOUB and ETSEO, Athens
WCET, Cincinnati
WGBU, Bowling Green
WOSU/WPBO, Columbus/Portsmouth
WGTE, Toledo
College Credit Partners:
Ashland University
Cleveland State University
The University of Akron

Pennsylvania—WQLN, Erie

Northwest Tri-County Intermediate Unit
Northwest Regional Key (supports PA Early Learning Keys to Quality)

Pennsylvania—WITF, Harrisburg
Capital Area Intermediate Unit

South Carolina ETV, Columbia

South Carolina Department of Education
Public Television Station Partners:
Georgia Public Broadcasting, Atlanta
UNC–TV, Research Triangle Park, NC

Tennessee—Nashville Public Television

Tennessee Department of Education, Office of Early Learning
Metro Nashville Public Schools
Public Television Station Partner:
WLJT, West Tennessee State University
College Credit Partner:
Tennessee State University

Texas—KLRU, Austin & KLRN, San Antonio

Texas Computer Education Association
Texas  Education  Agency,  Division  of  Advanced  Academics/Gifted  and  Talented
Public Television Station Partners:
KACV, Amarillo
KEDT, Corpus Christi
KERA, Dallas
KMBH, Harlingen
KUHT, Houston
KNOT, Killeen
KTXT, Lubbock
KOCV, Odessa
KWBU, Waco

Virginia—WHRO, Norfolk

Virginia Society for Technology in Education
Virginia Department of Education
Public Television Station Partners:
MHz Networks, Falls Church
WVPT, Harrisonburg

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00099 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

96

WCVE, Richmond
WBRA, Roanoke
College Credit Providers:
James Madison University

Wisconsin Educational Communications Board, Madison

College Credit Partners:
Viterbo University

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00100 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

97

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

Responses  by  Alejandro  Grajal,  Senior  Vice  President  for  Conservation,  Education,

and Training, The Chicago Zoological Society

Questions submitted by Representative Vernon J. Ehlers
Q1. Where do you go to find research when developing ISE programs? Have you used
NSF-funded or other federal agency funded research? Are you aware of the 2008
Framework  for  Evaluating  Impacts  on  Informal  Science  Education  Projects
mentioned  by  Dr.  Ferrini-Mundy?  And  can  you  provide  example  of  how  federal
sponsored educational research has been applied to existing programs?

A1. To  develop  informal  science  education  programs,  we  seek  research  papers  in
various  publications,  both  scientific  and  non-scientific.  Some  of  our  top  sources  are
Science  Magazine  (by  AAAS)  and  Nature  Magazine.  Science  Magazine  prints  a  reg-
ular  science  education  feature  that  provides  good  and  timely  reporting  on  major
trends  in  ISE.  Another  good  source  is  the  NTSA  magazine  (published  by  the  Na-
tional  Science  Teacher  Association).  Although  this  is  a  popular-type  publication,  it
brings research results in an accessible way.

We  have  used  some  NSF-funded  research  for  Informal  Science  Education,  but  I
would  not  consider  that  our  main  source  of  information.  We  have  found  that  a  sig-
nificant  portion  on  that  most  of  the  ISE  research  is  focused  on  methods  to  provide
scientific  content  with  less  emphasis  on  the  process  of  how  the  scientific  method  is
acquired and applied by students.

In  that  regard,  the  2008  Framework  for  Evaluating  Impacts  on  Informal  Science
Education  Projects  mentioned  by  Dr.  Ferrini-Mundy  is  an  important  part  of  estab-
lishing  standards  for  evaluating  impacts  in  ISE,  particularly  by  providing  the  ‘‘Six
Strands of Science Learning,’’ which we believe will become the reference standards
for all future ISE evaluation efforts.

In the case of the Chicago Zoological Society, our main source of federal sponsored
educational  research  has  been  the  IMLS  (Institute  for  Museum  and  Library  Serv-
ices),  which  has  funded  some  of  our  programs,  including  research  and  evaluation.
Our evaluation research is now focused on several important ISE objectives. One of
our  most  recent  interests  addresses  how  learners  view  themselves  with  respect  to
science.  In  particular  how  minorities  and  women  develop  personal  images  of  how
they can use science to solve real-life problems.

As  we  mentioned  in  our  testimony,  we  find  that  some  research  has  been  ham-
pered  by  the  over-reliance  on  technology  or  scientific  facts  as  a  metaphor  for  sci-
entific progress. Those approaches with heavy emphasis on technology or science re-
sults  tend  to  overlook  that  one  of  the  basic  components  of  effective  science  is  the
development of personal confidence and strong scientific skills.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00101 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00102 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Appendix 2:

ADDITIONAL MATERIAL FOR THE RECORD

(99)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00103 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

100

STATEMENT OF LOANNIS MIAOULIS

PRESIDENT AND DIRECTOR

MUSEUM OF SCIENCE, BOSTON

AND FOUNDING DIRECTOR

NATIONAL CENTER FOR TECHNOLOGICAL LITERACY

On behalf of the Museum of Science, Boston and our National Center for Techno-
logical  Literacy,  I  applaud  Chairman  Lipinski  and  the  Members  of  the  Sub-
committee  for  holding  this  hearing  on  the  importance  of  informal  science,  tech-
nology, engineering and mathematics (STEM) education and the opportunity to con-
tribute to it.

ENGINEERING CHANGE: Achieving STEM Literacy and Innovation

With  an  economy  in  crisis  and  a  workforce  at  risk,  educating  the  Nation’s  future
scientists  and  engineers  and  advancing  technological  literacy  are  more  important
than ever. And, while there are no easy ‘‘fixes,’’ informal education centers can help
ensure  that  future  Americans  are  prepared  to  make  the  informed  decisions  life  in
a complex technological world requires and to create the products and services that
will enable our economy to thrive.

Informal  Environments  Play  a  Vital  Role  in  Public  and  K–12  STEM  Edu-

cation.

According to the January 2009 National Research Council (NRC) report, Learning
Science  in  Informal  Environments:  Places,  People,  and  Pursuits,  ‘‘tens  of  millions  of
Americans,  young  and  old,  choose  to  learn  about  science  in  informal  ways—by  vis-
iting  museums  and  aquariums,  attending  after-school  programs,  pursuing  personal
hobbies,  and  watching  TV  documentaries,  for  example.’’  The  report  also  notes  that
informal  teaming  experiences  can  significantly  improve  outcomes  for  individuals
from groups historically under-represented in science.

Science centers and museums in particular can spark life-long interest in and un-
derstanding of science, engineering, mathematics, and technology. Non-threatening,
friendly  environments  where  adults  and  children  can  explore  without  fear  of  being
wrong, museums have resources that many schools do not and offer informal, often
interactive, activities that complement the school curriculum. By helping the public
investigate  the  natural  world  and  why  and  how  the  human-made  world  works,
science  museums  help  equip  young  people  to  live  and  work  in  the  21st  century,
while  also  increasing  the  public’s  ability  to  make  educated  decisions.  Many  of  the
complex issues that shape our lives require an understanding of basic science, tech-
nology, engineering, and math.

The  Museum  of  Science,  Boston  is  one  of  the  world’s  largest  science  centers
an  New  England’s  most  attended  cultural  institution.  We  work  to  bring  science,
technology, engineering, and mathematics alive for about 1.5 million visitors a year
through  our  interactive  exhibits  and  programs,  serving  100,000  more  in  traveling
and overnight programs. Our landmark, long-range exhibits plan ‘‘Science Is an Ac-
tivity’’ encourages visitors to practice scientific thinking skills. ‘‘Science Is an Activ-
ity’’ has been awarded many National Science Foundation grants and influenced ex-
hibit  development  at  other  science  centers.  The  Museum  of  Science  also  partners
with school districts to bring the excitement of the Museum to the classroom, while
providing support and resources for teachers through field trip workshops, pre- and
post-visit  activities,  teacher  professional  development,  outreach,  and  linking  re-
sources to state and national learning standards.

For  example,  the  Museum’s  Eye  Opener  Program  has  served  80,000  children
from  disadvantaged  city  neighborhoods  in  the  last  40  years.  Supported  by  the
Germeshausen Family Foundation and others, 2,500 to 3,000 second graders a year
from  45  to  60  Boston  public  schools  explore  science  and  engineering  for  free  and
share  their  experiences  with  dedicated  Museum  volunteers.  An  Eye  Opener  visit  is
not  just  a  field  trip,  but  an  all-in-one  learning  experience  that  begins  the  week  be-
fore  with  a  visit  by  Museum  staff.  When  the  children  pour  out  of  the  buses,  they
are  primed  to  marvel  at  a  live  alligator,  climb  on  a  seesaw  to  learn  balance,  and
more.  Meanwhile,  as  the  youngsters  tour  the  Museum,  their  teachers  learn  how  to
use  the  Museum’s  resources  in  their  classrooms.  The  Eye  Opener  program  is  also
a  career  and  academic  learning  opportunity  for  urban  high  school  youth.  Duci
Goncalves,  28,  reported  that  when  she  was  an  Eye  Opener  teen  volunteer,  the  Mu-
seum  ‘‘opened  my  eyes  and  expanded  my  world.  Now,  I  feel  I  can  do  anything.’’  A
2002 graduate of Boston University with a Northeastern University law degree, she
works as an attorney with the Youth Advocacy Project in Roxbury.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00104 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

101

Each  year,  the  Museum  hosts  20,000  youngsters  in  grades  1–6  and  their  adult
chaperones  in  a  unique  overnight  field  trip  for  a  very  different  kind  of  learning
experience. Since 1985, years before the popular movie, ‘‘Night at the Museum,’’ the
Museum  of  Science  has  hosted  about  435,000  overnighters  who  can  sleep  beneath
a life-sized model of Tyrannosaurus Rex, after engaging in hands-on activities focus-
ing on science, technology, engineering and math.

Museums  can  also  be  a  valuable  community  resource.  In  addition  to  on-site
visitors, the Museum of Science serves others through outreach programs, K–12 en-
gineering  curricula,  partnerships,  traveling  exhibits,  and  web-based  media.  Since
1995,  the  Museum  has  welcomed  under-represented  cultural,  ethnic,  and  disabled
communities  via  partnerships  with  over  3,500  organizations  in  Greater  Boston  and
surrounding  areas.  In  the  last  10  years,  over  207,000  under-represented  visitors
have  enjoyed  free  and/or  discounted  admission  to  the  Museum  and/or  participated
in Museum or neighborhood-based community events.

When,  with  the  support  of  the  Hearst  Endowment,  the  Museum  of  Science  trav-
eling  program  was  able  to  bring  free  presentations  featuring  live  animals  to  400
public school fifth graders in Holyoke, Massachusetts to spark their interest in biol-
ogy,  Dr.  Helen  Gibson,  Holyoke’s  K–8  science  academic  coordinator,  said,  ‘‘A  lot  of
our children are from homes where poverty is an issue. Having high-quality, hands-
on programs from the Museum’s inspiring educators, is wonderful.’’

Each  year,  in  over  100  learning  environments  across  the  globe,  modeled  on  the
Museum’s  flagship  Computer  Clubhouse,  25,000  under-served  youths  worldwide
are changing their lives through the creative use of technology and support of adult
mentors via the Intel Computer Clubhouse Network. Its ‘‘Girls Day’’ program builds
confidence and life skills of girls, using technology to create projects related to their
interests.

Connecting Math and Science to Innovation via Technology and Engineer-

ing in Formal and Informal Education Settings.

We  greatly  appreciate  that  K–12  Science,  Technology,  Engineering  and  Mathe-
matics (STEM) education in the United States has received significant attention, in
response  to  international  competition,  national  security,  and  the  need  for  a  well-in-
formed  citizenry,  however,  we  are  concerned  that  K–12  technology  and  engineering
education has been largely overlooked. We hope for different results, while following
an age-old model of instruction.

Much  of  our  science  curricula  was  established  in  the  nineteenth  century,  when
our  society  was  largely  agrarian,  and  focused  on  the  natural  world.  There  were  no
cell phones, automobiles, video games, nuclear power plants or space stations. Obvi-
ously,  our  world  has  dramatically  changed  but  most  curricula  have  not,  leaving  a
huge  gap  in  learning.  Teachers  and  students  learn  little  of  the  human-made  world
(i.e.,  technologies)  or  of  the  process  in  which  technologies  are  created—engineering.
While  most  people  spend  95  percent  of  their  time  interacting  with  the  technologies
of the engineered world, few know that these products, systems and services are cre-
ated  via  the  engineering  design  process.  Despite  the  exponential  growth  and  influ-
ence of technology in our lives, much of our core curricula remain largely unchanged
and only address the human-made world in elective courses or vocational programs.
Only in rare instances is engineering discussed or taught.

We  need  to  add  technology  and  engineering  as  standard  content  in  U.S.
public  schools  and  modernize  our  teaching  to  reflect  our  technological
world—our widely diverse and technologically rich world. We are not simply
referring to computers in the classroom. We advocate and educate for a broader un-
derstanding  and  appreciation  of  the  wide  array  of  technologies,  that  we  often  take
for  granted,  like  clean  water  and  air  technologies,  simple  and  complex  transpor-
tation  technologies,  energy  technologies,  production  and  distribution  technologies,
waste  disposal  technologies,  and  other  engineered  solutions  that  respond  to  our
human needs and sustain our planet.

The  key  to  educating  students  to  thrive  in  today’s  competitive  global  economy  is
introducing  them  to  the  engineering  design  skills  and  concepts  that  will  engage
them  in  applying  their  math  and  science  knowledge  to  solve  real  problems.  This  is
the way to harness the creativity of young minds. This is also the process that fuels
innovation of new technologies.

Engaging students in engineering skills—identifying a problem, designing a solu-
tion,  testing,  and  improving  the  design—can  offer  a  platform  for  applied  and  inte-
grated learning in math, science, English language arts, and history and social stud-
ies. Allowing for failure and hands-on activities, engineering can also open doors for
different kinds of learners.

Introducing  engineering  in  K–12  learning  opens  career  opportunities  for  children
of  all  backgrounds.  More  than  70  percent  of  U.S.-born  engineers  are  influenced  by

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00105 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

102

a relative to become an engineer. Children from ethnic groups under-represented in
technology  and  engineering  most  often  do  not  have  the  relatives  or  counselors  to
guide  them  to  pursue  these  fields.  As  minority  groups  become  majority  groups,  we
may see a parallel decrease in U.S.-born engineers. To maintain our country’s vital-
ity  and  security  and  diversify  our  workforce,  we  must  expand  teacher  and  student
understanding of technology and engineering.

We  need  to  make  the  ‘‘technology’’  and  ‘‘engineering’’  in  STEM  education  as  im-
portant  as  the  ‘‘science’’  and  ‘‘math’’  in  all  policy-making,  funding,  K–12  standards
and  curricula,  teacher  professional  development  and  certification,  and  student  pro-
grams and assessments.

Understanding the importance of scientific and technological literacy and the need
for trained scientists and engineers, the Museum of Science launched the National
Center for Technological Literacy®  (NCTL®) in 2004 to enhance knowledge of
engineering and technology for people of all ages and to inspire the next generation
of engineers and scientists. Through the NCTL, the Museum is working to integrate
engineering  as  a  new  discipline  in  schools  nationwide  via  standards  revisions,  as-
sessment  items,  research  and  standards-based  K–12  curricula  development,  pre-
service and in-service teacher professional development, and new technology and en-
gineering  museum  exhibits  and  programs.  The  Museum  strives  to  introduce  engi-
neering  and  technology  to  schools  and  at  least  one  science  center  or  informal  edu-
cation  organization  in  every  state  by  2015.  The  Museum  of  Science  is  the  only
science  museum  in  the  country  with  a  comprehensive  strategy  and  infrastructure
to foster technological literacy in both science museums and schools nationwide.

An  early  initiative  of  the  NCTL  was  to  examine  and  enhance  K–12  engineering
curricula. The Museum’s online Technology and Engineering Curriculum Review in-
cludes  instructional  materials  in  a  searchable  database  (www.mos.orc/TEC).  The
Museum  offers  educators  and  students  nationwide  2,600  science,  technology,  math,
and  engineering  curriculum  resources  and  links  the  Museum’s  exhibits  and  pro-
grams to state and national standards.

The  NCTL  is  now  helping  states  modify  their  educational  standards  and  assess-
ments to include engineering, developing standards- and research-based K–12 engi-
neering curricula, and offering educators support and professional development. In-
volving students in engineering, before stereotyping about math and science discour-
ages  them,  the  our  curricula  projects  are  geared  to  both  genders  and  people  of  all
colors,  backgrounds,  and  cultures.  Our  Engineering  is  Elementary  (EiE)  cur-
riculum,  for  example,  integrates  engineering  and  technology  with  science,  language
arts,  social  studies,  and  mathematics  via  storybooks  and  hands-on  design  activities
for  1st–5th  graders.  Each  unit  includes  an  illustrated  storybook  with  a  child  from
a  different  country  and  culture  who  uses  the  engineering  design  process  to  solve  a
community-based  problem.  The  curriculum  has  reached  over  13,300  teachers  and
935,800 students in 50 states and Washington, DC.

This  program  incorporates  research,  evaluation,  and  assessment  into  its  design.
On  more  than  75  percent  of  questions,  students  performed  significantly  better  on
the  post-assessment  than  on  the  pre-assessment.  In  most  cases,  EKE  students  per-
formed significantly better than the control. This was true for both genders and all
racial/ethnic  groups.  Students  demonstrated,  among  other  things:  a  better  under-
standing that engineering involves design and teamwork; a better understanding of
the  engineering  design  process;  and,  an  increased  likelihood  of  understanding
science content related to the unit. Teachers reported gains in their knowledge and
understanding  of  the  range  of  engineering  disciplines,  what  engineers  do,  and  the
pervasiveness of engineering.

Engineering is Elementary also shows promising preliminary results in narrowing
the  achievement  gap  in  a  national  controlled  study  of  thousands  of  students  who
participated in an BE unit and related science instruction, and who participated as
the  control  group  in  only  the  related  science  instruction.  In  two  of  the  three  units
studied, the performance gap between low and high socioeconomic students was sig-
nificantly smaller after participation in an EiE unit.

The  Museum  of  Science’s  informal  education  efforts  involve  prototyping  mu-
seum  exhibits  and  programs  that  will  inspire  people  to  become  technologically  lit-
erate by exploring: 1) what technology is; 2) how it is created and used; and 3) how
to make informed decisions about its development, use, and impact. Among the Mu-
seum’s educational approaches are: 1) a ‘‘showcase’’ presenting new technologies and
the  latest  research,  2)  a  ‘‘creativity  workshop’’  for  hands-on  problem-solving  with
technology  and  invention,  and  3)  a  ‘‘forum’’  focusing  on  developing  critical  thinking
skills about science and technology issues. The goal is to help the public understand
the  innovation  process—the  skills  of  designing,  building,  and  using  technology-and
the  impact  of  science  and  technology.  Since  2003,  for  example,  Museum  of  Science
educators  have  engaged  76,000  young  visitors  (47  percent  boys)  and  (53  percent

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00106 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

103

girls)  in  Design  Challenges  involving  the  engineering  design  cycle  and  intended  to
appeal to girls and boys.

Well-Managed Partnerships Create Opportunities.

Science centers, particularly those with a focus on technology and innovation, are
well positioned to form partnerships with the private sector. It’s critical to man-
age  them  well.  Perhaps  most  important  is  setting  expectations  up  front  and  ensur-
ing  that  the  plan  of  action  will  meet  both  organizations’  goals.  These  partnerships
can  provide  science  centers  with  financial,  intellectual,  and  marketing  support.  Fi-
nancial  support  is  the  traditional  model;  firms  view  this  support  as  part  of  their
marketing, community relations or long-term workforce development, and/or philan-
thropy.  Intellectual  support  ranges  from  employee  participation  in  museum  pro-
grams  as  presenters,  advisors,  and  conveners  of  other  potential  partners  to  lending
or donating artifacts, images, and video.

In  addressing  STEM  advances,  the  Museum  of  Science  often  features  the  work
and  knowledge  of  the  world-class  science  and  technology  companies,  laboratories,
hospitals,  and  universities  that  surround  it.  In  addition  in  1984,  the  Museum  of
Science created the Science Museum Exhibit Collaborative to develop and share
exhibits  with  other  museums  across  the  country.  In  one  case,  the  Museum  collabo-
rated  with  Lucasfilm  Ltd.  to  create  Star  Wars:  Where  Science  Meets  Imagination,
a national touring exhibit which has promoted technological literacy since 2005.

For  the  Museum  of  Science,  intellectual  partnerships  are  critical  to  supporting  a
program  that  reflects  current  research  and  advances.  Firms  offer  marketing  sup-
port,  too,  as  advisors,  through  co-promotion  and  communication  with  employees
about  the  Museum’s  events.  Partnerships  can  revolve  around  specific  programs  or
the Museum as a whole. Firms value partnerships. Associating with a science center
provide  benefits  for  their  employees  from  free  Museum  admission  and  a  sense  of
pride  to  opportunities  for  volunteerism,  and  helping  development  of  well-informed
consumers  or  voters  and  a  science-and-technology-literate  workforce.  The  Museum
of  Science  has  developed  corporate  partnering  guidelines  to  address  important
issues like content integrity, ethics, and conflict of interest.

The  Beyond  the  X-Ray  exhibit  involved  extensive  intellectual  collaboration  be-
tween  Philips  Medical  Systems  and  the  Museum,  featuring  their  name  and  images
and engaging their people in Museum activities, including compelling presentations
of  live  3–D  cardiac  ultrasound.  In  this  challenging  economy,  sponsorship  from  com-
panies  also  helps  reach  communities  unable  to  afford  a  visit  as  with  the  Museum’s
partnering  in  2009  with  the  MathWorks  to  bring  programs  on  physics,  chemistry,
astronomy, and animal sciences into the Natick, Massachusetts, public schools.

The  Cambridge,  Massachusetts,  biotechnology  company  Genzyme  has  donated
hundreds of Museum passes enabling non-profits and schools to visit. A 2006 $2 mil-
lion gift to the Museum to create the Genzyme Biotechnology Education Initia-
tive  supports  programs  to  educate  the  public  about  the  rapid  discoveries  in  bio-
technology  and  how  these  advances  affect  their  lives.  The  programs  will  include
interactive exhibits and educational forums, teacher professional development, pres-
entations  for  school  groups,  lectures,  Web-based  resources,  and  K–12  science  and
technology curricula. Genzyme also supports the Museum’s model teacher sabbatical
program  enabling  educators  to  step  out  of  their  classrooms  and  become  students  at
the Museum for five days.

For  partnerships  between  informal  science  educators  and  formal  edu-
cation  institutions,  common  mission,  aligned  approaches,  funding,  and  synergistic
strengths  are  key.  Successful  partnerships  have  a  shared  sense  of  accountability,
preferably  with  written  agreements,  to  deliver  on  projects  and  programs.  Examples
include:

• The Museum’s Building Mathematics curriculum development projects, cre-
ated with Tufts University, provides innovative practices for integrating engi-
neering with math to help middle school students develop algebraic thinking.
• To address the national shortage of technology educators, Closing the Tech-
nology & Engineering Teaching Gap, a new K–12 initiative, is integrating
NCTL  materials  into  the  fully  accredited  online  technology  education  pro-
grams  of  Valley  City  State  University  (VCSU),  North  Dakota.  The  goal  is  to
improve  the  technological  literacy  of  K–12  teachers  and  prepare  qualified
teachers.  The  NCTL  will  make  its  curriculum  materials  and  training  avail-
able to VCSU via this innovative online teacher certification program.
• The  Museum  is  also  working  with  three  Massachusetts  community  colleges
to  help  educate  future  elementary  teachers  via  its  three-year  Advancing
Technological  Literacy  and  Skills  project  (ATLAS).  It  involves  the  com-
munity colleges in developing their understanding of technology and engineer-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00107 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

104

ing  content  and  teaching  tools.  Faculty  engage  in  engineering  design  chal-
lenges,  connect  technology  and  engineering  concepts  with  science,  mathe-
matics, literacy, and other subjects, learn about technical career options, and
modify courses to include technology and engineering. The project will also in-
clude  outreach  to  four-year  colleges  and  high  schools  working  with  the  com-
munity colleges to ensure continuity and create a cadre of faculty to introduce
this model to colleagues across the state.

• The  Museum  launched  its  first  school  textbook  publishing  partnership  in
2007 with Key Curriculum Press. The standards-based Engineering the Fu-
ture®  (EtF)  curriculum  engages  high  school  students  in  hands-on  design
and  building  challenges  reflecting  real  engineering  problems  and  encourages
them to explore what engineering and technology are and how they influence
our  society.  Preliminary  studies  show  that  students  increase  their  under-
standing  in  all  four  Engineering  the  Future  units.  The  textbook  is  narrated
by  practicing  engineers—female  and  male—from  various  ethnic  and  cultural
backgrounds.

Research on Informal Learning is Invaluable

Since 2004, the Museum of Science, Boston has conducted over 50 research, eval-
uation  and  literature  review  studies  on  informal  science  education,  addressing  how
the  Museum  engages  the  public  in  STEM  learning.  The  Museum  has  focused  on
these four areas:
1) Museum-led  teacher  professional  development:  The  Museum  is  exploring
ways  to  enhance  the  capacity  of  teachers  to  engage  their  students  in  STEM
learning. Early evaluation findings suggest that, in addition to increased knowl-
edge, teachers participating in the programs report feeling ‘‘renewed enthusiasm’’
and  ‘‘rejuvenation’’  for  teaching  and  learning  about  science.  This  suggests  that
the ability for informal science learning to enable learners to ‘‘experience excite-
ment,  interest,  and  motivation  to  learn  about  phenomena  in  the  natural  and
physical world’’ may extend not only to children but also to the adults who play
a critical role in educating their children. Future research could explore the lon-
gitudinal impacts of such programs for teacher interest and motivation for teach-
ing and learning about science, as well as the impact on increased teacher reten-
tion.

2) Universal  design  for  museum  learning:  Recent  Museum  of  Science  studies
have  found  that  people  with  physical,  sensory,  and  learning  disabilities  can  en-
gage  in  and  learn  from  museum  experiences  that  include  multi-sensory  inter-
actions  and  multi-modal  interpretations.  Some  studies  also  found  that  people
with disabilities report feeling positively about themselves as learners when they
can  fully  participate  in  and  learn  from  the  experience  on  their  own,  and  report
intense  negative  feelings  when  a  design  presents  a  barrier  to  learning.  Further
research  could  examine  the  relationship  between  independent  learning  and  peo-
ple with disabilities’ identities as science learners.

3) Adult  forums:  The  Museum  of  Science  has  studied  the  implementation  of  over
50  events  across  the  country  that  engage  adults  in  discussing  the  relationship
between science, technology, and society. The Museum has found that adults: at-
tend Forum discussions based on their interest in the topic; highly value the op-
portunity to engage in these discussions; learn about science and technology con-
tent and about the relationship between science, technology and society through
these  programs.  These  studies  also  demonstrate  that  program  participants  con-
tinue  learning  about  the  topic  afterwards.  Examination  of  the  potential  causal
relationship between program participation and continued learning is a potential
area for further research.

4) Engineering  design  challenges:  Early  studies  by  the  Museum  demonstrated
that  most  children  complete  most  steps  in  the  engineering  design  process  when
engaged  in  existing  activities,  but  that  children  need  more  help  during  certain
phases  of  the  design  cycle  than  others.  Recent  research  efforts  have  focused  on
how  exhibit  designs  and  adult  involvement  can  increase  children’s  engagement
in the engineering design process by providing supports and scaffolds that struc-
ture  the  child’s  engagement  and  increase  learning  through  multiple  iterations.
Challenges of metrics: The Museum uses many tools cited in the recent NRC re-
port: self-reported learning through surveys and interviews, conversational analysis
of  videotape  data,  and  observations.  The  Museum  triangulates  findings  across  in-
struments  to  reduce  reliance  on  any  one  instrument.  When  possible,  the  Museum

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00108 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

105

uses  existing  validated  instruments  to  collect  data.  The  availability  of  validated  in-
struments is limited, however, especially in the above described areas.

Museums’ self-directed, open-ended learning experiences which vary from partici-
pant-to-participant are hard to measure, using standardized tests that measure spe-
cific  constructs,  even  for  our  self-contained  programs,  such  as  teacher  professional
development and adult forums. In these programs, adults direct their own learning
process,  a  practice  participants  report  as  one  of  the  most  valued  aspects  of  these
programs.  This  makes  it  difficult,  however,  to  study  these  programs  as  controlled
‘‘treatments.’’  A  formalized  test  would  also  detract  from  the  self-directed  nature  of
the  programs.  This  is  why  the  Museum  relies  on  self-reported  learning  to  measure
learning  in  adult  programs,  triangulated  with  additional  instruments  such  as  jour-
nals or videotaped conversations.

Another  challenge  of  conducting  research  and  evaluation  studies  in  museums  is
developing  instruments  that  capture  the  learning  of  its  diverse  visitors,  especially
in  research  on  universal  design.  The  tools  need  to  be  flexible  and  allow  for  dif-
ferences in how individuals receive and convey information. It is important to make
sure  that  regardless  of  the  delivery  and  collection  method,  similar  constructs  or
ideas can be elicited from the users.

Major Challenges and Opportunities in Informal Science Learning
Exhibit development: For nearly all science-technology centers, the principal chal-
lenges are financial. Drawing support from corporate and individual donors, govern-
mental  agencies,  and  visitors  who  pay  admission,  science  centers  are  in  jeopardy
when  the  economy  is  down.  With  the  rising  costs  of  utilities  and  basic  functions,
science  centers  turn  to  cutting  educational  programs  and  deferring  maintenance  of
their  facilities  in  order  to  stay  open.  They  also  turn  to  program  activities  that  may
have  a  record  or  expectation  of  drawing  large  numbers  of  visitors,  even  if  those  ac-
tivities  do  not  offer  the  high  level  of  educational  impact  to  which  the  NRC  report
aspires.  Science  museums  can  create  exhibits  that  draw  large  numbers  of  visitors
and  address  important  learning  goals,  but  not  without  the  financial  resources.  The
Museum of Science was fortunate to win an award from the National Science Foun-
dation (NSF) for Star Wars: Where Science Meets Imagination, an exhibit that drew
over a million and a half visitors in its first eight U.S. venues, with learning experi-
ences focused on engineering design. Future opportunities exist and funding to sup-
port imaginative educational exhibit development would be beneficial.
Relevance: Science museums have been so successful at engaging family audiences
in science learning experiences that they are under-developed in meeting other com-
munity  needs,  in  particular  those  of  adults  faced  with  decisions  about  how  to  use
science  and  technology  in  their  lives.  That’s  one  reason  the  Museum  launched  its
National Center for Technological Literacy.

The  5th  World  Congress  of  Science  Centers  recently  challenged  science  museums
to  pull  people  together  ‘‘to  create  a  better  future  for  all  through  global  engagement
with issues of local, national, and global relevance.’’ The Museum of Science has also
been  fortunate  to  have  an  NSF  grant  to  establish  the  Nanoscale  Informal
Science  Education  Network  (www.NISENet.ora).  The  Network  is  building
partnerships  between  university  research  centers  and  science  museums  to  raise
public awareness, understanding, and engagement with nanoscale science, engineer-
ing,  and  technology.  This  is  an  area  of  significant  current  research  with  future  im-
pact  upon  jobs  and  STEM  careers,  as  well  as  possible  societal  benefits  and  risks.
Over  100  science  museums  are  working  with  university  researchers  to  address  the
needs  of  youth  and  adults.  Funding  to  support  similar  network-wide  approaches  to
other topics would further raise the capacity of the public to engage with the larger
enterprises of science and engineering that relate directly to their lives. Funding for
activities  that  support  public  engagement  and  foster  dialogue  between  experts  and
lay  people  also  represent  an  opportunity  to  bridge  important  socio-scientific  issues.
Two final challenges: First the challenge of inclusion—broadening the reach of in-
formal  science  education  to  under-represented  audiences,  ethnic  and  racial  minori-
ties,  people  with  disabilities,  and  those  in  rural  communities.  Existing  programs
could be strengthened and disseminated more broadly. The second challenge is pro-
fessional development. Informal science education is a complex field with only a few
opportunities  for  directly  relevant  formal  education  and  so  in-service  professional
development is essential.

Recommendations

Key  federal  agencies  such  as  the  Department  of  Education,  National  Science
Foundation, and NASA can make the ‘‘technology’’ and ‘‘engineering’’ in STEM edu-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00109 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

106

cation  as  important  as  the  ‘‘science’’  and  ‘‘math’’  in  all  policy-making,  funding,  K–
12 standards and curricula, teacher professional development and certification, and
student  programs  and  assessments.  NASA  is  uniquely  positioned  to  champion  the
technology  and  engineering  components  of  STEM,  inspiring  children  to  pursue  ca-
reers  in  these  areas.  NASA  can  focus  more  of  its  grant  activity  on  the  technology
and  engineering  curriculum,  teacher  professional  development,  and  support  the  de-
velopment  of  informal  science  education  programs,  such  as  museum  exhibits  and
television  programs.  NASA  can  again  become  the  main  driver  for  STEM  education
as it was after Sputnik.

As  you  pursue  education  and  innovation  policies  and  legislation,  please  also  con-

sider the following:

ties as well as math and science activities;

development and make sure they can participate in such programs;

• Remember  science  museums  are  excellent  providers  of  teacher  professional
• Expand and rename the Math/Science Partnerships to STEM Partnerships to
include technology and engineering educators in teacher professional develop-
ment opportunities;
• Support after-school programs that include technology and engineering activi-
• Encourage  states  to  adopt  technology  and  engineering  standards  and  assess-
• Encourage  states  to  include  technology  and  engineering  in  the  definition  of
• Expand  the  No  Child  Left  Behind  (NCLB)  definition  and  requirement  for
‘‘technology  literacy’’  to  go  beyond  the  use  of  computers  to  include  the  engi-
neering design process.

‘‘rigorous curricula’’ for high school graduation; and

ments;

Thank  you  for  your  efforts  to  highlight  the  role  of  informal  science  education  in
STEM  learning.  For  more  information  on  our  museum  programs  and  services,  visit
www.mos.org  and  the  work  of  the  NCTL,  visit  www.nctl.org.  If  we  can  provide  any
additional information, please let me know.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00110 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

107

STATEMENT OF THE GIRL SCOUTS OF THE USA

Introduction

Girl Scouts of the USA (GSUSA) is the world’s preeminent organization dedicated
solely  to  girls,  serving  three  million  girl  members  in  every  corner  of  the  United
States,  Puerto  Rico,  the  Virgin  Islands,  and  ninety-five  countries  worldwide.  Girl
Scouts  has  a  long-standing  commitment  to  girls’  education  and  continues  to  be  an
authority  on  their  educational  needs.  Girl  Scouts  is  committed  to  girls’  exploration
and pursuit of education and careers in Science, Technology, Engineering and Math
(STEM)  in  order  to  increase  the  number  of  girls  pursuing  careers  in  STEM-related
fields.  We  are  deeply  invested  in  supporting  girls’  involvement  in  STEM  education
and add a unique voice and proven solutions for Congress to consider while forming
policy to assist informal education networks in developing STEM programming.

Girl Scouts applauds the Science and Technology Committee’s commitment to en-
suring  that  we  have  an  adequately  trained  STEM  workforce,  and  submits  the  fol-
lowing  testimony  for  its  review.  As  the  Committee  continues  to  explore  the  role  of
informal  education  in  preparing  our  next  generation  of  engineers,  scientists,  and
mathematicians, please know that Girl Scouts of the USA can provide resources, in-
formation, and guidance in shaping public policies that will promote these fields, es-
pecially among our nation’s girls.

Scope of the Problem

According  to  the  U.S.  Bureau  of  Labor  Statistics,  jobs  requiring  science,  tech-
nology  engineering,  or  math  training  will  increase  24  percent  between  2004  and
2014 to 6.3 million. Unfortunately, students’ interest in these subjects is decreasing.
At  the  same  time,  instruction  devoted  to  these  subjects  has  declined  due  to  an  in-
creased focus on reading and literacy. Time magazine’s report card for No Child Left
Behind  found  that  national  average  class  instruction  time  for  math  and  science  in
grades  1  through  6  had  decreased  by  17  and  23  minutes  per  week,  respectively.1
Girls  especially  begin  to  lose  interest  in  STEM  early  in  their  education;  the  per-
centage  of  girls  who  say  they  would  not  study  math  anymore  given  the  choice  in-
creases  in  4th,  8th,  and  12th  grade  from  nine  percent  to  fifteen  percent  to  50  per-
cent  respectively.2 While  girls  consistently  match  or  surpass  boys’  achievements  in
science  and  math  in  scholastic  aptitude  tests,  achievement  tests,  and  classroom
grades,  high  school  girls  are  less  likely  than  boys  to  take  AP  physics  or  computer
science exams.3

This  weak  academic  pipeline,  along  with  other  factors,  is  causing  fewer  women
to  pursue  careers  in  STEM  fields.  According  to  the  National  Science  Foundation,
women  represent  46  percent  of  the  total  workforce  in  America,  but  only  25  percent
of the workforce in the fields of science and engineering.4 This gender gap holds se-
rious  consequences  for  the  future  of  our  country  and  its  girls.  A  Bayer  Corporation
Survey  of  Fortune  1000  STEM  executives  found  that  roughly  nine-in-ten  (89  per-
cent)  agree  that  bringing  more  women  and  minorities  into  STEM  fields  will  help
solve  U.S.  manpower  shortages.  If  our  nation  is  to  maintain  a  competitive  advan-
tage  in  the  global  economy,  we  need  to  ensure  that  the  entire  population  of  young
minds is encouraged to explore STEM fields.

History of Girl Scouts and STEM

Girl  Scouts  is  committed  to  girls’  pursuit  of  education  and  careers  in  STEM  to
achieve parity for girls in STEM-related fields. With over 70 badges and patches in
STEM-related activities for Girl Scouts at all levels ages 5–17, girls are encouraged
to explore the many ways in which STEM fields relate to their lives. GSUSA brings
girls  the  highest  level  of  STEM  opportunities  through  research-based  programming
and collaboration with academic and industry leaders. By developing an early inter-
est  in  STEM  fields  within  a  supportive  network  of  caring  adults  and  peers,  Girl
Scouts are poised to become future world scientists, engineers and scholars.

Girl  Scouts  STEM  programming  is  provided  in  a  safe,  fun,  girl-centered  environ-
ment.  Our  STEM  programming  is  designed  to  strategically  engage  girls  in  age-ap-
propriate activities that make STEM approachable and fun. Our programs promote
gender equality by encouraging girls to explore career and educational opportunities
in fields where women are under-represented, while encouraging girls to undertake

1 TIME  Magazine.  2007.  How  to  fix  No  Child  Left  Behind.  Time  Magazine  (May  24,  2007).
2 Educational Equity of Girls and Women, National Center for Education Statistics, 2000.
3 The College Board, Advanced Placement Report to the Nation: 2006 (February 2006).
4 National  Science  Foundation,  Division  of  Science  Resources  Statistics,  Women,  Minorities,
and  Persons  with  Disabilities  in  Science  and  Engineering:  2004,  NSF  04–317  (updated  May
2004). Available at http://www.nsf.gov/statistics/wmpd

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00111 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

108

activities that are girl-led, collaborative, and hands-on. Our past and current efforts
emphasize a number of different approaches, including public education campaigns,
partnerships,  mentorship  programs,  traditional  badges  and  activities,  and  innova-
tive new programming.

For example, in order to highlight the need to encourage girls’ interest in STEM,
Girl  Scouts  partnered  with  the  Ad  Council  in  2003  to  produce  a  three-year  public
service  announcement  campaign.  This  campaign,  aimed  at  girls,  their  parents  and
caregivers,  and  educators,  was  launched  on  television,  radio,  online,  and  in  print
media.

Girl  Scouts  programming  also  encourages  girls  to  reach  for  the  stars—literally.
Through  our  partnership  with  NASA,  Girl  Scouts  can  access  some  of  NASA’s  cut-
ting-edge  robotics  technology  and  one-of-a-kind  internships.  Girl  Scouts  are  able  to
attend  solar  science  trainings  and  are  given  the  opportunity  to  meet  NASA  sci-
entists themselves.

Our  NASA  partnership  also  highlights  the  importance  of  role  models  for  girls,
whether  they  are  astronauts  or  engineers.  Our  Fair  Play  program  is  a  proven,  suc-
cessful initiative run in partnership with the Department of Education and the Intel
Corporation  that  teaches  girls  about  the  fields  of  science,  technology,  engineering
and  math  through  extracurricular  experiences.  This  innovative  program  features
day  camp,  resident  camp,  after-school  time  and  university-based  implementation
models,  and  includes  women  who  are  currently  experts  in  physics,  math,  design,
technology and computer engineering. Hands-on learning and mentoring with adult
role models appeals to girls already interested in STEM, as well as those for whom
math and science were formerly daunting topics.

Long  before  these  innovative  programs  existed,  however,  Girl  Scouts  offered  an
array of badges and activities related to nature and other biological sciences. Beyond
traditional  badges  such  as  ‘‘Wildlife,’’  Girl  Scout  programming  includes  badges  in
math,  chemistry,  computers,  and  engineering,  with  badges  such  as  ‘‘Build  a  Better
Future,’’  in  which  girls  experiment  with  engineering  design  problems  while  con-
necting them to their desire to create positive change in their world.

Against this strong history and experience, Girl Scouts is poised to vastly expand
our STEM outreach through creation and launch of a new Girl Scout ‘‘journey’’ titled
It’s  Your  Planet,  Love  It!  A  ‘‘journey’’  represents  a  new  way  that  girls  experience
Girl  Scouting.  Rather  than  pursuing  discrete  activities  and  earning  individual
badges,  girls  take  part  in  a  ‘‘journey’’  along  a  designated,  multi-disciplinary  theme.
It’s Your Planet, Love It! uses girls’ concern for the environment as a way to bolster
their  interest  in  STEM  fields.  This  program  focuses  on  career  exploration,  hands-
on  activities,  mentoring,  and  project-based  learning  in  a  girl-centric,  supportive  en-
vironment. By increasing STEM literacy among girls, Girl Scouts is preparing a new
generation of leaders to tackle the environmental issues of tomorrow.

Policy Recommendations

Girl  Scouts  strongly  supports  federal,  State  and  local  policies  that  improve  our
focus  on  both  the  formal  and  informal  STEM  education  sectors.  Informal  education
organizations especially have a crucial roll to play in the shaping of policy that will
positively  impact  the  next  generation  of  the  STEM  workforce.  As  the  Science  and
Technology  Committee  moves  forward  on  this  effort,  we  strongly  encourage  you  to
support the expansion of programs that help non-profit organizations—such as Girl
Scouts—to promote STEM education and complement formal education. Girl Scouts
is  looking  for  opportunities  to  assist  Congress  in  improving  how  we  as  a  country
promote  STEM  education  in  our  nation’s  youth,  especially  at  those  points  where
girls tend to lose interest in STEM: 4th, 8th, and 12th grade. In order to best meet
the needs of girls and youth, we recommend the Committee consider and implement
policies that encourage:

• Diverse  Learning  Environments:  We  will  not  be  successful  in  increasing
the  number  of  individuals  engaging  in  STEM  fields  if  we  rely  solely  on  the
traditional  educational  setting.  Congress  must  expand  efforts  to  teach  STEM
fields  outside  the  classroom,  in  diverse  settings.  Specifically,  spaces  must  be
created for girls where they can explore, investigate, and experiment without
fear.  Efforts  should  be  made  to  pilot  ‘‘girl-only’’  demonstration  projects  to  en-
gage girls in STEM activities in safe, girl-only environments.

• Hands-on/Real World Learning: Limited instruction time, competing prior-
ities, and insufficient resources reduce the availability of hands-on experimen-
tation in the classroom. Our research demonstrates, however, that girls inter-
est in STEM is increased when it is provided in a hands-on, experiential, stu-
dent-led  environment.  Furthermore,  hands-on  learning  must  be  tied  to  prac-
tical,  real  world  applications.  To  ensure  that  we  are  engaging  students  in

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00112 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

109

ways  that  capture  their  imaginations  and  interests,  Congress  should  support
efforts  to  expand  hands-on,  real  world,  collaborative  learning  in  the  informal
educational setting.

• Role  Models:  Access  to  strong  and  inspiring  role  models  and  mentors  is  a
critical  way  to  engage  more  girls  in  STEM  fields.  Congress  should  create  a
mentoring  program  to  encourage  young  women  to  become  involved  in  STEM
education  and  careers.  Such  programs  should  promote  the  work  of  non-profit
organizations,  collaborations  with  business  and  industry,  partnerships  with
institutions of higher learning, and other activities that bring together the ef-
forts of the public, private and non-profit sectors. Special emphasis should be
placed  on  programs  that  serve  women,  minorities,  and  people  with  disabil-
ities.

• Stigma: Stigma and stereotypes about STEM fields often keep girls from pur-
suing  these  educational  opportunities.  The  desire  for  social  acceptance  in
school,  along  with  the  perception  that  STEM  activities  are  solitary  and
uninteresting, discourages young women from pursuing their early interest in
STEM. Congress should promote efforts of federal agencies, informal and for-
mal educational partners, and private industry to combat this stigma through
public  education  campaigns.  As  a  leading  authority  on  girls’  interests  and
thinking, Girl Scouts is well-positioned to assist the government in reframing
girls’  perception  of  STEM  to  encourage  more  girls  to  engage  in  STEM  fields.
• Consistent  standards:  To  ensure  the  quality  of  education  in  the  informal
setting,  Congress  should  develop  nationally  consistent  learning  standards
that  allow  the  country’s  informal  sector  to  provide  meaningful  resources  to
teachers around the country and map to national standards.

Conclusions

It is imperative that our nation meet the challenge of educating the next genera-
tion  of  STEM  leaders.  While  formal  educational  initiatives  such  as  No  Child  Left
Behind  have  renewed  our  country’s  focus  on  basics  such  as  reading,  writing,  and
math,  other  STEM-related  fields  have  received  less  attention  in  order  to  accommo-
date these changes. Although gaps in formal education are increasing, the informal
education  sector  is  ideally  suited  to  fill  those  gaps.  Organizations  that  run  after-
school programming in conjunction with year-round initiatives, such as Girl Scouts,
can  help  STEM  resonate  with  girls  who  may  have  previously  found  STEM  fields
uninteresting or irrelevant. Listening to the voices of girls has informed Girl Scouts
STEM  programming  and  provides  significant  and  important  lessons  for  Congress’
consideration.

Girl  Scouts  would  like  to  thank  the  Subcommittee  on  Research  and  Science  Edu-
cation for its willingness to investigate the importance of informal STEM education,
and looks forward to working with the Committee on these important issues.

Æ

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:37 Aug 30, 2009 Jkt 047611 PO 00000 Frm 00113 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\R&SE09\022609\47611 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

